Prologue.
From: "Ajax" Sinclair.
To: Raven Beckett.
Date: December 31, 2015
Subject: Happy New Year
Happy New Year, Raven. It’s weird ringing it in without you.
I know I went too far with you. I didn’t realize how much I hurt you until
you ran away. Since the first time I flew to Paris, you’ve refused to see me
again, and I hated our last conversation. Can we meet up so we can talk?
-Ajax's.
From: Ajax Sinclair.
To: Raven Beckett.
Date: May 3, 2016
Subject: Happy Birthday
Happy 18th Birthday, Raven.
I’m still in Paris, and I’d like to see you. I’ve respected your wishes for six
months, though I’m worried you won’t keep your word. Can you just come
out of your apartment? If you feel uncomfortable being alone with me, we
can go to dinner with your mom.
-Ajax.
From: Raven Beckett.
To: Ajax Sinclair.
Date: May 3, 2016.
Subject: Re: Happy Birthday.
Ajax,
We are family. I understand how entwined our lives are and want to move
forward from what happened. I promised to try to forgive you IF you left
me alone. Yet, it’s been nothing but flowers, gifts, texts, calls, and
impromptu trips to Paris. None of it resonates as backing off. I can’t be
magically okay within your approved time frame. Please leave me alone.
-Raven.
From: Ajax Sinclair.
To: Raven Beckett.
Date: January 2, 2017.
Subject: Mia.
Raven,
Did Mia reach Paris okay?
My parents have changed their minds and will join you both for the last
week of Mia’s break. I’m attaching their itinerary. Their hotel is within
walking distance.
I’ve respected your wishes for the last year. Can we now meet up and talk?
From: Raven Beckett.
To: Ajax Sinclair.
Date: January 2, 2017.
Subject: Re: Mia.
Ajax,
Thank you for the itinerary. I’ll be at the airport to pick up your parents. Is
Tessa’s new medication still causing her nausea? I can stock up on ginger
drinks if it’s an issue.
Mia got here safe and sound. She’s having a blast; I’m attaching photos
from her site visits. If it’s okay, I’d love it if she could return for her
summer vacation. She wants to visit Nice.
I’m sorry, Ajax. Nothing has changed on my end, and I’m begging you to
move on.
From: Ajax Sinclair.
To: Raven Beckett.
Date: January 2, 2018.
Subject: WHAT THE FUCK.
Are you fucking serious!? You have been giving me hope for the last two
years while fucking other men?
I made a mistake, but I gave you every option to let me rectify it. The only
thing you wanted was time. You agreed to forgive me if I left you alone to
process what happened. You consented to a discussion about reconciliation
after some time had passed. I could have convinced Theressa to let me take
you back for your senior year, and there was nothing you could have done
about it, but I wanted you to love me of your free will. You told me the only
way that would be possible was if I stayed away. So, I did.
I’m not stupid. I knew you were saying what I wanted to hear to get rid of
me. I still gave you what you needed so there could be a possibility for us.
Is this the possibility you had in mind? This was what you were doing while
trying to forgive me? You didn’t think I’d find out?
Giving you an option is futile. I’m flying to Paris. First, I’m going to kill
the asshole you’ve been fucking; then, I am coming to see you. If you don’t
open the damn door to your apartment this time, I’ll break it down and
bring you back.
Alternately, you can return to New York on your own, and we can forget all
of this.
From: Raven Beckett
To: Ajax Sinclair
Date: January 2, 2018
Subject: Re: WHAT THE FUCK
1) Giving me an option to pick the one you prefer is not giving me a
choice.
2) I’m not currently in Paris, nor do I plan to return until Mia arrives.
3) Who I fuck and don’t fuck is none of your business. We’re not in a
relationship.
4) I’m not a minor anymore. Good luck kidnapping a grown woman from a
free country.
5) I agreed to the possibility of us only if I could forgive you. I haven’t
forgiven you.
READ THE FINE PRINT!
From: Raven Beckett.
To: Ajax Sinclair.
Date: January 5, 2018.
Subject: FUCK YOU.
YOU ARE A PSYCHOPATH! Did you go to Paris to beat up my friend? He
is in the hospital. I wasn’t dating him anymore. What the fuck is wrong with
you? Seriously. WHAT IS WRONG WITH YOU? Do your worst. I’m not
returning to New York, and you can’t force me.
From: Ajax Sinclair.
To: Raven Beckett.
Date: January 5, 2018.
Subject: Don’t push me.
I dropped him off at the hospital, didn’t I? It’s not my fault your “friend” is
a scrawny douchebag who fell after one punch and hit his head. Really, that
guy?
If you don’t want any more of your “friends” to end up the same way, don’t
do anything stupid like that again. I might not be able to force you to come
to New York, but I can stop my sister from going to Paris. I just canceled
Mia’s ticket. She won’t be spending her winter vacation with you. I’m not
buying more plane tickets for my parents or sister to visit you again. It’s
simple. If you want to see them, come to New York.
From: Raven Beckett
To: Ajax Sinclair.
Date: January 6, 2018.
Subject: Re: Don’t push me.
Ajax,
This is our last email exchange. I’m scared of you and don’t want to
communicate with you any longer. If you have any family-related logistic
questions, please go through Mia or your parents. As I promised, I hope to
forgive you one day for the sake of our families. For the time being, if you
contact me or come near me outside of those parameters, I swear on Mia,
there will never be a reconciliation. Please stay away because I want to
keep my word, and you know I don’t lie when I swear on Mia.
I hope you change your mind about keeping Mia from me. She grew up
having me as her sister. This will hurt her as much as it will hurt me.
I hope nothing but the best for you.
-Raven.
From: Ajax Sinclair.
To: Raven Beckett.
Date: January 6, 2018.
Subject: What is that supposed to mean?
Look, I’m frustrated, and it’s hard to keep holding on to the faith that things
will change. Can we just meet up and talk this through? I tried calling you,
but it’s not going through.
MESSAGE BLOCKED.
Your message to Raven Beckett has been blocked. See technical details for
more information.
MARCH 13TH, 2020.
Ajax.
I stared at the two texts from Reid but could only focus on the
first. A text that had me canceling my meetings and pushing everything out
of the way until I found myself standing outside of this familiar house. I
cringed at the words as I read them for the hundredth time.
Reid: Hey, bro, heads up. Raven is back in NYC & moving back to the house.
And… I’m going to ask her to be my girlfriend. Long story, but I think she’s
going to say yes.
I had already come up with ten ways to scoop Reid’s leering eyes out of
their very sockets for looking at Raven that way. Mia, the little shit, knew
everything. She told me how Reid felt about Raven. He was lucky I hadn’t
seen him since the revelation.
It finally made sense why Reid looked as shitty as I felt after Raven left.
There was a dark cloud hanging over Reid. I only saw Raven once after she
left, and the same darkness circled her. They both walked around like
corpses while separated. Alive, but only in terms of biology, how science
would define a living being. Dead in every other way.
Come to find out; Mia had told Raven about Reid’s feelings around the time
Raven ended things with me. Raven obviously couldn’t take hurting his
feelings, but she could tolerate wounding mine. I always thought Reid was
like a brother to her, but now… I didn’t know.
Her coming back means I have kept my word, though she sure as hell
didn’t.
Was she considering his proposition?
The possibility annihilated my remaining senses. I never thought it feasible
to be a bigger monster. I thought wrong. My heart was colder than before—
lifeless and black, never to return to its original condition.
That’s why it was odd my chest was stirring. My heart was pumping back to
life as I stared at a mass of black hair through the floor-to-ceiling window.
My cause for sanity—or insanity, depending on your perspective—and my
addiction.
Raven stood in the middle of the living room in a tight, black dress. Not
surprisingly, she had on high, red-bottom heels. She was always a sucker
for them.
She was more beautiful than I remembered. When I last saw her, she was a
teenager, but now she had grown into her pale and rosy skin.
Her black dress exposed her shoulders, and my hungry eyes took her in. I
watched with fascination, transfixed by her expressions and captivated by
her every move. I couldn’t stop this madness. She was too close. This
proximity had broken every self-control mantra I had recited and every
promise I had made.
It took twenty-one days to break a habit. It’d been four years, and she was a
habit I was yet to break. Like a junkie, I was in proximity to my addiction
of choice. I should walk away, find a rehab and check myself in, but all I
could think about was taking another hit.
Who cared about burning down lives? I’d burn everything down—break
every barrier, tear down every wall—until we were surrounded by nothing
but chaos, and the only thing left standing was us.
Unfortunately, our families stood between me and all that mattered.
If that obstacle were gone, would she finally stop holding back? I wanted to
say yes. Taking out my phone, I sent a text to Mia. A thrill of excitement
mixed with trepidation ran through my veins.
I was triggered by her presence and the threat of losing her for good. There
was a fog around me, not letting me come to a better solution than the one I
had just conjured.
Raven finally turned and made eye contact. She stood cross-armed with her
game face on. All her defenses were up, yet something resembling a smile
broke out on my face.
Rushing to the front door, I swung it open.
I halted, needing a full minute to take her in. Raven stared back with a
blank expression. Even that didn’t piss me off.
“Rave,” I started, barely able to keep the glee out of my tone.
She didn’t speak but gave me a nod instead.
“How have you been?” I tried to sound friendly, hoping to hear her voice.
“Ajax. Come in. Would you like a drink?”
It had been too long since I heard my name on her lips. I felt enchanted but
couldn’t ignore the humor in the situation. “You’re inviting me to my own
home and offering me a drink? Shouldn’t I be the one offering you a
drink?”
“Okay. Get me a drink. I’ll take a dry martini with orange bitters and a
lemon twist. Olives will do if you don’t have lemons. I prefer it in a chilled
glass. You can probably chill the glass in the ice bucket.”
There it was. I smiled. She was damn cute when she wanted to disarm me.
She didn’t have to try this hard; she already floored me.
I shrugged off my jacket. As we headed to the kitchen, I noticed something
weird about Raven’s outfit. Her dress had a back pocket, which seemed
fashion-forward even by Raven’s standards. The odd thing was the pepper
spray peeking out. I shook my head at her attempt while casually retrieving
the pepper spray to stash it away.
Unable to keep my eyes off her, I fumbled around the liquor cabinet for
martini glasses. I doubted my present ability to use a cocktail shaker to
make anything resembling a martini. Then I spied a bottle of Malbec on the
shelf. It was Raven’s favorite, so I offered it to her.
Our fingers touched as I extended the wine glass, shooting a familiar zing
through my system. I momentarily stopped breathing; the intensity of the
brief contact was like a high-voltage shock.
This girl—scratch that, this woman—was the only thing that could affect
me. She was an anomaly.
“When did you get back to New York?” I asked apprehensively.
“A week ago,” Raven lied. She had been back for months but had been
avoiding me. I disregarded the familiar irritation rising with her deceit and
continued asking more questions.
She told me about her work and finally disclosed the reason for her return.
“With the pandemic, you can't work a part-time job,” I assessed. “So, you’ll
stay here. We’re all camping out here as well.”
“I’m glad that’s settled.” Raven nodded, putting her wine glass down. “I
wish I could stay and catch up, but I have to unpack. Thank you for the
drink.”
What the fuck.
She wasn’t going to address the situation with Reid? Instead, Raven was
making a fast exit. The kind of anger only Raven could raise bubbled to the
surface. It was mixing into a volatile concoction inside me.
Putting my wine glass down, I charged after her. Before she sensed my
presence, I lifted her from behind. Raven tensed in shock and let out a
belated scream. It was no match for my fury.
“You think you can waltz in here after four years and give me the fucking
cold shoulder?” I growled as I walked with her in my arms. “You didn’t
think I knew you moved back months ago and have been avoiding me?
What the fuck, Raven!”
“What the fuck are you doing?” she shouted back. “I swear to God, if you
so much as touch me, I’ll go to the police. I’ll tell our families. I’ll tell
everybody. I’m not letting you get away with this shit anymore.”
She should know better by now.
“Do it.”
“What?”
“Do. It. Do all those things. When will you understand? I don’t fucking
care.”
Raven appeared bewildered by my declaration, though I could hardly focus
on it. Today, one way or the other, our families would find out about us.
I walked to my room with a struggling Raven in my arm and crashed onto
the bed. Raven made her case, using reason to talk me out of this. Not going
to happen. Ignoring her hits and verbal abuse, I leaned to kiss her. My heart
was about to burst open. I kissed her frantically while my body vibrated.
Nothing had felt this good—this right—and I could barely draw ragged
breaths, hungry for more.
I pulled her dress up and tugged her underwear down. I pinned her wrists to
her stomach, pushing down to keep her locked.
“Ajax, listen to me,” she tried her futile attempts, though I barely heard her
over the roaring in my ear. “I’ve known you my whole life. You’re a good
man. You know this is wrong. Please don’t do this.”
Resting my forehead against hers, I groaned, “Rave, I thought about you
every single day, every hour, every fucking second. I can’t stop now. Not
when you’re here in front of me.”
“Please just stop, and I’ll forget this happened.”
Never. “You will never forget this happened, and you will never forget me. I
won’t let you.”
I trailed kisses along her neck, trembling for an ounce of control to slow
down, and could only return to her lips for more.
I dropped down, my face landing on her pussy. With my free hand, I slipped
two fingers inside her and pressed my tongue on her clit. I pumped my
fingers, keeping up the torturous friction of my tongue.
Within minutes, sopping wetness met my tongue as her cunt squeezed
tightly around my fingers. I released Raven’s hands. If she didn’t want me,
now was her chance. I wasn’t holding her hostage any longer.
“Oh, God,” she cried as her fingers settled into my hair. Raven set off with a
catastrophic peak while I fumbled with my zipper. I swapped out my tongue
on her clit with my fingers and then exchanged it with the head of my cock.
Rubbing my dick against her sensitive spot, I extended her orgasm.
Her shriek was mute as she could hardly voice the ecstasy written on her
face. My heart was beating wildly at her expression, fucking erotic as shit.
I took my time to enter her, watching her beautiful face scrunched up in
pleasure. Years of wanting this, I wanted to savor every second.
Shock registered when I pushed my cock to the hilt and shook for control.
Perfect. Bliss.
A moment of true happiness.
I was a panting and growling mess, but I resisted the urge to thrust until she
was with me. Slowly, I found a rhythm, taking my time to revel in her. She
was in my veins, under my skin. I was consumed by her, but Raven’s
orgasm had subsided, and so had her lust.
She was a blank slate. Expressionless. Icy. Freezing me out.
Familiar anger surged at her rejection, ruining a perfect moment like this. I
had given her everything good inside me; all she had done was put up
barriers. Moving slowly, I dropped kisses the way she liked before sucking
on her neck. I twirled my tongue around a sensitive spot. Nothing.
There was only one thing that might get her attention. Raven hated when I
was rough with her breasts.
I pulled down Raven’s dress, bunching it around her midsection. Grabbing
onto one of the cups of her bra, I yanked it to the side. My tongue swiped
over her breasts, licking her nipple, the sensitive tip peaking under my
attention. It was pink and susceptible to my taking. I took the tip between
my teeth, slightly clamping down.
Raven stared at the ceiling. Frozen. Desensitized.
I inwardly shook away my anger. Losing control wasn’t going to work in
my favor. It was what got me into this mess.
Changing course, I licked her warm skin. I could never get enough of that
taste of vanilla. Starting from her breast, I licked my way to her neck and
sucked.
Raven relaxed enough to moan, and soon her moans matched my panting.
My attempts at control were useless against the sight of her tits jiggling as I
fucked her nice and slow. And right as Raven arched her back, I lost it.
“That’s it, baby. Come with me.”
I pounded into her until finding my release, waiting to hear Raven go off.
While she satiated and motionless, I undressed Raven entirely to roam her
naked body.
“I missed you so damn much,” I murmured in her hair.
“And that justifies forcing yourself on me?” she haughtily retorted.
Her body shook, possibly from anger. Though Raven was angry with me,
she was furious with herself. Raven hated that she’d never been able to
break our physical bond.
“Raven, I didn’t exactly force you. I let go of your hands while I was going
down on you. You could have pushed me off. Instead, you grabbed onto my
hair.”
Raven turned to face me as if she couldn’t believe the words coming out of
my mouth. “Forcing me to climax doesn’t change what this is,” she spat
through clenched teeth.
“No, but the fact you climaxed changes how you feel about it.”
“If you believe that, then why force me? To prove your dominance?”
“That wasn’t dominance,” I responded flatly. “That was assurance. You’ll
never be able to break this between us. I needed you to know before you did
something stupid.”
Yes. I was her worst nightmare, but despite my depravities, this was about
connecting with her, not just sex. I needed her physical reactions to
continue. Insignificant as it may be, she did have some control in that
regard.
Raven wore a blank look, checking out. That look indicated she had slipped
into her world, where no one else could reach her. Raven was formulating a
plan to get away from me.
Not going to happen.
I tried to distract Raven with banter, but it was futile.
Finally, she jerked free from my hold. I let her go only because it was time.
I received the long-awaited text from Mia. A text that was supposed to
justify the awful means.
As I put on a pair of shorts, Raven wrapped herself in a bedsheet and
fumbled with her clothes. She was always put together, so it was cute when
she was flustered. My amusement irritated her further, and she turned on
her heels, heading toward the door.
Holding on to the doorknob, Raven pulled the door open with full force. I
stood, knowing full well what awaited us on the other side of the door—no
time like the present to finally rip off this Band-Aid. We were going to face
the music. Together.
Raven.
I stared blankly at the six most important figures of my life standing before
me and was aware of the one unimportant figure next to me—the cause of
this awful predicament.
I stood at the door leading into Ajax’s room. We just had sex. To be precise,
he forced himself on me. I fought at first but stopped midway through, like
always, making this situation more hateful.
When we were done, I swung the door open to make my grand exit. As
soon as I opened the door, I came face-to-face with my parents, Ajax’s
parents, Mia, and Reid. I had nothing but a bedsheet wrapped around my
body. Ajax managed to put on gym shorts before joining me at the doorway,
and his filthy arms were around my shoulders as we faced off with our
entire family.
This was bad.
This was so bad.
I could hardly form a word, which was alright because neither could anyone
else. Six pairs of eyes were glued to our near-naked state, stunned into
silence—everyone except Ajax.
“We didn’t mean for you guys to find out like this,” Ajax started calmly.
“I’m sure you’re confused.”
We?
“Please wait for us downstairs,” Ajax continued. “We’d like to talk to the
whole family and address your concerns. Raven and I just need a few
minutes to get ourselves together.”
Ajax was a natural-born leader. He could easily assert himself without
being forceful. Everyone except Reid trusted his judgment and obeyed his
orders without argument, including our parents. However, despite Ajax’s
request, no one moved.
I silently begged them to comply. I’d much rather be locked in that room
with Ajax again than be out here facing them. I wanted all this to go away.
The guilt was written on my face. I couldn’t make eye contact with anyone,
but I watched Reid out of the corner of my eye. His face was turned away,
looking at the wall. If only I could read his expression. Or better yet, if only
I could turn back time.
Why the hell were they in front of Ajax’s room anyway?
I had to explain, but I had no idea where to begin.
Uncle Reese was the first to break the silence. “Come on, everyone. Let’s
go downstairs and give the kids some privacy. I’m sure there’s a simple
explanation—”
“Simple explanation?” my father’s voice boomed. “Reese, your son is
standing half-naked with my daughter. I mean, look at them.” He
disgustedly motioned toward us. Mortified, I could barely meet Dad’s eyes
and kept my head down.
“I’m aware, John,” Uncle Reese spoke calmly. “I’m sure they’d both like to
have the opportunity to explain—”
“Opportunity to explain what?” Dad cut off Uncle Reese again. “My
daughter’s not some tramp meant to keep your horny son entertained.”
“Now, wait a minute, John,” Tessa chimed in. “I understand you’re upset,
but there’s no need for name-calling.”
“Uncle John,” Ajax said coolly. “I don’t see Raven that way. I’m sorry you
had to find out this way, but I might as well be honest with you. I love her.”
Someone had just stabbed my heart with an ice pick. There was a freezing
effect spreading throughout my body. All I could do was watch how this
played out.
Ajax’s confession seemingly had the same effect on everyone else. It was
entirely noiseless as the words echoed through the hallway.
“How long has this been going on?” Theressa finally broke the silence.
“We’ll explain everything and answer your questions,” Ajax said politely
now that he had defended my honor. “We’ll have a serious conversation
with the whole family, but not like this. We’ll get dressed and meet you
downstairs, and in the meanwhile, if it helps to know, this isn’t a fling. I
understand how serious this is. Give us a few minutes, and we’ll explain.”
My hands tightened around the bedsheet, aware of my naked state in front
of my highly religious uncle and father. When would this nightmare end?
Mia noticed the misery on my face and came to the rescue. “Alright, guys.
Let’s give them some privacy to get dressed and wait downstairs. It’ll be
better if we can all sit down...” Mia trailed off as Reid spun on his heels and
stormed off.
Everyone turned in his direction. Reid’s loud footsteps echoed as he
stomped toward the staircase.
I stared for a moment until Ajax’s hand landed on my naked shoulder,
jolting me out of the lapse. Shrugging his hand off, I ran toward the
staircase. Fully nude, with only a bedsheet wrapped around my body, I had
no more shame left. I ran like a crazy woman to stop Reid—to somehow
make him understand.
“Reid!” I screamed.
Reid didn’t stop as he hurried down the stairs and headed straight to the
door. I followed, but the bedsheet was longer than my body. My foot
slipped on the silky edge trailing behind. I lost my footing and tumbled
down the stairs, screaming at the top of my lungs.
“Shit, Raven.” Reid turned from the door to rush toward me.
There was a stark pain in my ass and legs. Did I fall?
There was a commotion. Forcing my eyes open, I found Ajax running down
the stairs. Reid tightened the bedsheet around me and collected me in his
arms before lifting me.
“Fuck, Rave,” I heard Ajax’s panicked voice and a comforting hand
stroking my hair. My head throbbed, and I couldn’t move. “Here, let me
carry her.”
“Back. Off,” Reid replied through clenched teeth.
“Reid, I don’t have time for your shit right now. This is your fucking fault.
She wouldn't have run after you if you hadn’t thrown a tantrum. I’ll put
your face through the wall if anything happens to her.”
“Enough.” Uncle Reese’s usual calm tone was gone.
What was going on? I felt confused.
“Reid, take my daughter to her room,” I heard my mother speak. “Mia, go
with him and put some clothes on Raven. Tessa, show me where your
towels are. We probably need a few.”
Why?
My father’s unmistakable voice came next. “Ajax, go to the guest room,
grab my medical bag, and bring it to Raven’s room. I’m going to wash my
hands and meet you there.”
“Shouldn’t we take her to the hospital?” Ajax sounded incredulous.
“There are two doctors in this house, and we have enough medical supplies.
It’s probably just a concussion. Let’s observe her first.”
I sensed being jostled before hitting a soft surface. Someone yanked and
prodded at me, but despite my best efforts, I could hardly peel my eyes
open.
“I’m here, Rave.” Comforting strokes on my hair and Reid’s distinct smell
surrounded me. “Talk to me. I promise I’m not angry. None of that matters
anymore. Nothing matters as long as you’re okay. Please be okay, Raven.
For fuck’s sake, why isn’t she responding?”
I opened my mouth to respond, but I couldn’t find the strength, but that
smell was comforting, reminding me of home.
“She might have a concussion,” a man’s voice spoke.
Reid’s comforting scent disappeared, replaced with a different presence.
“Sweetie, can you look at this light? Try to follow it with your eyes.”
Someone blinded me with a light, flashing it right into my eyeballs. What
the hell? Rude!
I couldn’t focus as more directions were thrown my way. I tried my best to
listen but felt myself slowly slipping away and consumed by a dark hole.
When I opened my eyes, there was a throbbing in my head, and my vision
was blurred. I felt confused. Disoriented.
Lying slightly on my side, I moved my hand to my head, though everything
was moving in slow motion. As I tried to sit up, two sturdy hands grabbed
my shoulders.
“Hey,” someone whispered in the dark, nudging me back to a soft pillow.
“Don’t move. You need to rest.”
“Wha… Ajax?”
“Yeah, baby. I’m right here.”
I didn’t understand. How could Ajax be here?
“What? H-how are you…was...” It dawned on me something terrible had
happened. I could tell from my slurred sentences that something was off.
“Whaat’s… goin’ on?” I asked desperately.
“You fell,” he replied quietly. “Dad said you have a concussion. You need a
lot of rest for the next few days. Go back to sleep.”
Nothing made sense, and I was confused. Nonetheless, I was relieved to see
a familiar face during this confusing situation.
“Do you want some water?” he asked.
“It hurts,” I whined, moving my head to nod.
Ajax grabbed a bottle from the bedside table and slipped something bitter
into my mouth. My dry, chapped lips slurped as he held the bottle to my
mouth.
“Come here.” Ajax put away the empty bottle and collected me into his
arms. My head met with his warm chest, the embrace assuring me it’d all be
okay.
Ajax.
“Mom?” My eyes flew open to find Tessa’s face hovering over mine. “What
time is it?”
“It’s almost six p.m. You should come downstairs for dinner.”
Fuck.
I fell asleep seated against the headboard of the bed. My neck was stiff as
hell. Raven was lying sideways on a pillow, with her face tucked against my
thigh.
“I’m not hungry,” I replied.
“Ajax, you have to eat something. You haven’t left her side. You’re
worrying over nothing,” Tessa gently chided. “She’s going to be okay. John
and Reese both came to the same conclusion. It’s a mild concussion. She’s a
little confused and just needs to sleep it off.”
She was right, but I still couldn’t leave Raven’s side. Hearing her fall down
those stairs triggered the crippling panic I hadn’t experienced in years.
My business partners joke that I had turned soulless, lacking humanity and
empathy. My panic attacks stopped when this accusation took root. I
feigned concern at their observations, but I honestly couldn’t see it as an
insult.
However, Raven still invoked feelings in me, albeit they only applied to her.
That was why my paranoid mind kept conjuring up the worst. Dad assured
me she’d be fine, but I needed evidence of her vitality and kept checking
her pulse.
“She’ll be okay,” Tessa assured. “You know,” she spoke again, “we haven’t
addressed the other issue.”
“Mom, I can’t do this right now. Not when she’s like this.” I motioned
toward Raven.
“You said you loved Raven. You must understand why we’re concerned.”
“Why are you concerned?” I asked her curiously. “We’re both adults. Our
dads are best friends. Our families love each other. Everyone should be
happy if I want to be with Raven.”
“Ajax, you used to be her guardian. Do you know how that looks to other
people?”
“I don’t care what other people think. I have no intention of letting her go
again.”
Tessa contemplated my words for a few minutes.
“Letting her go again?” She frowned. “M-Ajax, exactly how long has this
been going on? W-was there anything going on with you two when you
were her guardian?”
My silence was her answer.
“Ajax,” she warned quietly, “please tell me you didn’t have sex with her
while she was underage.”
When I still didn’t respond, realization dawned on her.
“Jesus, Ajax,” she gasped in shock. “How could you be so stupid? You’re
supposed to be the responsible one.” She started pacing the room. “John is
going to kill you,” she stopped abruptly to announce. “For God’s sake, he
could press charges for statutory rape. What were you thinking?”
Uncle John couldn’t press charges, but I didn't bother explaining to Tessa. I
simply shrugged. “I don’t care what Uncle John does.”
Tessa stared at me with a blank look. “He loves her. You know that he
does.”
“Uncle John doesn’t get to play the doting, overprotective father. He left her
for years.”
“I wasn’t talking about John,” she said quietly.
I know what she was insinuating, but it didn’t change anything. “Reid will
get over it.”
“When Reid and Raven were young, we used to tell them they’d end up
marrying each other one day. We used to plan their future wedding.” Tessa
crossed her arms and stood tall in front of me. “I don’t know if Reid
stopped believing that. We all saw his face when he saw you two together.
Reid won’t get over this. I’m his mother. I know him.”
I stood to level with Tessa, finally displaying my irritation.
“Please don’t tell me how you know things because you’re our mother. I
was more of a parent to Reid than you were. As far as I’m concerned, I’ve
paid my dues. My only concern is moving forward in my life with Raven.
So, you see, Reid will get over it.”
Life might have hardened me, but it didn’t make me forget my
responsibilities. I might not be involved in this family's day-to-day
anymore, but I still paid their bills. Tessa sure as hell didn’t deserve to use
her ‘mother card’ against me.
“You’re right,” Tessa quietly agreed. “I’m sorry. We ask a lot of you, but
you never complain. You always step up to the plate, and I take that for
granted. Of course, it makes sense you and Raven want to be together. Reid
will understand. I’ll talk to him myself—” Tessa stopped short when the
door creaked open with Uncle John peeking inside.
“I was just leaving,” Tessa mumbled, squeezing my shoulder firmly. She
nodded at Uncle John before walking out.
I nodded in greeting as well, though he ignored me.
Uncle John and I had shared a good relationship until now. He was
notoriously religious. Since catching Raven and me in the act, he wouldn’t
look in my direction.
Uncle John and Theressa had moved back to the USA shortly after Raven.
They were wracked with guilt over some drunk emails they had sent,
claiming to never want Raven. They were Team Raven all the way,
something that would’ve been helpful years ago but was plain annoying
now.
Uncle John took Raven’s vitals while clearing his throat to address me.
“She’s dehydrated. Has she been getting fluids? Did she eat anything
today?”
“She woke up earlier for a few spoonsful of soup. I stocked up on water and
coconut water.” I nodded toward the mini-fridge I had moved into her
room.
“Good. She needs to eat more before taking the anti-inflammatory pills.”
He studied my unshaven and disheveled face, looking conflicted, before
finally asking, “So, how long has this been going on with you and my
daughter?”
“I’d rather we talk about this once your daughter is awake. Raven has the
right to tell you herself.”
“Yet, she chose not to.”
“You guys haven’t always been close over the years,” I pointed out.
Uncle John closed his eyes. His worried face appeared disheartened, and I
noticed the dark circles under his eyes. He had been genuinely concerned
about Raven.
“I know,” he whispered. “I wasn’t a good father. She deserved better. I
failed her, but you stepped in. You did more than Theressa or I did. I—I just
didn’t see you two in that light.”
“I don’t know how it happened,” I stated sincerely. “But it did.”
“Why her? You used to be her guardian. Do you know how that looks to
everyone? Ajax, you’re a good-looking man. You’re successful and an
eligible bachelor. Women chase after you. So, why does it have to be her?”
“It has to be her,” I gritted out through clenched teeth. “I always wanted to
be with her, but I couldn’t because—” My eyes flipped up to meet his.
“Because of me,” Uncle John finished for me.
We awkwardly stared at the floor following his admission. The room was
silent except for the sound of Raven’s soft breathing.
“You became her legal guardian because I asked you to take care of her,”
Uncle John sighed. “You couldn’t be together after your guardianship
ended, either, because there would have been too many allegations. I’m
sorry,” he whispered hoarsely. “I didn’t know how you two felt about each
other, but I respect you for not crossing that boundary with her back then. Is
that why Raven left New York so abruptly; she was upset you couldn’t be
together?”
The real reason why Raven moved to Paris without finishing her senior year
was different from the official story provided to the parents. Raven told
them she got accepted to the International Fashion Academy of Paris for a
remote internship. The adults raised their eyebrows, but no one questioned
it since Theressa lived in Paris.
I kept my expression neutral instead of giving him a response.
“This is going to take some getting used to,” he said, unconvinced. He also
sounded… understanding. “You two will face a lot of scrutiny from
everyone we know, but if you stick it out, you will get through it together
and come out stronger.”
“You’re serious?”
“I admit that I’m still shocked,” he spoke slowly. “However, you’re both
adults, and I know you are a good man, Ajax. I won’t hold back my
blessing if you truly love my daughter. I just want her to be happy.”
I had been engrossed in Raven’s health and hadn’t considered what would
happen once she was fully conscious. I told everyone I loved her, but they
hadn’t questioned how Raven felt about me. Raven wouldn’t keep up with
this ruse once she was lucid.
On the bright side, our families were finally on board. If Raven still sought
their approval, the transition might not be so difficult.
Uncle John awkwardly hesitated again before speaking. “Umm…one more
thing. Can you two sleep separately? You might be adults, but we’re still
your parents. I’m uncomfortable with this arrangement.”
I smile agreeably without verbally committing. Sure, he might consider
sleeping in his daughter’s room disrespectful. Neither of our dads approved
of premarital sex. However, I paid the mortgage here. My house, my rules.
After answering more of my questions about Raven’s condition, Uncle John
joined the others for dinner while I swapped out Raven’s old compressor for
a cold, new one. The injured leg was healing rapidly. By tomorrow, she
should be able to put weight on it.
Afterward, I woke Raven to give her pain medication. Raven complied
before falling back to the pillow, eyes barely open.
I greedily stared at her. In her perplexity, mixed with the concussion and
painkillers, Raven had forgotten to hate me.
Lifting the comforter, I collected her in my arms. Every time I held her, I
stopped breathing, expecting words of protest, but nothing.
Raven stayed put before burying her face in my chest. She was fast asleep,
allowing me to hold her close enough to let her smell linger. I stared at her
face, covered in bruises. Her upper lip was puffy. Her leg was elevated on a
pillow with a compressor wrapped around it.
I could objectively state her face busted open. Our family members cringed
when they saw her after the fall. Even in this state, her face could capture
my attention like nothing else. I could stare at her until I forgot to eat, drink,
or sleep.
I wanted her.
I wanted her with every fiber of my being.
The familiar gnawing under my skin itched with sick urges to claim her. My
mind warred with various rationality for my actions. After all, she’d hardly
be this complacent once the drugs wore off, and this might be my only
chance.
I had pushed the boundary with Raven many times, but surely, even I had
my limits. This was a terrible idea, I reminded myself while I repositioned. I
chided myself that I couldn’t, not while she was on drugs. All the while, my
ears perked to ensure no one else was upstairs and we’d remain
uninterrupted.
One taste of her, and it all came rushing back. One taste, and I was hooked
worse than before. Hopelessly addicted. I’d do anything for a fix and could
barely control the motion as my face moved toward her mouth. Being with
her reminded me of what I had missed out on for four years and why
nothing compared. I couldn’t breathe without this. If she had hoped for
reprieve due to her state, she was sadly mistaken.

Ajax.
Raven laid back on the pillow, eyes fluttering as I traced my fingers along
her cheeks and jaw. She was so beautiful it hurt.
Lightly, I grazed her mouth, cheek, and jaw with my lips, nibbling on a spot
that made her subconsciously groan. I gripped her waist tightly, eyes flaring
at the sound of her vocalization. Turning sideways to ensure the door was
still shut, I dug my nose against her pulse, unable to stop myself from
nipping at the skin.
Raven reached out an arm and snaked it around my neck for support.
“Mm.”
My whole body was set on fire, lips swooshing down against hers without
holding back. Raven kissed me back in her stupor, squirming underneath
me.
Slipping my hand between us, I caressed her over her shorts. She moaned
louder, forcing me to slap a hand over her mouth to muffle the sound.
Once more, I glanced at the door. “Shh… baby, we have to be quiet. Your
dad will retract his blessing if he hears us.”
She hummed in response, somewhere between conscious and unconscious.
My grip on her mouth loosened.
Sliding past the fabric of her shorts, my fingers delved into her folds to be
welcomed by sopping wetness. It was unexpected, making me grunt.
“That’s my girl,” I groaned, twirling my fingers around her juices while my
thumb pressed down on her clit. I was met without resistance when I
shoved two fingers inside her, the other hand moving roughly over her
body.
“God,” Raven whimpered, biting her bottom lips, eyes barely open.
“Rave,” I hissed, tugging her tank top to expose her breasts.
My eyes dropped to her full breasts with creamy skin and rosy tips. I
squeezed her bare breast appreciatively with one hand. Mouth dry, I swirled
my tongue around her nipple, flicking it back and forth.
Her sensitive nipples stood to attention as Raven inadvertently shoved her
breast further into my mouth. I moaned around her nipple, the gentle
sucking turning vicious at the voluntary offering.
Raven’s lids flickered from the cruel treatment, gaze seeking me out with
uncertainty. She glanced at her bare breasts. I sighed in relief when she only
appeared perplexed rather than voicing objections. Perhaps she thought it
was a dream.
“Ajax?” she asked in a husky voice. “What are you—”
I sucked on her nipple, making her gasp. Taking as much of her breast into
my mouth as possible, I fingered her, sliding in and out of her tight cunt.
Raven made an involuntary strangled noise in the back of her throat,
making me growl. “You’re nice and wet.” She was downright soaked. I
could hear the sloppy sounds my fingers made.
“Ajax,” Raven whimpered, head rising off the pillow.
It broke my resolve.
Fuck it. She could be as loud as she wanted, respect for her father be
damned.
“I-I…” Raven seemed to need immeasurable effort to speak, but her head
moving from side to side spoke volumes.
“You are doing good, baby,” I praised, stretching her with a third finger,
making her whimper. The first time we had sex since our reunion, she was
too tight for my dick. All the while, I ran my tongue over her tip before
moving on to the next breast. Raven arched her back, head knocking back.
I slipped my fingers out. Taking her left leg out first, I peeled her shorts off
as Raven grudgingly squirmed for the missing contact.
Her impatience made me chuckle. “I have to be careful with your leg,
baby,” I reminded. “But I’ll make it up to you.”
Discarding her shorts to the floor, I stretched out on my stomach, so my
face was between her quivering thighs.
Raven glanced down at me, appearing scattered. Suddenly, her eyes
widened as her wits returned.

Raven.
I hated being touched right after moving to Paris, but curiosity sparked my
determination to get over the discomfort. Why did people chase sex as their
desired form of physical contact? I liked sex with Ajax because it brought
me into oblivion. An escape. Was everyone else also trying to reach
oblivion or was it just about a physical release?
I started exploring the physical realm, hoping the same sense of escape and
oblivion existed with another, not just Ajax. Alas, it was never as mindnumbing or intense with anyone else. I had heard your first sexual
experience defined your preferences. It was true in my case. After going
through a string of lovers, I gave up on sex. It had been a couple of years, as
it didn’t interest me anymore.
Until now.
Now all my senses were heightened, and every touch drove me crazy. My
body buzzed, covered in goosebumps.
I didn’t recall the last time I had a sex dream. They weren’t usually this
vivid, hot breath tickling my inner thighs. I heard a chuckle when I moaned.
“Fuck it. I don’t care if everyone hears us. Be as loud as you want. Maybe
they'll learn a thing or two from us.”
Slowly, my eyes fluttered open, barely, to find a hazy figure between my
thighs. I caught sight of dark brown hair, and it finally clicked. My leg was
elevated on a pillow with Ajax between my thighs.
Something was wrong. Something was off. I was high, but this wasn’t a
dream.
“We can’t,” I mumbled, voice barely audible.
“All I did was kiss you, and you reached for me,” he replied. “You want me.
Or at least, you want my mouth on you,” he mused.
What the hell was going on?
I pushed against his shoulders, but my limp hands were ineffective. There
was nothing I could do except watch him do whatever he wanted.
I lay motionless as Ajax grabbed my thighs and slipped his tongue between
my folds. He used two fingers to run a line between my folds before going
back to sucking my clit.
My toes curled, my head knocking back on its own. My hips bucked
forward to chase the friction and increase the speed. I arched up, pressing
my core against his mouth. Trembling, I tried to stop myself from repeating
the motion.
Before I knew it, I was pushing my sex into his mouth violently, fingers
closing into his hair. No matter my fierceness, Ajax kept up the gentle
ministrations. He worked me torturously slow, running his tongue all over.
My head rolled back, writhing under him desperately to get his tongue
where I needed it. His mouth lapped at my throbbing flesh, and a sensitive
spot made tears run down my cheeks.
“Fuck,” I moaned, coming so slowly that it felt never-ending. My blurry
vision wavered altogether, rendering me breathless.
When I resurfaced from my elation, Ajax was pushing inside me. “Fuck,”
he panted, lifting my non-injured leg to settle into the space. His eyes
radiated with heat as his shallow breaths fanned my cheek.
“Ajax, no. I can’t,” I groaned. My protests sounded pathetically weak in my
current state, blissful from drugs and my orgasm.
“We can,” he growled.
Ajax’s mouth came crashing down. Grabbing his face, I attempted to pry
his mouth off. Ajax entwined our hands in retaliation, pinning them on the
mattress as he ground against me.
We came at the same time, with Ajax holding me close. I slipped into that
oblivion I sought but could never find otherwise.
The sunlight swept through the window, indicating the end of the
torturous night. A whiplash of emotions hit me as hazy realizations came
together like puzzle pieces.
Ajax was draped over my body. How was Ajax getting away with it while
both of our dads were present? In the Sinclair home, couples didn’t sleep
together unless married.
The only conclusion—our parents had accepted this union.
The theory was hardly plausible, given the number of people we knew in
this city. Dating your ex-legal guardian was a delightful scandal for those
bored, rich folks.
There was only one reason why our families would be okay with this. The
whole family depended on Ajax. He was the primary breadwinner. Were
they letting him have me as a consolation prize for his years of service to
this family?
I had to get out of this mess, but I had already moved out of my place. My
parents were broke, and so was I. Not to mention, I was immobile with an
injured leg and a foggy brain.
Experimenting with putting pressure on my wounded leg, I hopped out of
the room to scour the house for Reid. He was nowhere to be found. Parking
my butt on the living room sofa downstairs, I sent numerous apology texts
to him instead.
No response.
All of my calls were also forwarded to voicemail.
According to the calendar on my phone, we had a family brunch scheduled
for today. I should shower and dress but would rather wait until Ajax left
my room.
“How are you feeling, Rave?”
I looked up to find Ajax strolling down the stairs. He was freshly showered,
and his hair was still damp. Ajax appeared calm and collected in blue jeans
and a casual black T-shirt. Not a worry in the world.
Of course, he was going to pretend like everything was normal.
My eyes returned to my phone. “Just... recovering from brain damage,” I
mumbled.
“Brain damage?” Ajax chuckled. “Aren’t we being slightly melodramatic?
A concussion is a brain injury at best.”
Instead of arguing over semantics, I asked the question that had been on the
tip of my tongue since we were found out together. “Did you orchestrate the
whole thing so our families would catch us together?” I asked
straightforwardly.
Surely, even Ajax wouldn’t stoop low enough to allow my religious father
to catch us naked. There had to be some decency left in him.
“You have a vivid imagination,” Ajax replied dryly.
It wasn’t a yes or a no.
Ajax’s actions before we got caught were despicable. He wanted to believe
that my physical reaction was consent. Fine. We had sex plenty of times. I
could pretend it was one of those times when we had a consensual
relationship and chalk it off to charity.
The look on my religious father’s face—who still believed me to be a virgin
—left me humiliated, but okay, I could deal with that, too. The physical
pain and limited mobility since falling were more than challenging, but
whatever.
The only thing I couldn't get past was what the moment did to Reid.
“Whatever. Where’s Reid? I have looked all over the house for him.”
Ajax’s earlier lighthearted demeanor immediately vanished. “You should
get dressed for brunch,” he suggested stoically. “Don’t worry about Reid.”
Ignoring his laissez-faire attitude, I pressed, “Did he come by to see me
after I fell?”
“Yes. He came by to see you while you were unconscious.”
“Well, I’d like to see him post-unconsciousness.”
“Who’s stopping you?” Ajax sneered.
“I can’t find him anywhere.”
Ajax shrugged as if it was the least of his concerns.
With a deep breath, I stared at his face, which gave nothing away. Putting
away our differences, I spoke with resignation. “Ajax, I need to have a word
with Reid. Will you please help me find him?"
Ajax sighed. “Reid left the house and never came back. We don’t know
where he went.”
My eyes snapped wide open. On cue, Ajax scooted closer to sit next to me.
When he spoke again, his tone lacked its earlier patronization. “Reid will be
just fine. He’s a big boy; you don’t have to worry about him.”
“Has anyone spoken to him?”
“No, but we’ve all called and texted him,” he explained. “Reid just needs
some space.”
“Ajax,” I said softly, “Reid has a pattern of drinking himself half to death.
Do you remember the time Reid and I got into a fight? He drank so much
that we found him passed out on the street. What if he does something
equally stupid? Have you considered that?”
“I have,” Ajax admitted. “I called everyone we know to see if they’ve heard
from him. I sent someone to his dorm to check if he was there. There’s only
so much I can do.”
“You can tell him we’re not together.” My eyes lit up with hope. “Reid is
upset because he doesn’t want us together. We can tell everyone we played
a bad prank. Everyone can text Reid to tell him what he saw wasn’t true—”
“I’m not going to do that,” he cut me off coolly.
The momentary sympathy Ajax exercised was already in the rearview
mirror. A flash of anger crossed his face. He reached for my arm, slowly
flexing his fingers into my flesh until I took a sharp inhale.
“And while we are on the subject, we have some things to discuss. Exactly
how long have you known about Reid’s feelings for you?”
I stopped short, realizing Ajax knew the secret I had been harboring. It was
the minor detail I planned to share on the day we reunited. In the end, I had
lost my nerve.
“Did you sleep with him?” Ajax managed to spit out, eyes darkening past
recognition. Ajax glared at me with rage. Madness. A storm that was about
to obliterate everything in its path.
“W-What?” I stuttered, unable to help myself. Fear suddenly took
precedence, rendering me unable to deny the allegations.
When I didn’t say more, Ajax’s eyes reflected the same murderous rage as
his tone. “Remember what I told you once? I’ll kill any fucker who touches
you. Do you want me to murder my brother?” Ajax spoke the words evenly
and without an ounce of emotion.
I had been paying attention since my return. Ajax was the same but also
starkly different. Though he remained polite, he had become
unapproachable, disengaged, and dismissive. Ajax always had a master
poker face, but he wasn’t masking his feelings anymore. I feared he had
none left. He was genuinely devoid of emotions.
They said psychopaths were born, but sociopaths were made. Ajax’s lack of
empathy, volatility, and impulsive tendencies wasn’t inherent, pointing
toward sociopathic behavior. However, his sociopathic tendencies surpassed
typical impulsivity. Ajax was unpredictable in an entirely new and
dangerous way.
“M-Ajax, I s-s-swear,” I stuttered again. “We didn’t sleep together. I swear
it on Mia.”
His face visibly relaxed for a millisecond before hardening once more.
“Whatever was between you two, it’s over,” he declared flatly. “You are not
to see him anymore.”
“That’s not possible. You know—”
Grabbing both of my arms, he shook me violently. “Do not fucking argue
with me over this!”
I would have jumped in place, except his hold didn’t allow me to go far.
Ajax’s voice was trembling as if he had no more control left. He was
unhinged. Now that he knew about Reid, any restraint he might have
previously exercised was gone.
So, I didn't bother pressing the matter, and Ajax took my silence as a
concession.
Meanwhile, I eyed the staircase. “I should shower and change before
brunch starts,” I acknowledged his previous suggestion to change the topic.
Luckily, Ajax took the bait. His eyes searched mine, finally giving me a
curt nod. I remained perfectly still as he planted a soft kiss on my forehead.
Stunned by our exchange, I limped upstairs without looking back. As soon
as I stepped inside my room, I swapped my clothes out for a bathrobe.
While the tub filled with hot water, I sat at the edge of my bed and typed an
email addressed to Reid. Texts and calls were futile at this instant.
I had been so engrossed in the task I didn’t realize how much time had
passed, nor did I discern Ajax’s looming presence. At the first sign of a
shadow lurking over me, I stopped typing. Quickly, I hit the lock button on
my phone, but it was too late. His eyes were already on the screen.
“Everyone is downstairs now,” Ajax informed rigidly. “Your mom wants to
know if they should wait for you to start brunch.”
“No,” I answered in a small voice, my eyes downcast. “They can start
eating without me. I’ll be down shortly.”
Ajax made no effort to move. I observed his agitated body language, along
with the visibly stiff stance. Neither of us spoke, leaving the room thick
with tension.
Unexpectedly, Ajax leaned over to grab the phone out of my hand.
“Dude, what are you doing?” I yelped.
Ajax didn’t respond.
At least he didn’t know my passcode and couldn’t unlock the phone to read
the email. I swiftly discovered that wasn’t Ajax's intention. Walking over to
the window with my phone in hand, Ajax opened it to let in the chilly
winter air and nonchalantly threw it out of the second-story window.
What.
The.
Fuck.
While I was clueless about how to process his outrageous actions, I was
knowledgeable enough to know when to cut my losses. Aware this was
about to escalate, I hobbled to the bathroom, as it was closer than my
bedroom door.
Ajax closed the window and charged me before I could lock the bathroom
door. He pushed his way in and picked me up by the waist. I tried but failed
to shriek. Ajax held me up by one arm and slammed the door behind him
before turning off the bathtub faucet. He spun me around and restrained me
against the wall.
“I thought I had made myself clear,” he spat venom through his clenched
teeth.
Panic engulfed me, and I shook with dread. I had fought with Ajax before
but was never speechless during our argument. I couldn’t utter a word,
despite the strenuous effort I exercised. My neck broke out in a sweat, with
ragged breaths coming out in spurts.
What the fuck was happening to me? Was this another side effect of the
concussion?
A slight frown formed on Ajax’s forehead as my heaving registered with
him. He rubbed the sides of my body with both hands.
“Hey, it’s okay.” His tone changed instantaneously. “I didn’t mean to upset
you, Rave, but… you just can’t talk to him anymore, okay?” With a hand
wrapped around my middle, his other stroked my hair. “You don’t need
him. You have me.”
Tears stung my eyes as my response died down in my throat. My breathing
wouldn’t normalize, and I was convinced something worse was about to
happen.
“It’s okay, baby. I’m not going to hurt you,” Ajax assured, having guessed
my thoughts. “Just talk to me.”
Bewildered, I involuntarily hiccupped, drawing in more tattered breaths.
As the minutes passed, Ajax spoke again, adding a more comforting quality
to his tone. “Don’t be scared, Rave. Talk to me. Has this happened before?”
For a moment, I thought Ajax might snap at my prolonged silence. Last I
saw him, Ajax’s impatience was prominent. However, he only stroked my
hair, uncomplaining of my lack of responses. Ajax repeatedly kissed my
temple, soothing my inflamed nerves. I didn’t fight his touch, grateful he
didn’t appear violent, angry, or threatening.
“I’m right here,” he added. “Not going anywhere.”
Shockingly, I was glad for his reassurance. This had never happened to me.
I had no idea how to deal, and Ajax knew a thing or two about anxiety.
“Just breathe,” he instructed. “Take all the time you need. There’s no rush.”
I followed his instructions until my breaths evened out. Before, I used to be
the one to calm him down. When had our roles reversed?
“Ajax, what is happening to me?” I managed to croak at long last.
He blew out a sigh of relief upon hearing me speak. “Nothing, you’re
okay,” he reassured. “Take another deep breath.”
Every time I took a breath, I inhaled Ajax’s musky scent. He smelled like
an anti-anxiety medication with one breath and horror with the next. Ajax
patiently calmed my heart rate, telling me to take deep breaths. With each
mollifying word, the trembling eventually subsided, oxygen pouring freely
into my lungs.
“Feel better?” he asked huskily.
I managed to nod. My hold on him tightened, grappling for an anchor to
keep me grounded against whatever the fuck was happening. Ajax didn’t
budge, either.
“Don’t worry,” he whispered. “Not going to leave you.” Ajax dropped
feather-light kisses over my face while I stood complacent in his hold, with
my mind in disarray. “Just let me kiss you, okay?” Keeping me in his tight
embrace, Ajax tilted his face at glacial speed until his lips met mine.
I was so relieved he wasn’t angry—and I could speak again—that I obliged
when his tongue invaded my mouth. Holding the side of my face firmly, he
stroked my tongue with his and groaned into my mouth. Mentally
exhausted, I absentmindedly responded, eyes open. Blank.
I barely discerned when he slowly undid the knot holding my robe together.
He roughly tugged at it to part the robe in the middle, freeing my breasts.
My fingers dug into his chest as he kissed down the column of my neck.
In between kisses, Ajax continued to comfort my lingering panic. “It’s
okay, baby,” he repeated over and over.
By the time his hand trailed my skin and reached between my thighs, my
brain was officially out of power. Evidence of my arousal smeared his
fingers when Ajax dipped into my core. I blindly hung onto his shirt while
he stroked me, his length hardening against my thigh and rubbing
relentlessly.
“Fuck, Rave. You’re soaked, and I’ve barely touched you,” he said hoarsely
as his fingers ground against my trembling clit.
Arousal from panic was another shock to be digested, but I couldn’t focus
on it. I didn’t want Ajax to retreat into fury, and anything was better than
what I had just experienced.
“You’re drenched,” he hissed agonizingly and mapped my slit with the
wetness before sliding two fingers inside me. “I can feel your sweet little
pussy pulsing.”
Why was he saying these things? He used to barely speak during intimate
moments.
I gasped when Ajax moved his fingers, muscles contracting at the sensation.
“Oh, God.”
With his other hand combing through my hair, Ajax pumped two fingers in
and out of me. “Baby, you’re close,” he breathed.
He was right.
I looked down and caught myself unconsciously riding his fingers.
This was so wrong.
I stopped and opened my mouth to protest. To my horror, all that came out
was a low moan. Ajax shook at the sound as if hanging on by a thread.
“Not like this. I want you to come on my cock.” He pulled his fingers out of
me. I hadn’t noticed Ajax had undone his belt and pants. When?
He urgently grabbed the back of my thighs and maneuvered me up, pushing
me against the wall once more. He grunted when the hard length prodding
at my opening was met with minimal resistance. Ajax sheathed himself
deep inside me, pushing his hips forward and lodging himself to the hilt. I
bit my bottom lip at the painful ache, feeling too full of him.
Ajax shut his eyes, shuddering. “Fuck, you feel good.”
My muscles clenched around his cock as Ajax paced his thrusts, balls
slapping against me as my ass whacked against the bathroom wall. In my
enraptured state, the remaining panic was far gone. I barely stifled my
moans but could no longer do so when Ajax’s mouth landed on one of my
nipples. Lowering his face, his wet mouth sucked hard. His hand roamed
my bare chest and squeezed my breast, making me gasp. The damp flesh on
my chest glistened from his efforts, and I jolted when Ajax drank and
lapped with a never-ending desire.
“God, your pussy is fucking tight. Feels so good wrapped around me.
Fuck.”
His guttural words only made me wetter. I was stimulated beyond belief as
his hips flexed. I writhed as he went deeper, feeling him throb inside me.
Ajax leaned back, eyes gleaming. “Come on my cock, baby. I need to feel
you come. Need to feel you’re mine,” he said with another thrust.
My body let go before my mind did. “God,” I dug my nails into his
shoulders, reverberating in his hold, lost in the sea of lust. The descent of
my climax was followed by his as warm cum ran down my thighs, and
Ajax’s roar reached my ears.
By the time Ajax pulled out, I couldn’t meet his eyes.
What the fuck just happened?
Ajax managed to talk me down from panic to arousal to completion, all in
the same breath. To wrap my mind around it was an impossible task.
Instead of placing me on my feet, Ajax carried me to the tub and lowered
me into the hot water. Stroking my hair, he asked, “Do you want me to
stay?”
Finally able to look at him, I stared in disbelief and gave my head a shake.
“Okay, come downstairs after you’re done,” he said softly. With a final kiss
on my temple, Ajax strode out of the bathroom, shutting the door firmly
behind. In turn, I took a few cleansing breaths as I retreated inside my head
to my safe space.
In the end, the villain who caused the anxiety was also the one to alleviate
the fear. It was ironic in every way.
While soaking in that tub, my determination to change my situation
returned in full force. Having finally snapped out of the shock, I made my
way downstairs.
Thankfully, the brunch itself was a welcome distraction from my internal
turmoil. The food was delicious, and our dads told stories from their
childhood. Their banter and teasing brought nostalgia for my childhood
with the Sinclair siblings.
At some point, my parents reiterated their blessing about Ajax and me being
an official couple. I was cornered in front of a room full of people. Our
families caught us in a precarious position. This wasn’t something I could
come back from, especially with Ajax’s declarations of love. As I’d
realized, Ajax was a lunatic I’d never be rid of.
Even a restraining order was useless. I couldn’t enforce a restraining order
without calling the cops. I’d never press charges or put the Sinclairs through
the misery of finding their golden boy in jail.
I had to leave my life behind to get away from him.
So, I had to approach this with caution. There was no point in convincing
our families of our relationship status or asking Ajax to tell them the truth.
Once I figured out how to get out of this situation, I’d privately set the
record straight with each family member.
Over the years, I had remained close to all the Sinclairs. Mia used to spend
all her vacations with me. Uncle Reese and Tessa joined me at times. The
entire family, sans Ajax, came to Paris to celebrate Reid’s and my twentyfirst birthday last year.
However, one year, Ajax banned the family from seeing me. Everyone
chalked it up to us having a falling out. Ajax’s dictate came off as almost a
call for allegiance. Even Uncle Reese didn’t question the ludicrous “ban on
Raven” because he would have come off as ungrateful if he’d argued.
Since his business took off, Ajax took over the larger bills so Uncle Reese
could move back home from the Cayman Islands. It allowed Uncle Reese to
work part-time only at a private clinic and dedicate more time to his ignored
daughter and depressed wife.
It sliced my heart open, but I refused to put the family in an awkward
position by asking them to go against Ajax’s wishes. I understood their
length of gratitude toward him.
Mia was the only Sinclair who fought to see me and overthrew Ajax’s ban.
Her stubborn, sassy ass went toe to toe with him until he conceded.
Ajax’s business has been thriving over the last few years. Due to his
schedule, Mia was often left alone at home during her school vacations.
Despite Uncle Reese’s presence, Ajax realized the negative toll of exposing
an on-and-off depressed Tessa to Mia around the clock. I was the only other
adult he trusted with Mia’s welfare, so he finally gave in.
At least he was on his best behavior during brunch. Everyone seemed
relatively content as well. Even Tessa was happy. After all these years,
seeing her this way was refreshing. Her on-and-off battle with depression
had been a two-decade-old fight, but the recent treatment had done wonders
for her.
My parents were also in the same happy boat. After an hour of drinking,
Dad declared we needed music to turn this brunch into a dance party. Dad
cleared out a portion of the dining room, set up the Bluetooth speaker, and
grabbed my mother for a dance. Mia and I giggled at his horrible dance
moves and unsuccessful attempts to keep up with Mom.
Despite Reid’s absence, I was surprised at this renewed sense of belonging
and spent the remaining afternoon cramming in quality family time. Soon, I
wandered into the kitchen, looking for a clean glass. I had merely opened
the cabinet when I heard hysterical screaming from the dining room.
“What the fuck.”
I turned toward the sound, limping my way back, only to find Tessa
surrounded by a herd. My parents were distressed by the scene while Uncle
Reese calmly took charge.
I exchanged a quick look with Ajax and Mia, sharing an unspoken
understanding.
None of our other drama mattered right now. Not Ajax’s lust-crazed
sociopathic behavior. Not my strange panic from earlier. Not even the
devastated, missing Sinclair.
The only thing that mattered was this scene in front of us before this family
imploded.
1 week later.
Raven.
An incident occurred that altered my dynamics with Ajax.
A week ago, Tessa had a seizure during brunch, a side effect of her new
anti-depressant pills. Since then, she has refused to take her medications.
After one particularly grueling session with Tessa, the rest of us indulged in
a lot of commiserating alcohol.
Of course, Ajax took advantage of the situation.
The fucked-up part?
I went along after a few shots, only to experience a full-on night terror. My
reactions afterward left Ajax in shock, and a change has taken place in him
since. Ajax had only focused on Tessa-related issues, careful not to touch
me. I would’ve considered it a fluke, but he had kept his hands to himself
for the entire week, the longest he had gone while around me.
For too long, Ajax had been the nightmare I couldn’t shake. Though doubt
would always remain on the back burner, there was suddenly hope for a
brighter future. We had no choice but to live together, and as the only two
people proactive with Tessa’s care, we worked in close quarters. Since Ajax
backed off, what began as a shared objective over Tessa’s health concerns
and other household-related responsibilities had morphed into a
camaraderie of sorts.
While I was glad about our altered status quo, those weird night terrors still
exercised their visitation rights. As a result, I couldn't sleep through the
night any longer. So, I used the time productively by making breakfast for
the family every morning. Besides Ajax and Tessa, no one in this household
knew how to cook, myself included. Breakfast was the only meal I could
prepare—simple toast, fruits, yogurt, cereal—with my limited cooking
skills.
Except, breakfast was called brunch today because it was the weekend, and
we were serving alcohol. I had lined up two jugs of orange juice with
bottles of cheap champagne.
Hallelujah.
As I set the table, I found Ajax’s business partners—Brandon, Jaci, and
Alexa—charging toward me. They recently moved into the split level as
their office building had shut down with everything going on. They needed
all hands on deck to work around the clock without their in-house staff, and
it was challenging to do so if they weren’t physically together. Ajax already
used the split-level as his home office. It was also set up as a private
apartment. Those three practically lived in the split-level back in the day,
and they were close to the whole family, so it made sense for them to move
in.
“Hi, Ms. Parisian, fancy pants!” exclaimed Alexa.
“Good Morning.” I smiled at her. “How are you?”
“Good.”
Ajax joined us mid-conversation. He was in blue jeans and a white shirt
today. Even his casual clothes were expensive ensembles, a get-up that had
Alexa checking him out slyly. I couldn’t blame the girl. It was a normal
reaction where Ajax was concerned. His physical attributes were hard to
deny. At twenty-five, he looked more like a walking sex god than he did at
twenty-one. People stared whenever he walked into a room. His tall,
sculpted body was commanding, especially with the ladies.
“Good morning.” Alexa was the first to greet him.
Ajax gave her a brief nod before turning to me. “Morning, Rave.” He
pecked me on the cheek, the type of exchange we used to share back in the
day.
“Morning,” I responded as Ajax acknowledged his friends.
“So, Rave,” Jaci drawled, “what’s on your agenda now that you’re back in
New York?”
“Nothing much. I’ve been doing an internship for a family friend, Karen.”
“Karen?” Brandon frowned. “Isn’t Karen a bloodhound? I heard she doesn’t
pay interns.”
Ajax gave me a pointed look at the comment. “I know.” I surrendered with
one hand up. “But I just wanted the experience.”
“Why?” Alexa tilted her face. “You’re fucking brilliant. You were what,
sixteen or seventeen when your first dress was featured in a fashion show?”
“I was seventeen, but it only happened because the lead designer gave birth
to me.” I pointed at Mom, whose silhouette was barely visible from where
we were standing. She was browsing through magazines in the living room.
“That’s not why,” Ajax chimed in. “Theressa wouldn't have featured it on
her first show unless she knew the design would hit it out of the park.”
Brandon took me in a one-handed hug. He laughed and chided me at the
same time. “God, Rave. You haven’t changed. You are brilliant, dude. Stop
working for that vampire, Karen, before she sucks out your soul. Start your
own line.”
“I might do that one day.” I smiled politely at Brandon, silently begging
him to let go.
We needed peace in this house, and I had no interest in inciting chaos with
everything else going on. Things had been civil between us since Ajax
hadn’t acted on his impulses. Those efforts sparked this new tranquility
between us, but I didn’t have to look up to feel Ajax’s raging eyes on us, his
lighthearted mood dissipating.
As if on cue, Ajax spoke, “Let’s go to the kitchen. I’ll help you bring
everything to the table.”
He nudged me with a hand on my lower back, and Brandon’s arm fell off
my shoulders. Ajax was so smooth during the transaction that no one else
noticed it.
Alexa followed us. “You should start your own business. Sell custom
clothing. I have friends who regularly shell out hundreds of dollars for
custom-made outfits.”
I turned to find Brandon walking into the kitchen with us as well. “That's a
great idea. Plus, this one”—he pointed his thumb at Alexa—“has bougie
friends with a lot of money to spare. She can give you intros.”
Alexa gave out an exasperated sigh. “I’ll do way more than that,” she
huffed. “I’ll front you the money if you want to start a business. You have
no idea how good you are. Do you remember the dress you made me for my
dad’s fiftieth birthday?”
I did. I was only sixteen when Alexa begged me to make her a custom-made
dress for her father’s party.
“I ended up selling that dress for three hundred dollars. You can make ten to
twelve dresses a month and pull in thousands. I can link you up with my
girls, who like custom clothes. You should start a Shopify site.”
“Whoa! Hold up, Sparky. You’re going a million miles an hour." I was
baffled, first by her sudden offer to help and also by the information dump.
"Where’s all this coming from?”
“Sorry,” Alexa laughed. “It’s the entrepreneurs in us. We can’t help
ourselves. We hate watching talent be stifled by working for someone else.”
“Alexa, talented people work for you. Are your talented staff being stifled?”
“Yes.” all three of them replied in unison.
“You guys are ridiculous.” I shook my head as they told me stories from
their work.
Ajax and his partners created a finance app. The app rounded up change if
you linked it to your charge card and invested the difference into stocks.
While the rest stayed rooted in New York, Ajax traveled to promote the app
to investment bankers.
My bond with them had been rekindled since they moved in, though I
couldn’t help noticing Brandon’s endless flirtation, throwing a friendly arm
around my shoulders here and there. When we saw each other last, Brandon
never showed interest in me, and I doubted those feelings had changed. I
wouldn’t care to reflect on his intentions, were his actions not causing
friction. Ajax’s glare remained steadfast on Brandon, and twice, he casually
removed Brandon’s hand from me. Brandon pretended not to notice the
jabs. He was a good-looking man, a charmer with the ladies. I doubted he
was this oblivious. Whatever his reasons, thankfully, it didn’t sour the mood
or prevent getting reacquainted with old friends.
When the remaining Sinclair clan congregated downstairs, Ajax grabbed
the cereal boxes, and Alexa grabbed the toast to take to the dining room.
While I cut up fresh fruit, Brandon stayed put, casually leaning against the
kitchen counter.
“I hope Alexa didn’t overwhelm you," he said slowly. "We’re just
passionate entrepreneurs.”
“Oh.” I waved it off. “Not at all. It was sweet of her to offer, but I don’t
think I’m in the headspace to start my line right now. I wouldn’t know
where to begin.”
Brandon grabbed a jug of orange juice and pulled out two glasses.
Uncorking one of the champagne bottles while barely making a pop, he
poured it into two champagne flutes. Brandon handed me a mimosa, and we
raised our glasses in cheers.
“That’s how we felt when the five… sorry, four,” he corrected himself, “of
us started. We didn’t know where to begin. We were just a bunch of kids but
look at us now.”
“Pray, tell. What’s this sudden interest in getting me to start a business?”
He shrugged. “All of us do micro-investments and prefer niche startups. We
like investing in products that interest us, and Alexa likes fashion. She
asked me to butter you up as she refuses to miss the opportunity to invest in
you while you still suffer from low self-esteem and have no idea how
talented you are. This way, she can lowball you to take a larger stake.”
I laughed. Brandon was adamant about making a business deal before
breakfast, though I had no idea why Alexa was interested in going into
business with me. “What stake? I haven’t done anything.”
“You will. And if you hire beautiful junior designers and models, maybe I’ll
invest, too. I’ll do it for a smaller stake in exchange for the freedom of
coming to your work to gawk.”
“Oh, my God.” I punched his shoulder. “You’re ridiculous. Maybe I’ll also
hire hot male models, so Alexa gives up her shares in the business.”
“I don’t think Alexa will be so generous. She only has eyes for Ajax.”
My eyes flipped up to meet Brandon’s. “Still?”
“Heart wants what it wants.” He lifted a shoulder casually. Brandon
watched me closely as if assessing my reaction to this news.
“Wow.” I couldn’t help but marvel. “Whatever happened between them?”
Brandon blew out a long breath. His expression remained curious over my
inquiry. “Alexa said they were friends with benefits for a while, but Ajax
lost interest in sex. She couldn’t entice him into it, and the more Ajax
moved on, the more she pined after him.”
Ajax lost interest in sex!?
“If she’s been stuck on him for so long, there has to be a little bit more to it
than that,” I gently pressed, genuinely curious about this topic.
Brandon’s megawatt smile graced the room. “I guess the same could be said
about him. He has been stuck on you for years. Is there more to that story?”
I whipped my head, unable to hide the surprise. I never took Brandon as the
man in tune with other people's emotions.
“Don’t look so surprised that I notice things.” He laughed cheekily at my
astonished face. When I didn’t respond, Brandon’s voice lost some of its
previous amusement, changing to compassion. I knew at that moment Ajax
had a good friend in Brandon. “He’s been pining over you for years.”
“Pining?” I emphasized. “Ajax doesn’t pine. That’s a dramatic choice of
word.”
“I don’t think my word choice is dramatic enough,” he replied tightly. “He
kicked Asher out of our company just for kissing you. Asher worked his
butt off. None of us wanted him gone, but Ajax’s the majority owner. He
twisted our arms into it without giving us a reason. The girls never found
out why, but I saw Ajax at that party. I knew how it was going to end for
Asher. He also threatened to kick us out if we didn’t back him.”
I lowered my eyes, remembering the night of Ajax’s twenty-first birthday
party and how he beat Asher up. “I'm sorry. I know Ash is a good friend of
yours.”
“Asher landed on his feet. The point of the story is I’ve only seen Ajax lose
his shit over you. He didn’t disclose what happened between you two, but
I’m guessing it was bad, considering how he changed. He used to be a
happy-go-lucky guy. Now he broods so much he might as well be a fucking
serial killer.”
I cracked a smile. Mia also commented on Ajax’s detached nature over the
years. “Losing your shit isn’t an indication of a healthy relationship,” I
pointed out.
“Sure, but it’s fun for me to watch.” Brandon’s tone returned to its usual
light-hearted self. “Do you notice how he keeps shoving my hands off you
whenever I touch you?”
My mouth dropped open. “You ass. I knew you were flirting with me on
purpose. Stop riling him up.”
“I can’t help myself.” Brandon laughed from deep within his chest.
“Whenever I put my hands around your shoulders, all the veins on Ajax’s
forehead pop. He’s never been a reactive person, even before all his fucking
broodings started. This is fun.”
I shook my head at Brandon, nursing my mimosa. I had set the glass on the
kitchen counter when Mia joined us.
“Hello, Mia,” Brandon greeted her with a big smile.
“Hey.” She gave him a tight smile in return before hugging me. Since
Tessa’s ordeal, Mia hadn’t been her usual bubbly self.
“How are you?” Brandon asked her kindly without any of his playfulness.
Mia gave him a nod to indicate she was okay.
I hated watching her in pain. Mia would forever be my baby sister, though
she was practically a grown woman now, and we had developed a closer
bond due to it.
After taking another sip of my mimosa, I passed the glass to Mia. She
looked in dire need of it, and I sometimes let her drink under my
supervision, just like Ajax used to with us.
Soon, Ajax and the girls returned to the kitchen. His gaze landed on Mia
and the mimosa she was holding. “Who gave you that?”
Mia didn’t rat me out, but her eyes flickered at me for a second too long. I
shrugged when Ajax gave me a questioning look. “She told me she was
twenty-one.”
Everyone fell into a fit of laughter. Even Ajax smiled. “Is this what you let
my baby sister do when I send her to Paris?”
“Well, I usually offer her heroin because alcohol has too many empty
calories.” We were graced with another round of laughter and an
exasperated eye roll from Ajax.
“I’m glad you consider her dietary needs,” he retorted dryly.
“Mia prefers sticking to cocaine, which is better for suppressing your
appetite. Plus, she doesn’t like needle marks. Kids nowadays,” I huffed at
Mia dramatically.
Mia grinned, landing on the same wavelength as me. It was a game we used
to play to tease Ajax. “Needle marks aren’t sexy for all the Tinder hookups
and one-night stands Raven lets me have.”
“Ugh.” Ajax ran a hand over his face.
“But don’t worry. Raven took me to a Parisian brothel to be properly trained
in the art of seduction. They said I was talented enough to be a courtesan.”
Mia flipped her hair.
I sighed. “Alas, she didn’t make the cut. She failed the drug test because,
you know… the cocaine.”
“Are you two done?” Ajax asked, looking unamused.
“But you'll be proud to know she has a callback for next year.” I nodded
firmly.
“You’re both grounded. Go to your rooms.”
The laughter continued as we teased Ajax further. Eventually, everyone left
the kitchen, carrying various items to the dining table.
Alexa was the only one to linger behind. “So, did Brandon talk to you yet?”
After Brandon’s input, I was unsure how to take Alexa’s interest in starting
a business with me. Mainly since word about Ajax and me had spread.
“He did. And you’re positive about this?” I inquired.
“Of course. Didn’t Brandon tell you how I'm a ruthless businesswoman
who'll negotiate a larger stake, leaving you with only scraps?”
I burst out laughing. “Well, at least you’re honest about ripping me off.”
Alexa leaned in to bump my shoulder gently. “Call me the honest business
mafia.”
Truthfully, I would love to work with Alexa. She was genuine and had
always been a friend. So, I turned to Alexa and took a leap of faith. “You
know what, Alexa? This sounds like a brilliant idea.”
We planned to collaborate later as we made our way to the dining room. I
realized just how many things I had missed as Ajax wordlessly brought
random items from the kitchen to complete the setup on the table.
“Teamwork,” I heard someone giggle. My mother.
Sidetracked by Tessa’s ordeal, we had swept the topic of Ajax and me under
the rug for the time being. While my father still had concerns, Mom was
beyond thrilled about the idea. She loved Ajax.
Ignoring Mom, I sat beside Mia, who poked at her yogurt with a spoon
absentmindedly. Out of the corner of my eye, I found Ajax starting toward
the empty chair on my other side. However, Brandon plopped down on it
first, halting Ajax in his tracks.
“Hello again, Rave.” I didn’t miss the delight in Brandon’s voice or the shiteating grin plastered on his face. He tilted his head toward Mia. “So, Mia.
Did you send in your college applications?”
“Not yet.” Mia sighed.
“I already sent in the applications for your top three picks, Mia," I
informed. She had been distracted as of late, and I didn't want her to miss
the deadline.
Our chitchat was cut short by the screeching of a chair dragged along the
wooden floor. Ajax placed the chair in the space between Brandon and me.
He plopped down on it and casually pulled the placemat with Brandon’s
place setting until the flatware and glassware sat in front of him.
I rolled my eyes.
Despite the male-testosterone-filled vibe, Ajax eventually let go of his ego
battle once our parents settled into their seats. However, two people noticed
the odd exchange.
Alexa looked between Ajax and me.
And Mia appeared frozen in place as she stared blankly at Ajax.
Over the next week, Alexa and I kept an ongoing dialogue about
our new partnership, working diligently on the details. I was determined to
change my remaining days in this house with three goals in mind.
To work hard on this new business opportunity with Alexa. Maybe save up
enough to get a place for my parents and me.
To temporarily put Reid out of my mind. My parents were broke, Tessa was
suffering, and my family needed me. I had to stay focused on them.
Finally, to compartmentalize away everything that had happened with Ajax,
so we could have a civil relationship while living together.
Ajax didn't make it easy though.
He walked into my room and, without saying hello, barked an order at me,
“We’re going out." When I didn’t immediately respond, Ajax followed up
with, “Dad said we need to increase your stamina. You’ve rested it enough.
Time to see how it's doing. Let's go.”
I had been limping around on my bad leg, the healing process moving
frustratingly slow. Although it hadn't impacted my hearing or my manners.
“Hello, Raven. How are you? Would you like to go on a walk?” I reworded
his suggestion to insert manners into his previous request.
Ajax grinned. “Hello, Raven,” he mimicked with a crooked smile.
“Oh. Hi, Ajax. I didn’t see you there,” I played along.
“How are you this fine afternoon?”
“I'm excellent. Thank you for asking. How about yourself?”
“I'm fine, too," Ajax said mildly, entertaining me. He nonchalantly plopped
down on my bed and grabbed one of my pillows to hug it.
Everyone commented how the years of traveling had made Ajax detached,
but lately, I had noticed he was mellow, which was highly refreshing.
Ajax peeked into my drawing book and pointed at my sketch. “What’s
that?”
I sat cross-legged on the bed with my sketchbook in front of me. I looked
down at the design I had been working on. “I don’t want to bore you.”
“I'm not bored. I asked because I find your work interesting.”
“I’ve always wanted to make a reversible dress. I don’t know how to go
about it. Each side must be comfortable enough to feel good on the skin but
also glamorous enough to wear out.”
Ajax chuckled. “So, sort of like you?”
“What do you mean?”
“What do you mean by what do I mean? You’re glamorous and
comfortable. You wear red bottom heels and Theressa Beckett Specials.
Then you come home and strip down to three-dollar shorts and two-dollar
tank tops,” Ajax jested, pulling at the strap of my tank top.
“My tank top cost five dollars, thank you very much,” I deadpanned.
Ajax laughed again, deep and genuine. My lips curved. I hadn’t heard his
genuine laughter in years. It was nostalgic, flooding my mind with
memories from my childhood.
“Okay, big spender. How will you afford to make that dress after spending
all five dollars on a tank top?”
“I plan to rob you while you sleep and then make a run for it.” I kept my
eyes trained on my sketchbook, but I couldn’t help the smirk breaking out.
“You mean you’re going to make a limp for it with that crippled leg of
yours?” Ajax poked at my leg.
We looked at each other, then burst out laughing. It wasn’t awkward, but a
belly-aching “haha” kind of laugh.
“I’ll slow you down before making a limp for it. Maybe I’ll knee you in the
nuts before I rob you.”
“Ouch.” Ajax grimaced, guarding his crotch. “Vile thoughts from such a
respectable young lady.”
“I'm no lady. I'm depraved.”
“No, you’re cute.”
“Shut up,” I quipped.
He quirked an eyebrow. “Okay, vigilante. If you’re done with your crime
spree, would you be so kind as to escort me on a walk? We can also get
something to eat.”
I shrugged. “Sure, since you asked so nicely.” Ajax looked at me
quizzically as if my answer were unexpected. “What?”
“This is the first time you so easily agreed to do anything with me.”
“You said something about food. I'm hungry.”
“Hmm.” Ajax cocked his head as if contemplating. “Guess I can feed you
this once, but don't get used to it. I don’t want you to get too comfortable.”
My brow shot up to my forehead. “Tell me you'll at least spend five dollars
on a meal for me.”
“I can’t afford all five dollars, but I’ll let you order from the dollar menu.”
“I don’t deserve such extravagance.”
“Nothing but the best for you. I'm going to grab my hoodie. Be right back.”
He abruptly reached over to give me a peck on the cheek.
I stared after Ajax, who was humming while walking out of the room. He
was chipper. Sweet. He was being fun and funny. These were characteristics
he hadn’t displayed in years by everyone’s account.
Whatever the hell happened to this man?
Was that my influence? If our paths never crossed, could Ajax have
continued to be this person without the darkness consuming him?
I turned to a new page in my sketchbook and started drawing Ajax. I
wanted a record of the man I just saw. It had been so long since I saw this
side of him.
I worked quickly to preserve him before he morphed into the other man I
didn’t recognize.
Ajax.
“I don’t understand. Where are we?” Raven looked around in astonishment.
“We’re at my condo.” I gestured toward the spacious living room.
Raven spun in the middle of the room to take inventory of my apartment,
giving nothing away with her expressions. Did she like it?
Maybe I should have made this place more presentable.
Shoving my hands into my pockets, I nervously watched her walk through
the living room and onto the terrace. Having a terrace in New York was a
luxury. This condo had a large one overlooking the city, but my place was
nothing fancy short of the excellent view, high-end building, and location. I
traveled a lot for work, seldom returning to New York. When I did, my
parents and Mia insisted I stay with them. So, I never decorated this place.
However, I did come here earlier to set something up.
As Raven walked onto the terrace, her gaze landed on the arrangement in
front. There was a table with dinner set for two.
“Do you remember that fusion restaurant we went to when you were
younger?”
Raven scrunched her face. “Vaguely. We went to lots of restaurants when I
was younger.”
“You waited for months for a reservation to this particular restaurant. You
wanted to try all the desserts because a world-renowned pastry chef was
making a guest appearance, but the wait time for dessert was ridiculous.
Mia, Reid, and I were not in the mood to wait, so we left. You looked like
you were ready to kill us.”
“I remember,” Raven smiled sadly at the distant memory. “I was so
annoyed at you guys. I still can’t believe you wouldn’t wait ten minutes for
dessert.”
I laughed at Raven’s version of the story. “Umm… I think you remember it
incorrectly. It was more like a forty-five-minute wait for dessert.”
“Whatever.” Raven rolled her eyes but finally cracked a smile.
“Well, we have a meal made of desserts prepared by the same pastry chef.”
“What?” Raven blinked.
“The chef from that restaurant lives in New York now. I contacted him and
asked if he would prepare some pastries for us. I had someone pick up the
desserts and drop them off.”
Her head moved back and forth between the table and me, seeming
confused. “What are we really doing here, Ajax?” she asked quietly.
Instead of playing charades, I provided her with an honest answer. “We are
here to have an open discussion. I hoped you’d feel more comfortable
speaking if we were away from our family drama.”
Raven was often a little stuck in her head as a kid. Spacey. Dreamy.
Creative. However, an incident occurred the other night, causing Raven to
space entirely into an imaginary world.
It was the worst night of my life. It finally dawned on me how much my
actions were affecting her.
My craving for a physical relationship stemmed from my need to solidify
that Raven loved me. Our physical connection was tangible proof, but that
need of mine had the opposite effect on her. It made Raven believe I was a
monster out to hurt her.
“What would you like to talk about?” Raven’s voice remained
apprehensive.
“Rave, we have to live in close quarters for the time being, and after that
incident the other night, it’s clear things have to be different between us
moving forward.”
“How so?”
“I can make an effort to change—”
“You are the one who once told me humans are incapable of change,” she
interjected. “We’re nothing but a sum of our nature and nurture. We can
both admit the nurture aspect has failed us miserably.” Raven motioned her
hand between us. “As for nature, our neurotransmitters dictate our
personalities. These inherent biological factors make up our foundation. At
best, we can use medication and therapy to suppress what we truly are. So,
how can you change?”
I had once told Raven my theory about how people never changed. Not
only did she remember, but she was also using the argument against me. It
didn’t mean I’d back down.
“By your reasoning, I’m still the same person underneath. The person you
grew up with was the true version of my character.”
Raven opened her mouth, but I swiftly cut her off.
“Have you considered how I acted later in life wasn’t my true personality?
It was temporarily suppressed due to extenuating circumstances.” I
motioned my head toward her to indicate she was my extenuating
circumstance. "Since we are stuck together anyway, determine who I truly
am for yourself.” I fixed her with a firm look. “Meet me halfway. Why
work so hard to reject me? I snap every time I feel like you are slipping
away, and I already feel like I have no control around you—”
“But you do have control,” Raven argued. “You stopped. We hadn’t seen
each other in years. You didn’t come near me—”
“Only because I had hoped you’d come back to me,” I argued.
“If you have hope, why the hell did you pull the same shit?”
“I had hope.” I closed my eyes to calm the escalating anger pulsing through
my veins. “Past tense. When I found out about him, all hope vanished. You
agreed to be in a relationship with my fucking brother. How could you do
that, Rave?”
My words were laced with malice, halting Raven in place.
“You could’ve taken your revenge the way society and the law allowed,” I
growled. “You could have thrown me in jail or told our families. I would’ve
accepted either of those, but you did the one thing to cut me the deepest. So,
congrats Rave. You got back at me. Are we even? Now, will you meet me
halfway?”
Guilt flashed in Raven’s eyes for a change because she knew I was right. I
put my life on hold while she planned to move on with my brother. Raven
did the worst thing imaginable.
Did I believe it to be love between those two?
For Reid, yes.
For Raven, it was codependency, one that was the bane of my existence.
Reid could twist her arm into a relationship because she couldn’t risk losing
their friendship.
“Ajax,” she said quietly, “nothing happened with Reid. He wanted more,
and I promised to consider it. That’s all.”
My jaw shut tight at her renewed admission. Closing my eyes, I took a deep
breath to reel in my temper. “Doesn’t make it any better. I feel crazy
fucking possessive over you, Rave. I realize you don’t think I have the
right, yet that’s how it is. It was bad before you left; now, I can’t tolerate it.”
Raven appeared as if she had no idea how to react. I hadn’t even disclosed
my recurrent fantasy to tattoo MINE somewhere on her body, preferably her
forehead. She had no idea of the extent of my unhealthy obsession.
Looking down at her interlaced fingers, Raven said, “Look, my life came to
a standstill the day—” Her voice wavered before she dropped her gaze. “It
doesn’t matter. I wasn’t trying to increase your misery, Ajax. I only wanted
to move forward with my life. Reid gave me hope for happiness.”
“I can make you happy,” I countered quietly. “I understand if you need
more time to move forward. We can start slow. I’ll do whatever it takes—”
“I want you to help my parents,” Raven blurted.
Not exactly what I expected to hear.
“Okaaay,” I started unsurely. “What would you like me to do for them?”
“My parents are struggling, and they have nowhere to go. I need assurance
you’re not going to kick them out of the house, no matter how things go
between us.”
I didn’t miss a beat. “Done.”
As usual, leave it to Raven to ask for something on behalf of someone else.
I was aware of their financial challenges. Uncle John gave up his medical
license and moved to Paris. Soon after his move, Theressa’s business started
suffering. They finally declared bankruptcy and accepted Dad’s offer to
return to the USA. I didn’t bother disclosing I had already decided on
giving them a loan I didn’t expect back.
“Thank you.” Raven nodded in acknowledgment.
“I still have another question.”
“Sure,” she sighed.
“Do you hate me?”

Raven.
“Hate?” I contemplated the word as it rolled off my tongue. I might have
used the word hate when referring to Ajax, but I had never applied it. When
I loved, I loved unconditionally.
Although I wasn’t a people pleaser, I was a Sinclair pleaser. I had always
done everything in my power to make them happy. That's how things got so
out of control with Ajax.
Ajax gave me lectures on various topics, including sexual conduct—when a
woman said stop, a man had to stop. He emphasized there was no gray area
with consent and prefaced I should knee boys in the balls if they got handsy.
That’s why it was difficult to believe when Ajax started coercing me into
sex.
In the beginning, I thought Ajax had made a terrible mistake. I deliberated
that, driven by jealousy, he accidentally went too far. My new reality settled
in when Ajax kept at it once I physically responded. He couldn’t understand
it was filling me with self-hatred. The day Ajax went too far, it pushed me
over the edge. I couldn't ignore what was happening and left for Paris the
next day.
After I left for Paris, Ajax flew out to bring me back. There was unwavering
determination in his voice—we belonged together, and anything different
was unnatural.
I promised Ajax I would try to forgive him if he stayed away. I wanted us to
eventually be a family again. However, Ajax wanted the promise of
reconciliation, along with my forgiveness. He wouldn't leave until I agreed,
which I grudgingly did.
Hope. Hope was the only thing I could give to ensure he would stay away.
Yes. It was idiotic, but what else would’ve kept a crazed man at bay? I was
seventeen and petrified of my guardian, who had legal rights over me. So, I
gave him hope, never expecting his feelings to remain the same four years
later.
Though our situation was complex, I never hated Ajax, only his actions.
However, I didn’t hate the person in front of me working on finding a path
to coexist.
“I don’t know if hate is the right word.” I unraveled my thoughts. “At most,
I feel resentful.”
“Resentful?” Ajax asked curiously.
“If I’m honest, I resent that you have the whole nine yards.” My attempt at
forthrightness failed as bitterness warped my words. “You have a dream
job. Perfect condo. Family. Adoration. Friends. It’s difficult to endure that
life is so easy for you after what happened between us. Even our families
look at you like you are their savior.”
Ajax appeared astonished by my summary of his life. “It’s not a good thing
to be seen as a savior. It’s a reminder of the same truth I had lived my whole
life: the expectation for me to lessen the burden of others.”
Ajax’s words gave me pause. That’s how I always viewed him, too.
Despite his new sociopathic tendencies, Ajax was a man of habit, which
included being responsible and a caretaker. He resented this family after
years of being tied down to them, yet Ajax took care of them. Though he'd
never openly admit it, he had a deep loathing for his mother. It vibrated
from his very essence. He resented Tessa for forcing him into a role he
never wanted.
Nonetheless, after everything went downhill with Tessa, he was the first to
step up to the plate while Uncle Reese checked out. As usual, everyone
assumed Ajax would carry the load. He never complained about it, so it was
impossible to determine otherwise.
Did taking care of us have such a demonic influence?
“And life didn’t move on for me,” Ajax said coolly, voice rising with
agitation. “The last four years had been hell for me. I felt empty all the
time. Food had no taste. Life had no meaning. It was just hollow
nothingness. I was tired of slapping on a smile and walking around
aimlessly.”
I tensed at Ajax’s brutal honesty.
Ajax took a few harsh breaths, quieting the bad memories. “I work all the
time to support my family, but I also do it, so I won’t have a free moment to
think about you. I avoid New York because this city feels empty without
you. I don’t see my family because they remind me of you. I don’t stay at
my condo because I bought it for you.”
“You did what?” I asked before the last word left his lips. Mia had also told
me that Ajax didn’t stay here, though I couldn’t understand why when I first
walked into the condo. This place was my dream home. Perfect view.
Perfect location. High ceilings with beautiful chandeliers. Absolutely
gorgeous.
Ajax’s eyes softened around the edges. “I bought this condo because you
used to say Soho was the heart of New York, and the only good view of it
was from above. I had hoped for this condo to be ours someday. The hope
waned over the years, and I couldn’t look at it anymore.”
I blinked. Ajax’s words were equivalent to a punch in the gut. His pained
expression, worse.
“I didn’t know that,” I whispered, feeling at a loss following his confession.
Ajax.
Raven stared confoundedly, unsure how to process the information. Taking
the opportunity, I prodded her gently. “Now that you do, how do we move
forward?”
With a deep breath, Raven admitted, “By finding a middle ground. Look,
Ajax, I know how much you’re doing for the whole family, and I appreciate
it. I—I need control over my life and my body. I need to feel safe. If you
can give me those things, I-I’ll meet you halfway.”
I nodded at her acquiescence. It wasn’t the promise I wanted, but it was a
start.
Raven stared ahead, gaze landing on the table. Without another word, she
walked toward it. She was making a peace offering.
As soon as the shock wore off, I followed and pulled out her chair as Raven
settled in. Rounding the table, I sat across from Raven. She casually opened
the dessert box as if we hadn’t just discussed life-altering matters.
“Wow,” I said, feeling mesmerized. “This view is truly stunning.” The sky
was clear, giving me an exquisitely panoramic view of the city from Ajax’s
terrace—a breathtaking reminder of grand New York.
“I thought you might like it.”
I nodded, transfixed by the sight. It seemed unreal, like a dream. The lack of
sleep was probably fucking with my head, turning everything hazy. I dug
my nails into my palm to wake myself up. Looking up, I found Ajax
watching the nail marks I left behind.
“What happened to you the other night?” Ajax asked abruptly, eyes
roaming the angry red scratches.
Ajax was implying the night he endearingly referred to as the incident. I
had an inkling that I had freaked him out.
“If we are going to be friends, can we start with an easier topic and work
our way up?”
“Fine,” he conceded. “Why didn’t you think I'd find out about you moving
back to New York?” Ajax had that one stored and ready to go.
“Because I was discreet,” I said plainly. “Other than people at work, only
Mia and Reid knew I had moved back. I asked them not to say anything.
Stayed away from social media, too. Plus, Mia told me you barely returned
to New York and were too busy to answer calls. I assumed you wouldn’t
know about my move for a while.”
Ajax grinned at my conniving plan. “You’re a smart girl.”
“How’d you find out I moved back?”
“From family members.”
“And how did you find out how Reid felt about me?”
“From family members,” he repeated.
“Ah. The cycle continues.”
“I pried it out of Mia.”
“So,” I said, glancing at Ajax nervously in hopes of an honest answer, “you
didn’t speak to Reid before we saw each other for the first time? Did you
know when everyone was coming home the day our parents caught us
together?”
I still had my suspicions that Ajax had something to do with us getting
caught naked by our families. I’d asked my parents about it, though Mom
insisted Ajax didn’t ask anyone to go to his room. He informed them
there’d be a family meeting once everyone moved in. From her perspective,
it was a unanimous group decision to seek Ajax out. I wanted to believe her,
but something was off.
Ajax said nothing, making it the second time he actively dodged the
question. We sat in silence. When he spoke again, I almost jumped at the
sudden sound of his voice. “We have this brilliant coder at our office, but no
one wants to sit next to him because he doesn’t wear deodorant. I didn’t
want to fire him for poor hygiene, so I promoted him as an excuse to give
him a private office away from others. Now, I'm starting to think he is a
genius.”
Growing up, we used to tease Ajax about his old-man ways. In retaliation,
Ajax would tell dad jokes to embarrass us in public.
One time we went to a diner. At the end of the meal, our server came up to
us.
“You wanna box for the leftovers?” our waitress had asked Ajax.
“No, but I’ll wrestle you for them,” was Ajax’s response.
Soon the jokes morphed into short stories. Ajax would tell us dad jokes
anytime we needed cheering up or if we were mad at him. It never worked
on Reid, while Mia and I ate it up. We could never stay mad at Ajax after
one of his dad jokes, even if sometimes we were laughing at him rather than
with him. This story was an example of the first.
My lips curved as Ajax’s did the same, looking so damn sexy.
Sexy?
Where the hell did that come from?
I hadn't thought of him in that way in years. I barely had the chance to
reflect when Ajax charged ahead with another terrible dad joke.
“There’s a woman at work who uses her time of the month to take time off.
She’d go into such graphic details about her cramps that her male
supervisor would get uncomfortable and give in. I’ve had enough
experience with you and Mia. I have no shame walking into a grocery store
to buy tampons or using words like ‘heavy flow.’ So, I asked the supervisor
to direct her to me in the future.”
“Then what happened?” I asked.
“I ended up giving her the time off.”
I gaped at Ajax for a heartbeat, then burst out laughing. Loud, hearty
laughter. The kind of laughter I hadn’t let out in years. The kind that had
tears leaking out of my eyes. Days of suffocating, tense mood shifted into
something familiar and lighthearted.
Once the laughter subsided, I asked, “So, tell me about your company. I
don't know much about it.”
Ajax humored me by diving into the nitty-gritty details. He explained the
most mundane aspects of his job with enthusiasm.
“You work a lot,” I stated the obvious.
“It comes with the territory of owning a business. The more I work, the
better our profit margin.”
“Why do you need so much money?” I bit my tongue when the rude
question slipped out. “I meant, you’re already so well off.”
Ajax lifted a bored shoulder. “People think if you have money, then your
money problems disappear. It isn’t true. The more money you have, the
more expenses you accrue.”
“Expenses? Do you mean your bougie apartment or does the responsible
Ajax Sinclair secretly harbor expensive vices none of us simpletons know
of? Drugs? High-class escorts?”
Ajax gave me half a smile, but when he ran a hand through his long hair, I
saw his eyes light up in amusement. He played along with a pretend
exasperated voice. “Sure. Why not?”
“Crack? Heroin? What are the cool kids into nowadays?”
Ajax tsked at me. “Cool kids? I never took you for one to have peer
pressure sentiments. If all your friends jumped off a bridge, would you also
jump off a bridge?”
“You tell me, Ajax. All my friends just died jumping off a bridge, and now
I’m pretty fucking depressed. So, maybe.”
Ajax looked at me with his mouth wide open and burst out laughing. He
only stopped to casually reach over and open my fist. I didn’t realize
digging my nails into my palm again. It was a nervous habit I had picked up
over the last few years.
Neither of us commented as he affectionately entangled our fingers. He held
my hand in a surprisingly comfortable manner, just like he used to in the
past.
“You know,” I said in a prying tone, “if you give me an answer, then I’ll
stop coming up with these guesses. Just give me an example,” I pressed,
feeling genuinely nosey at this point.
Ajax assessed my words with a long, contemplative look while appearing...
desolate. Ajax’s tired, half-smile returned.
“Okay. For example, Mia and Reid’s tuition and Dad’s expenses. He's not
working full-time anymore, so I'm picking up more than usual. I had to
make a healthy donation to get Tessa started on her clinical trial. It came
highly recommended though it’s ineffective, which means I might have to
pay for a new program. Plus, I’m giving a hefty loan to—” Ajax cut himself
off, realizing he had said too much.
“To my parents,” I finished the sentence with a slight, understanding nod.
I asked Ajax if they could stay at the house, but I didn’t realize he had
already offered to help them. This was much more than I had expected of
him and more than they deserved.
It was frustrating to hear.
Nothing had changed despite the years. Everyone shamelessly exploited
Ajax. He spent his life taking care of this family. He studied and worked so
hard, but the struggle didn't end. When would this toxic-as-fuck family stop
needing him?
Ajax playfully poked me. “You look like someone just died. Don’t worry,
Rave. I’m still a wealthy man. It’s not about the money. It’s about—”
“The expectation for you to ease the burden of others?” I gave him a sad
smile, feeling bitter on his behalf. “Ajax,” I started softly, “why are you
doing this? It’s not your responsibility.”
“Rave,” Ajax said quietly, “no one asked me for this, but I wouldn't rest
easy knowing I could help with their circumstance.”
I looked away.
Despite our earlier heated conversation, my heart tore for Ajax. He was
right. I had forgotten, but he reminded me of who he indeed was. Ajax
would take care of this whole family until his dying breath, all without a
complaint.
Ajax smiled ominously in my direction. “Don’t worry about that. Can we
get back to our earlier discussion? I want to talk about what happened the
other night.”
“Pass,” I said. What’s his obsession with this topic?
“Raven,” he warned in a silky tone.
Two could play at this game. “How old were you when you lost your
virginity?” I asked a question of my own. No one dared to ask Ajax about
his sexual past. We used to hear about his conquests through the girls, never
through Ajax himself. He was a private person, but this was a two-way
street if he wanted me to share.
Ajax fixed me with his don’t start with me look. It took everything not to
roll my eyes. I saw the irritation flashing on his before he looked away.
“What’s going on with your new business?” He changed the topic to neutral
territory.
I rewarded him with a big smile and disclosed uploading my designs to a
website so people could buy a custom outfit by merely sending in their
measurements. “I also uploaded my work on Instagram,” I added. “It’s
linked to the website Alexa helped me create.”
“That’s awesome, Rave.” Ajax beamed with a proud look on his face.
On impulse, my heart skipped a beat. I craved that proud look on his face
when I was younger, but it had a different impact this time.
After we finished, Ajax cleared out the trash, brushing off my offer to help.
Meanwhile, I inadvertently stole glances at him. My heart fluttered as I’d
imagined it would in a movie. Or in a book. Or in song lyrics. Even my
pussy skipped a beat. What the hell was happening?
When dusk set in, Ajax grabbed my hand to pull me up to stand. We left his
condo wordlessly, though the silence was comfortable, reminding me of the
familiarity that remained despite the years apart.
Raven.
The door to Ajax’s room was slightly ajar. None of the “kids” in
the house knocked when entering each other’s rooms. So, if you were
indecent, your door better be shut and locked. If your door was slightly ajar,
it was an open invitation.
Nonetheless, I peeked through the open door before making my way inside.
I had been tasked with waking Ajax… by Ajax himself. He had a meeting
he couldn’t be late for, but he also put in a late night and was worried about
sleeping through his alarm. Ajax was sprawled under the covers, his
unconscious body reflecting mental and physical exhaustion.
Despite the tiredness, he looked sexy as all hell.
It was odd.
I had scoffed at his superficial beauty before. I thought women were stupid
to fall for his act. However, I have felt just as affected over the past couple
of weeks. Perhaps more so than those silly women.
Maybe that’s why I didn’t have the heart to wake him yet. According to the
clock, Ajax could get away with sleeping for thirty more minutes, forty-five
maximum, if he didn’t deem a shower necessary for a video meeting. I
decided to wait until the last possible second to wake him.
While I ran out the clock, I took stock of the room. Ajax was neat, but this
room… It wasn’t messy, but not to his usual standards—no doubt due to his
hectic schedule.
I cleaned quietly and took his hamper to the laundry room to throw in a
load. Twenty minutes had passed, and as predicted, Ajax slept through his
blaring alarm.
“Ajax,” I coaxed him gently, sitting beside him on the bed.
He barely moved. “Mmm.”
I gave him a shake. “Get up, Ajax.”
“Was going on?” he groggily asked, his eyes still closed.
“I’m here to wake you up.”
“For work?”
I stared at him sadly. “Unfortunately.”
“Perks of being the boss is setting your hours,” he mumbled.
“Yes,” I agreed. “But you, the boss, set a meeting for which you’re about to
be late.”
Ajax opened his eyes, still looking hazy as hell and too fucking tired. He
closed his eyes again. “Okay. Just two more minutes.”
I let out a deep sigh. Clearly, his sleep and work schedule had caught up to
him.
I pulled out my new phone, a gift from Ajax. Actually, it wasn’t a gift. He
destroyed my old phone and replaced it with this one.
Swiping my phone screen to unlock it, I texted Alexa.
Rave: Good Morning. So, Ajax has a meeting in twenty minutes.
I waited for her response. Alexa also worked late alongside Ajax, so she
might also be sleeping. All the same, I sent her one more text.
Rave: I was wondering if you know anything about this meeting.
A sigh of relief escaped my lips when my phone dinged.
Alexa: Morning. Of course. What’s going on?
Rave: Any specific reason why Ajax has to be there? I came in to wake him
up, but he was exhausted. Wondering if someone else could cover for him.
Alexa: Any of us can take the meeting, but Ajax is the one who scheduled
it. We just got done about an hour ago. I usually don’t mind covering for
him, but honestly, I don’t have the energy to get out of bed. Sorry, girl.
I frowned at Alexa’s text. I felt bad for asking since she was just as sleepdeprived, but I couldn't bear waking Ajax up, knowing he had gone to sleep
an hour ago. I had already watched Ajax work himself to death over the last
few weeks.
Rave: I’ll buy you lunch for a week.
Rave: I’ll make you that couture outfit you wanted. The EXACT replica.
Ajax would laugh at me if he were awake right now.
Rave: You know how we decided you get 6% royalty for every dress I sell?
Make it 7%.
Alexa: You are a terrible negotiator. You should always wait for a response
after your first offer before spewing out more.
Rave: Will you take the meeting or not?
Alexa: How can I say no when you twist my arm into it like that?
Rave: You are the best.
Alexa: No, I’m not. But now I understand why he always called you his
Xanax. You just gave up part of your company so Ajax can sleep through
ONE meeting.
Alexa: We also need to have a serious discussion about your negotiation
skills if we are to be business partners.
I laughed but put my phone away as Alexa sent more texts about my poor
business skills. Reaching over, I turned off Ajax’s alarm, which he’d
already snoozed twice.
I was about to rise when Ajax felt the shift on the mattress and stirred. He
grabbed my hand. “Stay,” he mumbled hoarsely.
Ajax used to call it magic when I stroked his hair and soothed away his
anxiety. Hoping I had some magic left, I remained docile while playing
with his hair.
Once, Ajax was my worst enemy. Over the weeks, we regained our old
friendship as I watched him work around the clock and take care of
everyone else. I didn’t know when, nor could I identify how, Ajax had
lodged himself deep inside me to the point my heart broke for him.
As I watched the beautiful man in front of me, a part of me died from
sadness. A man burdened with so much from such a young age, with no end
in sight.
It was unfair.
Despite the houseful of people and a world full of friends, Ajax grew up
lonelier than me. While he seemingly had a large family, his leadership role
isolated him into a separate category. When I was young, I acknowledged
these leadership traits, but as an adult, Ajax had morphed from a figurehead
to a partner with whom I shared an exclusive connection. We both had a
deep-seated need to care for the people we loved. Whether it was Mia,
Tessa, or Reid, we could never turn our backs on our family, though it was
nice to have another person to help carry the load.
Entwining our hands, I squeezed him to let him know he wasn’t alone any
longer
The staircases leading to the split level were constructed imperial-style,
with two flights of walled-off stairs going in each direction.
Both staircases led to a foyer-type area. That’s where Ajax set up his home
office. Four desks, office chairs, computers, phones, etc.
If you took a left at the bottom of the stairs, you'd find a door leading to the
large, open main area. We used to throw parties there back in the day. If you
took a right at the bottom of the stairs, you’d find a door to a small
apartment where Ajax’s business partners were staying.
I stood at the top of those very staircases, trying to decide if I should make
my descent.
Ajax and I hadn't seen each other since this morning, which was abnormal
since we ate every meal together. He missed our habitual lunch today. When
it hit 10 p.m., I realized he never came by for dinner.
Unsure of the proper etiquette for home-office protocol, I hesitated at the
top of the stairs. My decision was made when I heard Alexa’s voice.
As I reached the bottom of the stairs, I was surprised to find a lively room.
No one noticed my arrival, as all four desks faced away from the staircase.
My focus zeroed in on one of the desks.
Ajax sat in an office chair while Alexa stood beside him, leaning over his
desk to review some paperwork. The exchange was friendly enough. I’d
seen them work in close proximity before, but this scene hit a little too close
to home.
He forgot to visit me because he was engrossed in Alexa.
I had barely shaken away the irrational thought when Alexa took Ajax in a
one-handed hug, pressing her breasts against him.
What. The. Fuck.
I wanted to gouge someone’s eyes out. Rip their hair right out of their scalp.
I wanted to claw the shit out of someone, and Alexa seemed like a good
enough target for all those things. Before I could react, Brandon’s booming
voice reached my ears. “Raven, we missed you.”
Ajax and Alexa turned simultaneously, but I couldn’t see their reactions.
Brandon picked me up in a bear hug and twirled me around.
“Whoa!” I squealed in surprise. “Nice to see you, too, Brandon.”
I levitated in the air until two firm hands gripped my waist and yanked me
out of Brandon’s grasp. My back hit a hard chest. I tilted my head to find
Ajax hovering over me, his glare steadfast on Brandon. Mine drifted back
to Alexa.
“Tell me, Brandon, would you rather finish your workday and sleep
peacefully in a warm bed or have me drag you outside so you can sleep in
the cold?”
“I come in peace.” Brandon smiled at Ajax and made peace signs with both
of his hands.
Alexa smiled sadly, watching Ajax hold me tightly to his chest. I was
swamped with guilt instinctively, knowing I was the reason for that look.
Alexa couldn’t control her feelings for Ajax. She could only restrain her
actions, which she did. Alexa had never been rude—nor had she mistreated
me—despite Ajax’s not-so-little crush.
I tried to push off Ajax, but his hold only tightened in response.
“Stop being so touchy, M,” Brandon teased.
“It’s been a shitty, fucking day. Don’t test me.”
“I was just excited to see Raven.” Brandon gave him another cheeky
response.
“Be less fucking excited,” Ajax said with his calm voice and stoic eyes. It
was a look that dropped my stomach to the ground.
Brandon was out of his league with these jokes. He didn't realize he was
playing with fire but would find out when Ajax bashed his head in.
“I just came by to say hello. I didn’t realize you guys were so busy.” I
pushed against Ajax’s chest to diffuse the situation. Brandon would lose his
ammunition to provoke Ajax if I wasn't in the same room.
Ajax's hold on me tightened once more.
“Shit hit the fan today.” Jaci twirled around in her revolving chair with her
headset above her ears.
“Yeah, it’s been insane. Ajax locked us up in this basement.” Brandon
pouted. “I haven’t seen the sun at all. Tell me, Rave. Do people still laugh
out there?”
Despite myself, I let out a giggle. Ajax scathed me with a look but reserved
the harsher one for Brandon. “For fuck’s sake, Brandon,” he barked.
“You’re a part-owner of a company that’s falling apart. Act like it.” He
finally let go of his hold to address the girls. “I’ll be back later to go
through the rest of it.”
“See you guys.” Brandon waved us off.
I lifted my hand to wave back, but Ajax roughly grabbed it to entwine with
his own, a silent warning against encouraging Brandon.
Ajax walked us out of the split-level apartment. As soon as we were out of
earshot, I faced him. “What’s going on at work?”
“What do you mean?” He frowned, confused. “I texted you about what
happened.”
“Text?” I slapped my temple. It never crossed my mind to text him. Why
would it? We lived in the same damn house. “Shit. I left my phone in my
room. I get too distracted by it when I work.”
“As Jaci said, shit hit the fan. I left the house first thing and just got back
from the office. Our servers went down today.”
I took in Ajax’s tired eyes and unshaven face. “Is everything okay?”
“We’re working on it,” he exhaled. “But it'll have to be an all-nighter
again.”
All-nighter with Alexa?
She was his business partner, so obviously, she’d be there. Alexa was also
one of Ajax’s best friends. He'd be confined with his beautiful, non-toxic
friend during all hours of the night.
The thought was much more depressing than I could’ve imagined.
“Rave, did you hear my question?”
I didn't. “Oh, sorry. I spaced. What’s up?”
“I asked if you’ve eaten yet?”
“No, I haven’t eaten.”
“Pizza?”
“Sounds great.” I tried to snap out of my weird funk. “I’m starving.”
“There's a place a few blocks away that should still be open.”
I nodded, following him out of the house.
Ajax.
Raven and I grabbed a couple of slices of pizza from a local takeout and ate
it on our walk home. Now that her hand was free, my eyes kept flickering to
it. I was about to reach for it when she crossed her arms over her chest.
Raven had been unusually quiet tonight. She was walking next to me but
was lost in her mind.
This was backward momentum. I had to bring out the big guns to keep her
engaged. Already hating the topic I was about to propose, I tilted my head
in her direction.
“Do you still want to know about my sexual hist—”
“How many women have you been with?” Raven asked before I could
formulate the question to completion. She didn’t miss a beat as if waiting
for the opening. I smiled at her reflex. Locked, loaded, and ready to shoot.
That’s my quick-witted girl.
“I expected something more creative, Rave,” I teased, hoping to avoid this
specific question.
“Don’t you worry, I'm just getting started,” Raven retorted. “So, how
many?”
This was why I hated talking about my sexual history. I specifically never
discussed it so that it wouldn’t get back to Raven. She wouldn’t like any of
my answers.
“I lost count a long time ago,” I said quickly, holding my breath for her
reaction.
“How long ago?”
“When I was sixteen.”
Raven paused but shook away the information casually, not letting me see
how it affected her. She fired the next question, “And how old were you
when you lost your virginity?”
“Thirteen.” I was too embarrassed to make eye contact with her, so I stared
straight ahead.
“Jesus!” Raven failed to keep the nonchalance in her voice, making me
wince.
“Absentee parents and fast city kids,” I mumbled.
As if noticing my misery, Raven tried to diffuse the tension. She asked a
creative question as promised. “Have you ever slept with a man?”
“No, Raven. I haven’t,” I patiently responded.
“Ever kissed a man?”
“No, Raven.” I give her another exasperated look.
“Have you had anal sex?”
I paused. “Yes.”
“Were you the pitcher or catcher?” Raven asked in an amused tone.
My lips twitched slightly. She was enjoying this a little too much, but I felt
unruffled by this line of questioning. I slowly reached for her hand,
untangling her crossed arms. If she planned to be ridiculous, she could hold
my hand in exchange.
“What do you think?”
Raven studied my face. “Catcher, for sure.”
Sometimes, I couldn’t get enough of all the fucking shit this girl spewed.
There was nothing like it in the world. “Whatever you say, Rave.”
“Have you had a threesome?” Raven didn’t so much as take a breath.
“Yes.”
“Did you like it?”
“It was the same as sex.” I shrugged. “Just add voyeurism and some waiting
around time.”
“Would you do it again?”
“No,” I responded curtly, narrowing my eyes at the picture she was
drawing.
“Why not?”
“Because the thought of sharing you makes me want to murder the person,
boy or girl.”
“I didn’t suggest a threesome with me,” she deadpanned. “It was a
hypothetical question.”
“Okay. Hypothetically, the thought of sharing you makes me want to
murder the person, boy or girl. I don’t even like thinking of someone else
touching you.”
“We’re not talking about me,” Raven retorted.
“If it has to do with my sexual future, we are talking about you,” I snapped.
Neither of us remarked on the comment, but I tightened my grip on her
hand.
Raven needed assurance there could be more between us than sex. I had
been giving that to her for weeks. As a result, something had been brewing
between us. The wheels had turned in her head, and her feelings had
changed. It started with sharing our meals, going on walks to test the range
of motion of her injured leg, and working through our family drama. The
transition was gradual, and neither of us caught on.
Now, Raven instinctively propped up her leg on my lap when we bingewatched our favorite shows on Netflix. I automatically reached for her hand
when we walked anywhere. Except for sex and the label, we were together
in every sense of the word, both in front of our families and in private. The
term was “courting” or some other archaic version of dating.
I had never done this shit in my life. If it were anyone other than Raven, I
never would’ve, either. So, I needed some answers to understand her
mentality.
“Do I get to ask you a question as well?”
“I guess that’s fair,” she responded mildly. “But are you sure you want to
ask about my sexual past? You mentioned your jealousy—”
I ground my teeth even. “No, Rave. I don’t want to know about your
conquests in Paris. I’d have to kill the fuckers if you told me.” I wished I
were kidding.
Raven ignored the sentiment. “What would you like to know?”
“Have you ever been in love?”
Raven stopped in her tracks to stare at me. She blinked a few times, then
resumed walking without pulling her hand away.
“Yes,” she answered curtly, without offering any more information or
explanation.
I desperately wanted to ask the dreaded follow-up question but chose not to.
If the answer was anything different from the one I wanted, the
repercussions might be too massive for both of us to recover from. I simply
clenched and unclenched my jaw, hoping it wasn’t him.
Instead, I asked, “What else would you like to know about my past sex
life?”
“You never used to talk dirty, but I noticed you did the last few times...”
“Back then wasn’t the right time to incorporate dirty talk into our sex life.”
“Why not?” Raven challenged.
“Because you were young and shy.”
“Did you talk dirty to Alexa?” The words spilled out so abruptly that it took
her by surprise.
I stopped short. “If I didn’t know any better, I’d say you were jealous,” I
said in a low voice. Raven had never expressed jealousy or possessiveness
before.
“Jealous?” Raven sounded caught off guard.
“It’s okay if you are.” I meant it. I glanced to find Raven frowning, unsure
how to react to her feelings. “Why do you want to know about what
happened between us?”
Raven’s smile faded. “Because I’m curious about the extent of your
relationship with her,” she said in her matter-of-fact tone. “You do know
how Alexa feels about you, don’t you?”
Honest. Direct. To the point. I felt apprehensive about the direction of this
conversation. “I guess.”
“Yet, you asked her to invest so I can start my business. You had her
promote my designs to her contacts. Don’t you think that hurt her feelings?”
I blinked.
I had no idea how to take this.
“She didn’t play it cool,” Raven explained. “New York is filled with
talented people who are looking for investors. Alexa hadn't seen me in years
but, within five minutes, jumped on the bandwagon to invest in me. It was
easy to put two and two together.”
Raven was talented. Extremely talented.
When she was younger, I’d stare at her designs and wonder how she came
up with them. Over the years, she was only active on social media to post
her designs. Seeing those designs made me feel connected to her, but a gift
like hers often became unpaid talent. Venturing out without the proper
capital and marketing was the main reason most small businesses failed.
Raven’s business would thrive through Alexa’s contacts. Alexa’s rich
friends had no problem ordering through Alexa’s new company instead of
whoever they had previously used. The credit went to Raven, but she
needed financial backing and promotion to the right clientele. Raven
wouldn’t take my money, but she trusted Alexa, who had both the money
and the connections. It didn’t raise my standing on the moral scale to ask a
woman half in love with me to invest in Raven, but Alexa knew to
differentiate between personal and professional feelings.
“Alexa has the right contacts and doing this by yourself would’ve been
tough.” There was no point insulting Raven’s intellect by denying the
allegations. “Are you upset this was my idea, or are you upset because I
asked Alexa to help you?”
Raven frowned. “I’m not upset. I just wanted to thank you.”
I came to a screeching halt.
“Not for hurting your friend’s feelings,” she quickly clarified, “but for
helping me achieve something better.” Raven smiled sweetly before getting
back to business. “So, did you talk dirty to Alexa?”
I had always known Raven didn’t throw tantrums because she was slow to
react. That didn’t mean she wouldn’t react. Consequently, I was cautious
about giving in to her request. “How imperative is it for me to answer?”
“How imperative is it for me to trust you?” Raven retorted.
“Yes.” My response was almost immediate. “I spoke dirty to Alexa.”
“Thank you for being honest.”
I gave in, but I didn’t know her ability to process. She was so fucking
stunted at times. It was like watching a child take their first emotional steps
as they learned to walk the new realm they had recently discovered. “Rave,
are you jealous of Alexa?”
“Yes,” her response was swift and definite. She added, “Yes, I believe I
am.”
“You know, I wouldn’t be able to deal with it if the situation were
reversed.”
I was jealous when someone breathed near Raven. If she were to work with
someone she slept with... yeah... I’d never allow that. It was only fair to
reciprocate.
“If you’re uncomfortable with Alexa, I can—”
“Ajax, stop,” Raven cut me off. She looked up with a scowl tugging at her
lips. “I’d never come between your friendships or work.”
Of course, she wouldn’t. Compassion and empathy ran deep for her. Raven
always understood everyone else’s perspectives. After everything I had
done, she was trying to understand me instead of writing me off.
Without dwelling on the past, Raven shot off her next question. “Have you
ever had any STDs?”
“No.” I took out my house key as we approached the front door.
“When was the last time you took an STD test?” she asked curiously.
I contemplated for a moment as I mulled over the answer. “Four years ago.”
“What?” Raven exclaimed. “Four years is a long time. How do you know
you’re clean?”
I knew of the thoughts running through that pretty little head of hers. I
laughed at the way she cringed. “Trust me, Rave. I’m clean.”
“Even if you use a condom, they can break,” she protested. “Everyone
thinks they're invincible until they aren’t.”
“I don’t think I’m invincible.”
“Then why won’t you entertain the possibility of an STD?”
“Because there’s only been one person in the last five years, so unless you
have an STD you’d like to report—”
Raven froze as I turned the lock to the main door, surprised by my
revelation. Actually, surprised might not be the right word. Shocked.
Speechless. Stunned.
I held the door open for her. She hesitated before stepping inside, quietly
digesting the words while crossing the threshold into the living room. I had
to return to the split level, but I walked Raven to her room.
“It's been f-four years since we’ve seen each other. I-I… how do you expect
me to believe that? I mean… how did you even remember what to do?”
I tilted my head toward her with a cocky grin. “It’s just like riding a
bicycle.”
Raven stood with her mouth wide open. She suddenly blurted out, “You
must have jacked off all the time.”
My chest rumbled with laughter at her cute little face. Oh, I did. All the
fucking time, and to a particular dark-haired girl.
“I mean… I don’t understand. Why did you go so long? Nothing was going
on between us…” She wavered off, unsure how to finish the sentence.
I lifted a shoulder at the thought. “I’ve already had all the experience in the
world. Friends with benefits. Casual dating. No matter what I did, it was
always an empty fuck. Once we got together, I realized how empty those
fucks were. Sex simply felt hollow.”
Raven was quiet for so long that I opened my mouth to follow up. I stopped
when she spoke in a nearly inaudible voice. “Was it really never about
sex?”
The words jolted me.
Raven was the most beautiful thing I had seen. She was also the most
creative person I had met. How she thought, observed, and her perspectives;
it was unlike anyone else.
I loved those things about her, but none of those qualities were why I craved
her in this insatiable way. It was because of the way she loved. She had this
rare ability to love unconditionally. It didn’t matter if it was friendship love,
romantic love, or familial love. When she loved someone, she loved with all
her heart. Raven's love wasn’t dramatic, loud, or grand like mine. It was
unexpressed and in the background. Yet, it was felt so vividly it shook me to
my core.
Whenever I pulled an all-nighter, I found my room clean upon return, with
my laundry neatly folded. I didn’t have to catch Raven in the act to know it
was her. She spoke to my dad, volunteering to help him with his budget
sheet to skim expenses. Suddenly, the bills I had paid were lower than the
month prior. Whenever Raven was in my vicinity, my to-do list was
significantly smaller. I had never once asked her for those things, nor had
she taken credit.
Everyone regarded me as the caretaker, Raven included, though she was
just as big of a caretaker. I was calm when she was around because she took
care of me. I needed her in the most integral sense of that word because
there was only one person in this world who had shared my burden.
Given our history, I wasn’t sure how to convince Raven it was never just
about sex. “I know you don’t believe me that it wasn’t just about sex,” I
responded in a muted voice. “My actions never reflected the depth of my
feelings. I never meant to hurt you…” I trailed off when I saw the look on
her face.
Raven was still staring in disbelief. Her expression morphed into a look that
muffled my voice, stealing the words from within me.

Raven.
“My actions never reflected the depth of my feelings. I never meant to hurt
you…” Ajax's voice trailed off.
“I know you weren't trying to hurt me," I admitted. I had always known
Ajax's intention was never to hurt me. We spun out of control, and neither
of us knew how to return from what had happened.
“What you just said... It’s the most beautiful thing anyone has ever…” I
took a deep breath, collected myself, and tried again. “That’s the most
beautiful thing you’ve said to me. It’s the second time you have defined the
word perfection.”
When we started sleeping together, Ajax was the same age as I was. At this
stage of my life, I could navigate a relationship with someone like him.
There were things I understood now that I didn’t as a teenager, only
receiving clarity after gaining some life experience.
I was more vocal now. Back then, I looked up to Ajax but never thought
someone like him could want me. I didn’t know where we stood, nor did I
dare ask. Ajax never communicated if we were exclusive, let alone shared
anything this profound.
I couldn’t stop staring at him because this was how I had always wanted to
be loved by someone. Until a few weeks ago, Ajax’s primary focus was
lust. Ajax said he stopped because our last encounter freaked him out.
Given his admission, I hoped he understood how hard I was trying to
believe his words. Because he was right; everyone else was an empty fuck
in comparison. Looking back at my experiences—sex, dating, relationships
—it was always empty.
I was trying because it was his love that made me.
I was trying despite his lust which broke me.
Ajax.

It was difficult to utter another word. Not when she looked at me in a little
too familiar manner. A look that incited every emotion inside me. I had been
craving it for years because she saw me as I was, filled to the brim with
flaws, yet I was still her:
Whole.
Damn.
World.
Raven.
What the fuck was happening? Why were we just staring at each other?
I couldn’t breathe under his scrutiny. I was in some fog, where all I saw was
him. For weeks, it felt like we were the only two people on this planet
despite the ten others living in this house. It was as if he was my:
Whole.
Fucking.
World.
Fuck. Me.
When did this happen?
Ajax.
The sudden energy shift was palpable in the air. Raven’s breathing was
faster, and my heart was pounding against my rib cage.
She nervously fidgeted by her door… waiting. It was the universal end of
the night kiss me signal. This was the first time Raven gave me an opening,
and I wanted this more than I wanted oxygen, but my sight was on the end
goal—Raven’s unconditional love. Her love was so close I could almost
close my grasp on it. I couldn’t risk losing it forever due to a momentary
relapse.
I had been researching trauma and its aftereffects. Raven’s shaking, her
night terrors, and her sudden reactive responses—it all indicated trauma.
Despite all the therapists I had spoken to so far, there wasn’t much else I
could do unless she agreed to discuss it. It had to be her choice, but Raven
refused to divulge it. She was looking at me with lust, but it was mixed with
anxiety. It was an automatic response to someone who subconsciously
terrified her. At times Raven was fine in my company. She was okay with
me touching her and holding her. Other times, I walked on eggshells due to
her instinctive reactions.
I forced her to eat every meal with me, though even our most distracted
family members had noticed her weight loss. They had also noted the dark
circles under her eyes. The nightmares, the lack of sleep. The twitchiness. It
was all getting out of control.
Then there were the self-harming tendencies. I had to take away needles on
two occasions while Raven was distractedly digging them into her fingers
because I reached for her abruptly.
It destroyed me.
There was no fucking road map for this. No way to navigate through what
could set her off except to watch her body language and assure her I was no
longer a threat.
“It was never just sex,” I repeated to drill it into her brain. “It was our
connection. After experiencing the real deal, the idea of anything less felt
empty. Just the thought of someone else left me feeling dissatisfied.” Raven
might be giving me the signal, but her apprehension remained. Instead of
letting this heady moment get out of control, I cut the tension playfully. “It’s
like being asked to be on a vegetarian diet when you are a strict carnivore.”
Raven laughed loudly, breaking our staring contest and the tension pulsing
in the air. “Are you saying I’m a piece of meat?”
“You are Wagyu beef,” I confirmed, hiding my amusement. “When you are
used to having Kobe, then asked to eat grass, it only leaves you hungrier.”
“Oh, my God. Stop comparing me to food. I’m getting hungry again.”
I chuckled and changed the topic. “Fine. Are we still on for tomorrow?”
The small frown on Raven’s forehead displayed her surprise at my attempt
to end the night abruptly. “Yes,” she said awkwardly with a forced smile.
“We can go whenever you wake up.”
“Okay. Good night.”
“Good night.” Raven stood still for a second longer, unsure if I was making
a move.
I backed away first with a wave, cueing our most awkward goodnight to
date.
Uncle John encouraged Raven to go on long walks to improve her
range of motion since her physical recovery has been prolonged and
painful. We were on a trail close to my condo for today's walk. As we
reached the last stretch of the forty-five-minute walk, Raven’s leg flamed
up, and I suggested stopping by my condo to recover.
I laid her on the bed with pillows supporting her. This was the most silent
we had been in each other’s company in weeks.
Raven and I always shared a palpable sexual tension, but since last night,
neither of us had been able to ignore the magnitude of the tension.
Whenever I glanced at her, I wanted to corner her and start fucking her.
My reaction was elementary at best, especially since Raven wasn’t faring
well in this environment. Her injury and being in an enclosed space with
her predator escalated her panic. Slight sweat trickled around Raven’s
hairline, though it was cold. It was coupled with random shaking and
shortness of breath. Her leg was propped on a pillow, parted, and she
looked vulnerable as fuck. Ready for the taking.
The last thing I could do was focus on her panic. Instead, in the true nature
of her predator, I was focused on how long it had been.
Forty fucking days. I could go four years without sex, but forty fucking
days in Raven’s presence was impossible. I only lasted because of the
horror flickering in her eyes the last time we were together, the godforsaken incident. I needed to remind myself of it and take a cold shower.
“I'm going to take a shower. While I do that, I’d love your input on
decorating this place.”
“What would you like me to do?” Raven asked, wide-eyed.
My condo was bare, with minimum furnishing, and it desperately needed a
paint job. I handed Raven the color swatch book from my desk.
"Why don’t you pick a paint color? I already own the eggshell, white, and
off-white paint buckets. Circle the one you like.”
Raven was clueless about home decor. I bet she’d just stare at the swatches,
trying to differentiate between the three. I tasked her with it anyways to
distract her from her trepidation.
Raven.
Ajax handed me a big book of color swatches, asking me to choose between
eggshells, white, and off-white.
Honestly, I couldn't differentiate between the three.
Paint colors were different from the color swatches fashion designers
worked with. All three swatches looked white to me. Nonetheless, I circled
one.
Something had shifted in my dynamic with Ajax since last night. His words
of admission were magical. I was beyond touched. We had been hanging
out for weeks, joking, and digging up memories, but those words added
intimacy to our relationship.
You could practically cut the sexual tension between us with a knife.
However, Ajax shut down after his proclamation. Today, he had barely
spoken a word or looked my way.
I tried our usual jokes. Regular conversation. It was all met with a grunt,
silence, and no eye contact. I had no idea how to break the ice.
The anti-inflammatory and the pain medication Ajax gave me weren’t
helping either. The after-effect on an empty stomach was causing dizziness.
But not enough to blur the visual in front of me.
Ajax walked out of the bathroom with nothing but a towel wrapped around
his waist. I pulled the covers over my face but could make out his wet body
striding into the room through the opening.
This was the most naked I had seen him in years.
Yes, years.
Every time we had sex since my return, Ajax was busy restraining me, and I
was too busy fighting him off to take in his body.
My eyes trailed his solid back as he ransacked the closet. His broad
shoulders, biceps, the contours of his back, all of it seemed larger than life.
Fuck, he was hot. That wasn’t exactly news, but his physical beauty was
blatantly staring me in the face. Something had changed between us. His
looks affected me differently now than before.
Ajax stared at his closet in seeming frustration. I didn’t believe he stored
any clothing here. He presumably came to the same conclusion since he
pulled out the only available outfit—jeans and a flannel shirt.
Ajax threw his sweat-soaked clothes into a hamper. In a quick move, he
removed the towel from around his waist.
I didn't need a mirror to know my cheeks were turning a million shades of
crimson.
I stared at his bare, shapely ass like a perverted peeping Tom until it was
covered by a pair of jeans sans boxers. Ajax turned my way to catch me in
the act. He quirked an eyebrow at my blatant gawking. I should stop
staring, except my eyes were fixated on his bare chest. How did I forget his
washboard abs and the perfect V I had never seen on another man?
Look away, idiot, I chided myself.
My damn eyes refused to obey the command. Ajax's expression remained
guarded. He threw the flannel shirt and the used towel on the bed.
“I'm running a bath for you.” He pointed his thumb toward the bathroom.
“Uncle John said it'll help if we soak your leg. I have a shirt you can wear
until I run a load of wash for our dirty clothes.” He gave me a sheepish
look. “I only have one towel, sorry.”
“No worries,” I replied easily. “I don’t mind.”
“Do you need help getting into the tub?”
I slowly rose from the bed. “Nope. I got it.”
I made my way to the bathroom and closed the door to strip my clothes. I
sank into the hot water and chuckled over how I shamelessly eye-fucked
Ajax.
Speaking of the devil, Ajax walked in without looking my way. Wordlessly,
he grabbed my dirty clothes off the floor and walked out, shutting the door
behind him.
Was he washing my dirty underwear?
Oh, God.
I sank into the water in mortification.
When I finished my bath, I hobbled out of the tub and wrapped the towel
around me, hyper-aware that this very towel was touching his dick and ass
not too long ago. I had hung my bra on the towel rack and was relieved
Ajax didn’t take it for a wash. It was one of those sweat-resistant bras,
though I didn't sweat much during our hike. After toweling off, I put the bra
and Ajax’s flannel shirt on. At least the shirt went down to my upper thighs.
I found Ajax in the kitchen, unboxing some takeout. He gave me a tight
smile as I joined him at the table. He was still fucking shirtless, and I had
no underwear on, hanging out half-naked without a soul in sight. The big,
empty condo was making it more apparent. What was worse was Ajax’s
refusal to speak as we dug into our meals.
This was unbearable.
Look. At. Me. I silently yelled in my head.
After things had changed between us, why was he suddenly acting like I
was non-existent? For the first time since I had known Ajax, I felt invisible.
Ajax.
Torment.
Torture.
Temptation. Sweet fucking temptation.
I was doing everything in my power not to look at Raven. Not to look at her
wet, naked body underneath the shirt, barely reaching past her pussy. Her
pussy that was bare since her underwear was in the damn wash.
Are you fucking kidding me?
Dad used to drag Mia and Reid to church every time he was off on a
Sunday. He never bothered me with church because it was my day off if he
took the kids. As a result, Mia and Reid believed in a higher power.
Whereas Raven and I never found ourselves interested in theology.
The current situation might change my mind. Was this the universe telling
me there was a God, and he was punishing me for my sins?
The amount of control this situation required was a joke. This was the most
skin Raven had displayed in weeks, and the timing couldn’t have been
worse. We were in an empty apartment. No fucking family members. No
friends. No buffers. Everything was exponentially sexual to the point of
madness. She wasn’t helping with her lusted-filled looks, either. If I didn’t
pick up on Raven’s other reactions, I would have fucked the living daylights
out of her by now.
However, I did see it. I came out of the bathroom to find Raven eye-fucking
me while her trepidation remained. The sudden chills. Her gulps. I bet her
heartbeat was rapid, too. Her body seemed to be in a constant fight or flight
mode.
If she was fucking terrified of me and shook in reflex, why the fuck was she
looking at me that way? Did she not realize the adverse effects I had on
her?
This was insane. The prey was looking at the predator wantonly. Every
impulse in my body screamed for my cock to be inside her. I needed to feel
her pulsing around me. I needed it so badly everything was turning
goddamn blurry and hazy. Ignoring these impulses until our clothes were
dry seemed like an impossible task. I kept telling myself I could control it.
Of course, I could.
Maybe.
Probably not.
There was no one around. My depraved thoughts were scaring me. How
must she feel?
My eyes landed on the hem of the shirt she wore. It was revealing too much
of her legs. I trailed my eyes to catch sight of her cleavage despite the damn
bra she put on.
No one should be this enticing. Raven was the reason why the word
temptation was created. Because that’s what she was, fucking temptation
served on a platter. Hazel eyes. Perfect tits. Porcelain skin. A stupid shirt
that barely reached her thighs.
This was absurd.
It was fucking torment to want something this much and be unable to act on
it.
I needed air.
I rose from my chair and walked barefoot to the terrace without providing
her an explanation. I didn’t trust myself around Raven. The reality was—I’d
probably lose control again. I couldn’t be around her and not be with her in
the way every instinct in my body craved. No one had ever felt this way
around a girl, nor should they.
I stayed out on the terrace for as long as I could. When I finally returned,
Raven was in my bedroom, sitting at the edge of my bed, looking at the
swatch book.
This torture would never end. My nostrils flared the moment her vanilla
smell hit my senses. I was so fucked, and so was she.

Raven.
Ajax had been taking refuge on the terrace to get away from me.
Meanwhile, I grabbed the color swatch book and examined the colors to
keep myself busy. I had barely opened it when Ajax returned. He marched
toward me before changing his intentions to pace the room like a maniac.
Neither of us had still spoken a damn word to the other. I couldn’t take it for
a minute longer. I'd rather walk back to the Upper West Side on a
handicapped leg. It was only what, two hours? Worth it.
The less dramatic approach might be to simply call an Uber. I just couldn’t
think straight while he was fucking shirtless. If he refused to touch me, why
the hell was he shirtless?
The sight kept riling me up. At this point, I considered giving Ajax my shirt
to cover him.
I couldn’t remember the last time I felt this out of control. I was soaked
between my thighs with no damn underwear on. I considered jumping him,
but I had no idea how to make a move without an indication from him.
Acting sexy had never come easy to me.
Ajax stopped pacing and turned to face me. He had to know what I was
thinking. Assuming it wasn’t blatantly written across my forehead, it was
obvious with my heated cheeks and the rapid rise and fall of my chest. He
hadn’t done a damn thing, but arousal around him had become an
automated response.
The lining of his jeans made his intentions clear as well. His cock was about
to burst out the seams. So, why was he running away and keeping his
distance?
Do something! I screamed in my head.
How did I facilitate this? There wasn’t a step-by-step guide to transition
from a nonconsensual to a consensual sexual relationship for dummies.
Ultimately, my concerns were for nothing because Ajax’s facial expression
changed. He had come to a decision that had lust written all over it. In a
pure Ajax move, he didn’t wait for a second longer.
Ajax strolled closer, dropped on the floor in front of me, grabbed both of
my thighs, and yanked them apart. His eyes were on me. Ajax was
watching… waiting for my reaction.
I'd open my legs wider to show my acquiescence, but his grip on my thighs
was ironclad. Looking down, I tried to communicate I didn’t intend to
protest. In fact, a different thought crossed my mind.
The tech mogul, the all-powerful CEO, Ajax Sinclair, was kneeling on the
floor between my knees. The man was listed on Forbes 30 Under 30 as one
of the brightest entrepreneurs under thirty. The man, identified as one of the
most impressive men in the world, was shoving my shirt up and staring at
every inch of me as if his next breath was impossible without me.
Pride didn’t begin to describe my feelings for the success he had attained.
However, something more than pride was coursing through me. It made me
feel worshipped to know everyone in our vicinity catered to this man while
he catered to me. The world kneeled for him, yet he willingly kneeled for
me. If anything, he treated it as a privilege.
It was humbling.
I had no idea why I never looked at Ajax this way, but it was a turn-on.
Ajax leaned closer to press small kisses on my thighs, gently teasing me.
His lips moved to my core. My legs shook as he licked and nipped at the
sensitive flesh, making me moan when he kissed my vulva.
My mouth parted as he picked up the pace. His tongue pressed against my
clit, hot and wet pressure localized on one spot. He licked me with manic
hunger as if he couldn’t live without it. Starved.
“Ajax,” I panted, throwing my head back.
My hands moved over his bare shoulders. I moaned when he ran his tongue
along my inner lips and frantically pulled at his hair. Inadvertently, I tried to
close my legs, but Ajax was having none of it. He parted them with two
strong hands for more access. His mouth on my cunt made me desperate for
more, writhing under him. I ground my hip against him and prayed for
relief.
“God, I need you inside me right fucking now.”
Ajax’s eyes flipped in shock. It was the last thing he expected to hear,
though I could hardly focus on it because the ache between my thighs was
insufferable.
“Ajax, please,” I pleaded.
Ajax crawled up my body, kissing his way as I laid back on the bed. He
unbuttoned the top two buttons of my shirt and slid my bra cups to the sides
to expose my breasts. Ajax took one of my hardened nipples into his mouth,
sucking hard without clamping down.
Ajax hovered over my face. Snaking one hand into my hair and the other
around my waist, he slammed his lips onto mine.
It was one of those bruising kisses. Rough. Heady, all tongue, lips, teeth.
We kissed each other desperately, as if our lives depended on it, our harsh
breaths filling the room.
Ajax ran his fingers through my swollen core. Teasing me. Rubbing me. His
length pressed against my pussy, grinding against me as I circled my hands
around his neck to pull him closer.
“You're shaking,” he whispered abruptly before pulling back.
“What?” I frowned, confused by the interruption. “What are you talking
about?”
“Baby, you are shuddering,” he repeated.
I didn’t realize he was correct until glancing at the hand resting on his
bicep. My fingers were shaking. Looking down, so was my entire body. I
was sweating.
“You are scared of me,” he observed quietly. Ajax looked... sad. Incredibly
sad. Fuck.
“No, I'm just nervous,” I quickly explained.
Ajax gave out a laugh that sounded more like a scoff. “You are a terrible
liar.”
“It isn’t intentional.”
“We both know you're scared of me, but if this is going to work, I need you
to feel safe.”
“Ajax, I’m not scared.”
“You are,” he insisted. “You’re scared because I can physically overpower
you, but you also scare the shit out of me. The physical control is
momentary, but your emotional control over me isn’t temporary. I don’t
think you understand that yet. Until you do,” he studied my face and
whispered, “let’s try something different.”
Ajax.
“Let’s try something different. So that you can learn to trust me again.”
Raven waited patiently for my explanation. She stared with wide eyes and
nodded, worried eyes inquiring the same question on my mind—how?
I moved back from the bed and sat on the floor, leaning against the wooden
desk table. Undoing my jeans, I lifted my hips to slide them off. Raven gave
my body a once over.
The years without Raven left me… frustrated. I had lost interest in sex.
Correction. I was interested in sex, but with only one specific person. It
wasn’t hyperbole when I told her she had ruined me for other women. I
couldn’t force an attraction that I didn’t feel, for a fuck I didn’t want. Most
of my frustrations had to be taken out at the gym between my grueling work
schedules. From the looks of it, she liked the results.
“Take off your shirt,” I breathed. I sat a few feet away from the bed, leaning
against the base of the table in hopes that the distance made her feel safe.
Raven lifted the shirt above her head. It took everything in my power to
keep the stoic look in place.
“The bra too.”
Raven complied once more without argument. I dug my palm into the floor
to force myself to stay put as her perfect full tits spilled out.
“Fuck,” I heard my pained voice.
I stared, enchanted by the sight. She still looked like fucking Snow White,
with her long lashes fanning her cheeks and her parted red lips. She was the
fantasy that was finally within reach of my fingertips.
My breathing was erratic, but I refused to lose control of the situation.
“Lean back. Open your legs wide.”
Raven didn’t break our eye contact. Good girl. She leaned back slightly and
opened up. My mouth went dry as I took in her naked, vulnerable body. I
took harsh breaths to control myself from pouncing on her.
“Show me how you touch yourself.” My words came out choppy.
“What?”
“Play with yourself,” I asked more demandingly.
“Umm…” Raven hesitated. “I don’t do that.”
“Never?”
She shook her head. I masked my shock at her revelation. I didn’t want her
to feel self-conscious.
“It’s nothing to be embarrassed about. Do you know how often I jerk off
thinking about you? My dick twitches if I look at you.”
Raven blushed, eyes widening. Her chest rose and fell heavily.
“Move your hand down, baby. Don’t overthink it.”
Raven moved her hand at a languid pace.
“Use two fingers to make small circles. Yeah, just like that.”
I fixed my gaze on Raven playing with herself, panting in pleasure. It was
more erotic than I had imagined. I stroked my cock, pleasuring myself to
the sight of her fingers on her clit.
“Are you wet, Raven?”
My head kicked back when she nodded, eyes rolling to the back of my
head. I stroked myself harder. I panted, watching her heavy-lidded eyes
fixed on me.
“Fuck. Rub your clit, baby, more, faster.”
Raven rubbed her clit and hissed. “Ahh…”
“That’s it, baby. Don’t stop,” I growled with restraint.
Raven didn’t back down and maintained eye contact.
“Open your legs wider. I want to see that perfect pink pussy of yours.”
“Fuck,” Raven ground out.
“Move your other hand to your tit and pinch your nipple.”
Raven didn’t need my instructions anymore. She vigorously worked herself,
having found her rhythm. I was distracted as fuck by her fingers, which had
picked up the pace.
I gripped my dick tighter. “God, I’ll never get enough of you. I want to
pound your tight pussy so hard until you come for me every goddamn
time.”
“Oh, God, Ajax,” Raven moaned in a low voice.
“I want to lick that pussy of yours till you come on my mouth over and—”
Raven’s intensified moans cut off my voice as she clenched.
“I want to make you squirt and drench my dick. I want you to do it again in
my mouth while I eat you out.”
“I’m about to come,” Raven parted her lips to let out her whimpers, her
orgasm hitting her hard and making her body clench. “Fuck, Ajax.”
“Fuck,” I echoed. I came with my eyes fixated on her, cum landing on my
thighs and hand.
I leaned back against the wooden desk. The room was filled with both of
our heavy breathing. A hit of fucking ecstasy, and she was yet to touch me.
However, I wasn’t done. I moved toward her. “Baby, I need you to relax.”
Raven nodded, still coming down from her high. The afterglow of her
orgasm would hopefully divert her body’s adverse reactions. I moved
Raven’s fingers to the side and spread her legs wider to bury my face
between them to finish what I had started.
Raven sounded ready to explode when I sucked on her clit. “Oh, God,
Ajax.” She was overstimulated, her fingers digging into my hair. “I can’t…
again.”
“Yes, you can,” I muttered against her pussy, lapping at her wet cunt, tasting
the juices flowing freely.
Her thighs quacked around my head as she came. She called out my name
over and over. Raven’s body shuddered, but this time for a different reason.
I sighed in relief, kissing the inside of her thigh. By the time I cleaned the
cum residue, Raven might as well have been comatose.

Raven.
Ajax interrupted my lull with an unexpected question. “There is something
else I have meant to talk to you about.”
I peeked open one eye as Ajax dragged me over his chest. “Sure.”
“What were your feelings for me back then?”
“Do you mean when we first started sleeping together?”
Ajax nodded, eyes intense as ever.
“I-I don’t know. I think the imbalance of power in our relationship didn’t
leave room to view you as a romantic partner,” I admitted hastily.
Yes, I was attracted to Ajax back then, but we were at different points in our
lives. Our dynamic was different. It wasn’t that Ajax dominated the
relationship because he was a man. Age wasn't the problem, either. I dated
other older men. The problem was he held more power while I was a minor
and was legally under his protection. I often wished Ajax had waited to
express his interest later in our lives instead of leading with a sexual
relationship.
When Ajax didn’t respond, I babbled nervously. “It was already difficult for
me to process romantic feelings. All I witnessed were broken relationships
stemming from romance, and my only definition of love became friendship
and family. I guess you could say I put all my eggs in that basket, and my
heart simply wasn’t open to entertaining any other types of love.”
I glanced at Ajax, hoping my long explanation was sufficient.
“Friendship type of love? Is that why you agreed to be in a relationship with
Reid?”
Ay, vey. This was another difficult conversation. I could tell Ajax’s mood
was quickly shifting.
“Reid was there for me during some difficult times,” I explained. “Mia and
Reid felt like my only family for the longest time. When he presented
logical arguments about how a relationship between us could be for the
better, I couldn’t decline.”
“So, he manipulated you?”
I was taken aback by the harsh words. “I didn’t say that.”
“You implied it.”
“Are you telling me you’ve never manipulated me?” I asked in a frustrated
voice.
It was hypocritical for Ajax to say this. All three Sinclair siblings, Ajax
included, had manipulated me at times. It wasn’t intentional. They did it
absentmindedly. Would I let another person without the Sinclair last name
get away with the same things?
Hell no.
Why did I look the other way when it came to them?
In every way, each Sinclair had done more for me than my parents, who
brought me to life. Gratitude for the Sinclairs will always exist in my heart.
The way I saw it, it was picking your battles. If it was something I could
provide without an extensive fight with myself, it made me happy to do so.
I was a Sinclair pleaser, remember? Reid knew I didn't view him
romantically. All he asked of me was to try for something more.
Was I aware he worded his argument in a way that would resonate with me?
Yes.
Could that be considered manipulation? Perhaps.
All the same, did it change anything? No.
Reid drew a picture of the type of life I had always wanted. I wasn't
interested in anyone else, and I never thought Ajax and I would be in this
position. It would have meant the world to Reid if I had agreed to
something more. At the time, nothing was holding me back from
considering it. Ajax was unforgiving of a simple consideration.
“Now I’m the one manipulating you?” Ajax snapped.
“Ajax, I don’t want to argue over this. When I agreed to Reid’s proposition,
we hadn’t seen each other in years, and you weren’t exactly my favorite
person. Things have changed between us. I feel differently for you. We are
different now. Can we just focus on us?”
Ajax searched my eyes for a minute, contemplating. After the momentary
pause, he addressed the other elephant in the room. “Do you want to talk
about your anxiety?”
I tensed. “I’m fine, Ajax. Sometimes, random things set me off. That’s all.”
He nodded against me, waiting for me to expand.
I said nothing more.
Tiptoeing inside Ajax’s room, I placed the tray with coffee, juice,
and French toast on his nightstand. I sat on the bed to inspect if he was
close to waking up. I wasn’t surprised Ajax was still asleep. It was late by
the time we returned from his condo.
Ajax had asked if I wanted to stay the night at his place. The idea was
tempting, but Ajax was already on edge about my supposed subconscious
and physiological reactions. I didn’t want to risk him hearing any
nightmares, which he would if we were to sleep in the same bed. That
would be backward momentum after finally taking giant leaps forward.
Using my fingers, I brushed the hair off his eyes. Ajax didn’t have the
covers on, allowing easy access to every part of his hard and contoured
body. His boxers hung low enough to expose his V-cut, and I took a sharp
breath, eyes trailing down.
Ajax finally opened his eyes. When I beamed at him, he rewarded me with
the Sinclair megawatt smile. “Good morning.”
I laughed. “It’s not morning. It’s noon, Sleeping Beauty.”
Rubbing his eyes, he let out a yawn mixed with a groan. "If I’m Sleeping
Beauty, aren’t I supposed to be woken with true love’s kiss?”
“Do you want me to go find you your Prince Charming?”
Ajax turned his face away dramatically and closed his eyes, somehow
looking cuter. “I can’t hear anything you say unless I'm kissed and woken
up.”
“Fine, you fucking liar.” I leaned over to kiss him on the cheek. “Oh, and
thank you for the flowers. They’re beautiful,” I whispered.
While at his condo, Ajax had someone deliver flowers to the house. Mom
put them in my room, waiting for me upon arrival. His systematic efforts
made my day. Sometimes it was coffee, and sometimes it was flowers or
anything that reminded him of me. My favorite was when he left Post-it
Notes in my room with messages. I collected them in the same box where
his lunch notes were stored back in the day.
“You’re welcome.”
“Now, how about you get up so we can have lunch since the breakfast I
brought you is ruined?” The tray of food appeared sad. The coffee was cold.
The French toast looked soggy. I should have woken Ajax instead of ogling
at him. “I’ll buy you lunch with my new hard-earned cash.”
“You’re offering to be my sugar momma?” His lips quirked up. “You know
what? I’ve always wanted to be a trophy husband.”
“Did you now?" I asked dryly. “Is that why you studied so hard and
attended Columbia?”
“Exactly. I was trying to scope out potential future doctors and lawyers who
would want a good-looking trophy husband to raise the kids at home.”
“Ugh,” I sighed exasperatedly. “That sounds genius. Trophy wives have it
so good. All they have to do is look good and give good blow jobs.”
“You sound envious of trophy wives, baby. If you want to change your
career path, I'm not opposed to it. Might someone be considering giving up
their promising career for a life of blow jobs and looking pretty?”
“Someone is not,” I pointed out indignantly. “But it’s a genius career path.
It requires minimum education and qualifications. The least amount of
investment for the highest return.”
“Let me know if you want me to make your dreams come true.” Ajax
abruptly jumped off the bed before tossing over his shoulder, “Don’t move
from the bed.”
“Why?”
“Just stay there,” he barked.
I rolled my eyes at his domineering tone. “Just stay there… please,” I
corrected.
Ajax made a beeline for the bathroom. “Yes, yes. You’re trying to teach me
how to talk to you like you’re my equal. Noted.”
“Well, if you want me to be your girlfriend, talking to me like your equal
comes with the territory.”
Ajax peeked from the open bathroom door with a toothbrush hanging off
his mouth. He disappeared out of sight to rinse before returning to the door
frame.
He smirked at me cockily. “You’re my girlfriend?”
My jaw dropped in disbelief. “That’s all you took away from what I said?”
He faked a pensive look. “Yes. To be honest, I haven’t sowed my wild oats.
I don’t know if I’m ready for the commitment or that label.”
“If you don’t want the label, you should stop telling people I’m your
girlfriend behind my back."
He flashed me another arrogant smile. I’d heard Ajax threaten Brandon
continuously to stay away from his girl. Whenever our family members
asked about our relationship, Ajax slipped in the word boyfriend multiple
times, even telling them I was the future Mrs. Sinclair.
Ajax needed the world to know I was his because he could never say it. As
for myself, I needed trust, respect, and to feel safe around my significant
other.
Closing my eyes, I collapsed backward on the bed as it was calling my
name. My eyes only flew open when I felt a pair of lips on me.
Ajax tried not to touch me abruptly. He made sure to tread heavily to the
bed so I’d hear his footsteps. Ajax made a display of rustling and dipped the
mattress extra hard with his knee. I was curious to see how far he was
willing to take it. I was half expecting him to ring a gong.
He’s working on making me feel safe.
“I didn’t want to kiss you with morning breath,” he murmured.
“You’ve never had morning breath,” I said because it was true—a weird
phenomenon.
“You never know.”
I wrapped my arms around his neck and my legs around his waist. He
smiled, and it made me want to stop breathing. What was happening to me?
Fuck. The way he looked at me made me feel like the most desired woman
on this planet.
There was a whisper in my ear, “Rave?”
“Hmm?”
“Did you stay up all night again?”
Ajax hated my sleep schedule or when I pinched myself to wake up. Not to
mention, the dark circles under my eyes weren’t cute. Some days, I was so
fucking delusional from lack of sleep that I couldn’t tell if I was dreaming
or if stuff was happening. It was embarrassing, but I had run into doors
from my haze.
“Rave, you can’t keep taking Ambien just to sleep for an hour or two. You
know how dangerous they are.”
“Ajax,” I groaned. “Please, it’s late. No lectures.”
“It’s not late, baby. It’s mid-day, remember? And my lectures are good for
the soul. We can discuss what’s causing your lack of sleep if you like.”
That would gut him. I couldn’t bear to be another person Ajax worried
about. The number of all-nighters he had pulled this month had my heart
twisting. All the shit he did for this family was enough stress for one man.
“We can work on identifying the issues and come up with a plan
accordingly,” Ajax continued with the lecture I had sleepily tuned out with
my musings. “I’m serious, baby. We have to work on this. It’s getting
worse.”
“I will,” I agreed because otherwise, this man would call every therapist
and specialist under the sun if he hadn’t done so already.
Ajax sighed, pressing more light kisses over my face. I hummed
contentedly. How come it was never this good between us before?
“Good. Now, feed me my breakfast.”
“Excuse me.”
“My breakfast,” Ajax repeated. “Feed it to me.”
Rolling my eyes, I humored his ass and located the knife and fork. Cutting
through the now soggy French toast with a fork in one hand and knife in the
other, I lifted it to his mouth and inwardly grimaced.
Ajax took a bite of the toast, and his poker face crumbled. “That’s
disgusting.”
I acted offended but couldn’t hold in my laughter. “Hey, I worked hard on
that.”
“Really, baby? Did you work hard or just place an order and put it on a
plate?”
My face split open. I had no fucking idea how to make French toast. Ajax
loved French toast, so I ordered it from his favorite breakfast spot.
“I cut up the strawberry and put it on the toast myself,” I proudly
announced while Ajax chuckled. “And the coffee,” I added. It had to count
for something. “Also, the orange juice.”
“You mean you poured orange juice from a bottle into a glass.”
“Well, I held the glass while Mom poured it.”
Ajax’s laughter echoed through the room. “Baby, you are pathetic in the
kitchen.”
“That’s not true.” I tried to make my case. “What happened to it’s the
thought that counts?”
“People only say that when they do thoughtless things.”
I feigned a dramatic show of leaving. I sprung from the bed, but Ajax
grabbed my elbow to halt me.
It all happened so fast. One moment we were joking around. The next,
startled by his sudden move, I attempted to dig the sharp end of the knife
into my thigh.
Ajax’s quick reflexes kicked in. He immediately grabbed my hand before
the knife could do any damage. Prying it out of my hand, he scooped me
into his lap in another swift move.
His hands frantically inspected the thigh area around my shorts. When he
didn’t notice any damage, he held on to me tightly, occasionally kissing my
shoulder.
Neither of us spoke. Ajax held on to me as if scared I’d disappear into thin
air.
“Ajax, I...” I trailed off, unsure of what the hell just happened.
“It’s okay,” he quickly assured, almost as if he was saying it to himself.
“I didn’t mean to scare you.”
“You didn’t scare me, baby.” He reached over to kiss my cheek.
“I think I did,” I argued quietly.
“You didn’t.” He placed small kisses all over my face. Ajax discarded the
knife in the trash as if it’d come back to cut me open.
Leaning back on his pillow, Ajax held me to his chest. His usual blank
expression fell for a fleeting moment, allowing me to see a face I had never
seen on him before, terror mixed with apprehension.
The wheels were turning in Ajax’s head.
Ajax.
“Baby,” I said patiently. “We have to talk about what happened—”
“I know,” Raven cut me off swiftly.
Lifting herself off the bed, Raven stood a few feet away. I rose as well,
grabbing a pair of sweatpants off the ground.
After what just transpired, I shouldn’t be in Raven’s vicinity. She was
reacting to me in the most unpredictable of ways. Raven could have
seriously hurt herself if I weren’t quick to respond.
Next time I might not be quick enough.
I didn’t want to admit it, but her symptoms had worsened. Lack of sleep.
Poor appetite. Lack of engagement. I found her lying around in her bed,
resembling Tessa. The sight left me horrified.
It was true Raven couldn’t help her adverse reactions. I had noticed her
frustration with controlling these physical responses for days. We had to
talk about this. She just tried to stab herself with a fucking knife; safety
concerns trumped everything else.
“Is there anything I can do to help you feel more comfortable sharing?”
Raven paced my room. Her eyes flickered over every so often, appearing
tense. Her analytical brain moved rapidly as if trying to draw a conclusion.
“It would help if I could ask you more questions about your past,” she
finally said.
I was unsure how it’d help her to know more about my past, but I was eager
to expedite this process before something worse happened. “Sure,” I sighed.
“You said you haven’t had sex in the last few years.”
“That’s correct.”
“So, the last time you had sex—”
Without letting her finish, I blurted out, “The day before you left for Paris.”
We both took an audible breath.
I thought Raven was about to bring up the last time we had sex. In my haste
to distract her, I brought up the worst night of Raven’s life, the root of her
nightmares.
There were two significant nights in our lives. The last time we had sex and
the night before Raven left for Paris.
The last time we had sex was the “incident.” It was the worst night of my
life.
The night before Raven left for Paris was the worst night of her life.
Raven stared at me blankly before shaking her head as if chasing the
memory away. “During that time, did you try anything other than sex to
climax? I know some people are into playing and bondage—”
“No,” I answered without hesitation.
“Nothing else got you off?” Her voice was devoid of all humor, unlike last
time.
“No,” I answered again, unable to leave out the irritation in my voice this
time.
“Have you ever tried BDSM?” Raven ignored my tone.
“Sure,” I admitted unsurely.
“Are you into it?”
“A few people I slept with were into it.”
“What did they want you to do to them?” she pressed.
“Tying them up, handcuffs, spanking, whipping—”
“Like hurting them?”
“If that’s what they wanted,” I said as if it was no big deal, hoping to move
on.
“Dominating them?”
“Sometimes.”
“How about role play? Have you done role play?” Raven determinedly
perused ahead.
“Yes.”
“Did it ever include forced sex fantasies?” Raven asked much too casually.
I froze.
I finally understood why Raven had been so curious about my history. It
wasn’t because it was an off-limit topic. Raven was trying to discover if my
sexual history shaped the outcome of what happened between us, so I didn’t
have to take equal responsibility for my actions.
Unlike what Raven believed, I didn’t have a morbid past.
I lost my shit because Raven was a part of me, and being without her was
the same as being without the most vital organs and pieces of my body.
There were no reasons for my actions other than pure deprivation of her.
“No,” I answered stoically.
“Have you ever forced yourself on anyone else other than me?” Raven
asked eerily.
She had every right to an answer, though it didn’t help with the tightness in
my chest.
“No, Raven,” I said slowly. “I’ve never forced myself on anyone else.”
Raven opened her mouth again, but I cut her off. “Before you ask, I’ll make
this easy for you. I don’t have any sexual trauma. No childhood abuse. No
particular kinks. Nothing that interests me about forcing or dominating a
woman. The only sexual preference I have is my unquenchable thirst for
you.”
“So, it is me,” Raven muttered. “I started this because I am toxic.” Her
words weren’t laced with venom. Just sadness.
“No, Rave—” I started, my voice hardly above a whisper, when I noticed
her unintentional actions.
Catching her forearm, I inspected the red marks she had just made from
pinching herself silly. I cupped her face to turn her to me while pulling her
close.
My hold on Raven tightened while she hugged me back just as fiercely
SIX WEEKS PRIOR – THE INCIDENT.
Ajax.
I tried Tessa’s psychiatrist for the tenth time and slammed the
phone down when no one answered. He gave us this number to contact him,
but he barely picked up.
He was supposed to have someone on-call for emergencies, but they were
also useless. She suggested taking Tessa to the hospital, but Tessa didn’t
need hospitalization. Her side effects were long gone. We just wanted to
know what caused it.
Everyone was so fucking useless.
I sat at the desk in my parent’s bedroom, pouring over Tessa’s history and
physical reports to determine which ingredient in her drug caused an
interaction. There were two doctors in the house, but none were familiar
with this drug since it was part of a clinical trial. Until now, the medication
had been working well.
Tessa started having tremors at brunch earlier today, lost muscle control,
and had a full-blown seizure. It was a jarring sight, especially for Raven’s
parents.
Tessa had incredibly low self-esteem. She was easily swayed by other
people’s opinions and often felt down about herself. Paranoid about what
others might think, she often refused to leave her bedroom or interact with
others.
Tessa was horrified this happened in front of Raven’s parents. Embarrassing
this family was one of her biggest insecurities. Tessa didn’t recover from
setbacks quickly. This was a well-known fact in the Sinclair home, the
reason everyone was so nervous. That’s why we always put our differences
aside whenever Tessa-related issues spiral out of control. There was only
one other time things got this out of control.
At that time, Dad was working in the Cayman Islands. Mia and Raven were
worried about Tessa’s deteriorating depression. I saw the effect it was
having on them. So, I decided to send Tessa to Grand Cayman and have
Dad care for her.
It was the only time I refused to take care of Tessa. Reid, Raven, and Mia
were younger. I needed to prioritize their needs over hers.
For a while, Tessa was on a better path. I had hoped she’d turn things, but
she fluctuated over the years.
I tried the doctor again and hung up when there was no answer. I stared at
the inanimate object. There was one more person I should call. I needed to
know Reid was okay.
After she fell down the stairs, Reid came by Raven’s room to check on her,
only to find her sleeping on my chest. He stayed at the house long enough
to ensure she was conscious. Past that, he couldn’t deal with seeing us
together.
Reid had been absent from the family for long periods before and had a
habit of going down a path of self-destruction. I had no fucking idea how to
verify if he was alright.
It was odd.
I wanted my brother, Reid, to be alright.
I also wanted to murder Raven’s new romantic interest, Reid.
On top of the stress over Reid and Tessa, work had been insane, and I had
become the new financier for the living expenses of the seven people
residing in this home. Sure, I had money, but New York was expensive, and
these people were used to a luxurious lifestyle.
I glanced at the bed and focused on the beautiful girl by Tessa’s side. At
least I had her again. I let her face enact its usual magic to alleviate the
other shit.
Raven leaned against the headboard, her dark hair covering part of the dress
she had worn at brunch. Raven looked like the peace I needed, surrounded
by the chaos I wanted to avoid.
Tessa was lying on a pillow while Raven stroked her hair. Dad sat in the
armchair with his eyes closed, head leaning backward, appearing utterly
defeated. Mia was huddled up, her head resting on Tessa’s pillow.
This scene was exhausting. I stared at the paperwork spread across the
table. Calling more doctors or going through yet another report was
daunting.
A soft touch on my shoulders jolted me out of it. “Are you okay?”
I squinted to focus on Raven’s blurred-out face. The floor lamp behind her
created a halo-like effect around her head, making her look like an
answered prayer.
“Yeah,” I responded quietly. “Are you?”
Raven nodded. “Do you want me to help you look over the H&P reports?”
I was sure my face gave away my shock. Everyone assumed I’d take care of
the next steps, but only one person was still ready to lessen my burden.
Raven didn't wait for my confirmation and pulled up a chair. “I don’t know
if you recall, but I used to write down every one of Tessa’s bad episodes.
They’re documented by date and symptoms. I told Mia to keep up the same
log. Here.” Raven dug out a thick notebook and handed it to me. “If I
remember correctly, Tessa experienced tremors while on her old
antidepressant drug. We can check for the active ingredient in that drug and
cross-reference it to see if the same ingredient is in this new drug.”
Raven sorted through the paperwork, ready to mark all possible medication
culprits with her trusty highlighter.
“Since this is a clinical trial, there’s no way to know the side effects and
possible interactions, but we can check out the online support group they
created for everyone in the trial. We can ask if anyone else experienced
similar symptoms.”
I watched her work at manic speed, transfixed by her hazel orbs. She
discussed different ideas for a plan of care without so much as taking a
breath.
Raven finally paused. “Ajax, you look exhausted. If you want to take a
break, I don’t mind looking over this.”
“No, I’m fine.” And I genuinely was.
I was no longer thinking of work, finances, my crazy family, or my
emotionally devastated, missing brother. All I saw was her, the only person
to matter. The only person to make me sane and also the reason for my
insanity.
“Does that feel good, baby?”
“Yeaa—” Raven moaned, eyes droopy and words slurred.
I hiked her dress further up to the base of her neck. My eyes peeked behind
her at Dad’s and Mia’s silhouettes through the kitchen window. Raven was
pinned against a tree in our backyard while I fucked her as quietly as
possible.
It was goddamn near impossible when she was this tempting, agreeable, and
vocal.
I hoped this corner was dark and far away enough to fly under the radar. We
had ten minutes before Dad or Mia came outside looking for us.
Yes. Yes. I was a monster. Especially after Raven so sweetly put aside our
differences to help me with Tessa.
I knew she was only letting me back in her life because we were family and
in a unique predicament. Like myself, her kryptonite was love, but for this
family. When Tessa spiraled out of control, the rest of us banded together. It
wasn’t far-fetched for Raven to be a team player right now.
Plus, tonight wasn’t entirely my fault.
After all the shit with Tessa, Dad and I needed a drink. We were having a
glass of brandy in the kitchen when a frustrated Mia and Raven charged us.
Wordlessly, Mia opened a bottle of vodka while Raven grabbed two shot
glasses. Dad and I stared in disbelief as my underaged little sister pounded a
shot with my ex-ward slash current girlfriend (for all intents and purposes).
After Mia and Raven slammed their glasses down, Dad reached for two
more, placing them in front of Raven so she could pour four shots instead of
two. Instead of disciplining Mia, I joined them. We all needed a drink after
that mindfuck. So, the four of us quietly took one more shot.
By the fourth round, my eyes were trained on Raven. Her cheeks were
flushed, and her words were slurring. Not to mention, she was being
friendly toward me.
I never approved of Raven or Reid drinking as teenagers, though the few
times she came home tipsy after a party was undeniable. The girl got horny
when she was drunk. I was already close to losing my mind, and Raven was
the only anchor I needed. I was in no position to discourage what was
happening.
Except, I needed her at an intoxicated level, not an incapacitated level.
I put a hand over her shot glass when Dad poured the next round. I let him
know she looked flushed and dragged her outside for fresh air. Raven was
too drunk to protest.
After a quick assessment, I sought the darkest corner with a tree and picked
her up with one hand. Raven was giggling and receptive. I threw my
peacoat around her, pushed her against the tree, and hefted her so the tree
bark wouldn’t bruise her beautiful skin.
With her dress hiked up and her thong pushed to the side, Raven bounced
on my cock. Her dress had a built-in bra, so it was easy to expose her
perfect breasts. I loved that Raven wore dresses around the house, most
likely to appease Theressa.
My hands roamed the front of her body. Raven’s nipples were hard from the
cold. I slightly pinched one, causing her to inhale sharply.
“I missed you,” I said against the shell of her ear before licking it.
Raven groaned. “Ajax—”
My lips were on her neck as I undid my belt and pants. Raven wasn’t
fighting back tonight. Instead, she fisted my shirt with her hands and
mumbled something unintelligible.
With one hand under her ass and the other holding my cock, I rubbed it
between her folds. She was wet, but not nearly enough.
I slid two fingers inside her mouth.
“Baby, suck on my fingers.”
For a moment, Raven did nothing. When I stroked her tongue again, Raven
sucked on my fingers. I retracted them, replacing them with my mouth for a
deep kiss. She tasted like hard liquor, her tongue moving lazily against
mine.
Using the lubricated fingers, I reached for her cunt and stroked her core
until she let out another moan.
“You like that, baby?”
“Yeah,” she choked out.
“Do you have any idea how beautiful you are?” I murmured, pressing my
digits on her clit.
Raven whimpered against my mouth. “Ajax, don't let go."
Fuck. Me.
I didn't know if she meant physically or metaphorically, but I could barely
restrain my growl as I slipped inside her slick heat.
“Fuck.” I kissed her parted lips.
The dirty talk spilled out of me, demanding admission for the things she
refused to acknowledge.
“Tell me you want me.”
“Mmhmm.”
Shoving my cock deeper, I grabbed her face and explored her mouth. Her
hands landed on my chest for balance as her juices spread wetly between
us.
“Fuck,” I growled, her cunt suctioning me relentlessly. “Do you like me
fucking your tight little pussy?”
“Oh, God.” Raven groaned, tilting her head back.
I held her firmly in place, shuddering from her soaked pussy. Her quick
reaction had my cock jerking inside. “Fuck. Fuck.” Mashing my teeth, I
gripped her hip for control.
“Oh God,” Raven shuddered, moaning incoherently as my fingers moved
deftly on her swollen core.
“Scream my name when you come,” I hissed.
“Ajax.” Raven arched her back and called out my name. Her cries of
ecstasy were almost a little too loud.
That’s all it took for me to spill inside her. “God, Rave.” I punched the tree
bark.
Panting hard against her mouth, I found Raven in a near-comatose state
from her orgasm.
“Hi, pretty girl.” I smiled, but Raven was already snuggling against me, her
eyes drifting shut.
I quickly smoothed her dress and fixed my clothes. By the time I was done,
Raven had no interest in walking, arms wrapped around my neck.
“Raven had a little too much to drink,” I announced, entering the kitchen
with Raven curled up in my arms. “She looked about to pass out on the
patio, so I’m going to put her to bed.”
“You kids can’t handle your liquor,” Dad jested.
“You guys weren’t on the patio.” Mia pointed out, tilting her head to the
side.
I glared at Mia before turning to Dad. “Don’t let her drink anymore.” I
nodded at Mia and waited until Dad put away the liquor bottle. “Good
night.”
As I left, Mia’s frown followed me.
Whatever. As far as they were concerned, Raven was my girl, and I could
put her to bed if I wanted. I was positive Raven had intended to correct our
families about our relationship status, but her plan was interrupted when
larger problems presented themselves. Since the focus had shifted to Tessa,
Raven hadn’t bothered to address the status quo of our romantic
relationship, nor had anyone asked us about it. There were more pressing
matters in the house.
While Raven was distracted, I willfully slipped in terms such as girlfriend
and future Mrs. Sinclair as frequently as possible to get our parents
accustomed. I needed to solidify this before Raven snapped out of the Tessa
orbit.
However, two people remained unconvinced—my siblings. Reid wasn’t
here, and Mia was also stuck in the same Tessa orbit.
For me, Tessa was just another obligation and an item on my to-do list. Mia
wasn’t so jaded, which worked out in my favor because, for once, Mia was
distracted.
My room was the master. Though I was barely in New York anymore and
owned a condo, my parents never switched back. It was more private than
Raven’s room, so I brought her here. I had barely undressed her when
Raven closed her eyes.
It had been years since Raven slept in my bed, though all I wanted to do
was wake her up. She was right here for the taking. Pliable. Vulnerable.
Unresistant. I drew imaginary lines on her arm. Dipping my head down, I
kissed and licked my way across her bottom lip.
“Mmm…” Raven moved her face sleepily when I gently bit down.
Dropping down, I made a trail by licking every part of her bare skin. I
tasted the subtle vanilla flavor of her breasts, her navel, and the cleft of her
vulva. Moving my body further down, I made a space for myself between
her thighs.
My hands parted her legs apart with my tongue at her slit.
Raven’s hips bucked as she moaned.
I lapped at her wet folds, my head wedged between her thighs. Raven’s
sleepy moans turned louder as I sucked on her clit.
Fuck, she tasted so good. I’d never get enough of the taste of her pussy and
throbbing clit in my mouth.
Raven shuddered in her sleep, spurring me on. I buried my face in her,
stabbing my tongue inside her walls, starving to make her come.
I licked her punishingly hard as Raven gave a strangled cry, head thrashing
back and forth. “Oh, my God.” Raven woke midway through her orgasm.
Still coming, her back arched off the mattress. I increased the friction to
lengthen her climax, the movement of my tongue slowing but the pressure
staying strong.
“Fuck,” she sobbed, hands fisting the comforter.
I crawled up her body and rubbed my dick against her pussy. Raven panted,
having barely come down from her high.
“I need you, baby,” I moaned into her mouth, hardly restraining myself. She
was so beautiful, her hair disheveled and her lips bruised from my kisses.
Raven was still drunk and horny, and responsive, despite the spurts of sleep.
Slowly, I sheathed myself inside her again, keeping her recently injured leg
in mind.
“Holy shit,” I groaned through my clenched teeth.
I fucked her slowly, savoring every thrust to push her into a gradual climax.
In her current state, Raven mirrored the way I generally responded to her.
Like she’d go crazy in her need for me. She squirmed for friction, arms
wrapping around my neck to pull me closer.
“God.” Raven bit down on her bottom lip as she went off.
“Fuck.” I followed her into the same obscurity of pleasure, inhaling her
scent like it was the oxygen I needed to stay alive.
Afterward, I idly stared at Raven, playing with her hair. She was barely
lucid, eyes fluttering. I kissed her eyelids, lips moving languidly over her
cheeks.
I stopped upon feeling Raven tremble underneath.
I leaned back to survey her. “What the—”
Her eyes widened as if waking from a bad dream. Her arms flayed, and she
was covered in night sweat. She was fully shuddering, though unable to
speak in her strangled voice.
What the fuck.
Taken back by the turn of events, I quickly pulled out and urgently shook
her. “Rave!”
Raven appeared to be experiencing a fear-induced night terror with her eyes
fully open. She was unresponsive while staring at me with hatred.
Shit. I had only seen that look on her face once before, and I never wanted a
repeat. “Baby,” I tried again. “What’s going on?”
Raven remained mute, though I realized it wasn’t from a lack of trying. She
was in shock.
“Raven, can you talk to me?” I shook her again, hoping to jar her out of this
panic.
Despite my best efforts, her symptoms continued. Without any other avail, I
pulled the covers over her and held her tightly until her breathing evened
out. Eventually, Raven calmed down, mostly into a lull due to the liquor.
Fuck. Was that the after-effect of being with me?
I promised myself I wouldn’t do this to her again, and things would be
different this time.
I thought Raven only freaked out if I forced her. Technically, I didn’t force
her tonight. Perhaps my proximity alone terrified her into grueling
repercussions.
While Raven didn’t post much on social media, Reid did. Looking at their
photos over the last couple of years, I couldn't help but notice she was
happy. Yet, Raven had been different since her return.
Raven made my life better, while Reid made everything better for her. If I
couldn’t do that for her… the worst thoughts popped into my mind.
Thoughts like, perhaps it'd be better if I stayed away from her.
I quickly shelved away the peculiar thought. It wasn’t an option. I had never
entertained such a thing. I simply had to find an alternative.
My gaze remained horizontal, still obsessing over the only woman I
wanted.
Her gaze remained vertical, hating every part of me.
She can hate me all she wants. That’s alright. I love her enough for both of
us.
THE PRESENT.
Raven.
Mia charged through my open bedroom door with purpose. I rose
from the bed to greet her. “Hey.”
Instead of responding, Mia closed the door and hurriedly threw her arms
around me. It took a full second to register Mia was hugging me.
Ajax finally convinced Tessa to get back on her medication. Since the knife
incident yesterday, Ajax hadn’t come near me, so I had no idea how he
managed it. Seeing that Mia had been cloistered in Tessa’s room for weeks,
surely, she was relieved. So, her rampant emotions made no sense.
Nonetheless, I hugged her back tightly.
“Mia, is everything okay?”
“Yeah, I have just been so worried about you,” she whispered, refusing to
let go.
My leg had been healing slowly, but I wasn’t sure if it deserved Mia's
abrupt concern. I held her at arm's length. “Mia, I am fine.”
“I know,” Mia said through a broken smile but couldn’t keep it up. She let
out a sob, which turned into full-on tears.
“Mia!” I exclaimed. “What's wrong?”
This had to be more than her concern over my health. Was this about
college or moving out?
No. Mia had no problem in that arena. She wanted to leave this house.
What other drama did teenagers have? Boys?
“Mia.” I tried to smile but failed. “Please put me out of my misery. What's
going on?”
“I wanted to ask you that. How's everything with you?”
I gave her a confused look. “I told you, I'm fine. You don't have to worry
about me.”
“How is everything with Ajax?” she asked more pointedly.
In the shuffle of it, we hadn't had the chance to discuss my impromptu
tumble with Ajax and Reid's unprecedented reaction afterward, but I knew
we'd have to talk about the Ajax debacle eventually.
“Mia...” I hesitated. “Do you want to talk about what's going on between
Ajax and me?”
Mia gently placed one hand on my arm. “Rave, do you want to talk about
what's going on between Ajax and you?”
“S-sure if you want me to. What would you like to know?”
“Whatever you are ready to share,” Mia murmured.
I didn't respond, perplexed. I was unsure what Mia was insinuating, but her
tone kept me rooted. There was a tingly feeling in the back of my brain.
“I overheard you and Ajax yesterday.”
“What are you talking about?” I asked cautiously.
“Rave,” Mia spoke slowly. “I love Ajax. He’s not only my brother but also
the only parent I have known. I love you, too. You’re my sister.”
Mia's gaze was steady yet sympathetic. She stared at me with glossy eyes,
ready to open the floodgates again, looking at me with sadness. Immense
sadness.
Mia knew.
I had no idea what exactly she knew, but she was aware of our twisted
relationship to some extent. Like always, Mia had figured something out.
She was one of the most emotionally intelligent people, and right now, she
was gearing up for something I wasn’t ready to acknowledge.
“Rave,” Mia started again, “I love you. We all love you. No matter what
happens, I want you to know that none of this is your fault. I’m so sorry I
insinuated otherwise. Just because Ajax is my brother doesn't mean I
wouldn't support you. If you want to come forward—”
“We should go downstairs for dinner,” I cut Mia off with a glare, silently
willing her to shut up.
Had Mia lost her damn mind? Did she consider the weight of the words she
was just about to utter? Words that should never be spoken out loud or in
the light of day. If those words got out, it would tear apart Uncle Reese and
Dad's lifelong brotherhood bond. My parents would never speak to any of
the other Sinclairs and insist I did the same.
My parents were living here based on Ajax's financial support. My father
would rather be on the streets than accept Ajax's money or continue living
here if he found out what Ajax did. He would also ensure Ajax ended up in
jail. Our lives would be left in shambles.
“You don't owe Ajax anything,” Mia sighed. “If you want to come forward,
I’ll be there. I’ll support you.”
“Mia,” I warned in a stern voice. “You have no idea what you are talking
about.”
“Just because he signed some papers to be your guardian doesn't give him
the right—”
“I don't know what you think you know, but—”
“You don't have to protect him.”
“I’m not protecting anyone,” I snapped. It's the truth. I wasn’t protecting
Ajax. I’ve had plenty of opportunities for retribution, but my road to
recovery had always been redemption, never about revenge. Plus, this
situation was more complicated than I could articulate. Consent, nonconsent, force, coercion, sex, comfort…all those lines had blurred at some
point with Ajax.
I couldn't ruin our lives over blurred lines.
“Just stop talking.” I held up my hand and raised my voice. Clearly, Mia
knew enough to destroy our lives. I had to do damage control and convince
her it was all a farce. “You sound ridiculous and confused. How can you
think so little of your brother?”
“I'm not confused. I suspected something was wrong, then I overheard you
guys.”
“You heard wrong,” I said with a fake sternness I didn't feel.
“I did not. You’re in denial, which would be fine if the situation weren’t
unsafe for you.”
“Why would the situation be unsafe for me?”
“Because Raven, Ajax rape—”
“STOP!” I shrieked, the pitch of my voice making her jump.
This room was turning fucking suffocating. Maybe I could climb out the
window. Were there no exits other than the one door Mia was blocking?
“Rave.” Mia dropped her voice with more tears streaming down her cheeks.
“I’m sorry. I’m not trying to push you. You have every right to discuss this
at your pace, but I am worried about your safety. I don’t even know what
he’s doing to you. What would you do if the situation were reversed? If
someone did that to me, would you just sit back and watch?”
“Mia.” I took a horrified step back.
My mouth went dry while my eyes flickered to a familiar spot on the floor.
Terrible images danced in my head. The thought of Mia lying in that same
spot as someone she trusted trapped her and ripped into her. The idea of her
crying out for help and begging for a way out… I'd endure all kinds of hell
to protect Mia from that experience.
And that’s what Mia was trying to do, putting herself through hell to protect
me by giving up her favorite person in the world—Ajax.
Unfortunately, I viewed the world differently. Good people could do bad
things, and punishment wasn’t the only path to redemption.
Ajax was a good man who had made some terrible mistakes. Things had
changed between us, and retribution was the last thing I sought.
“Mia,” I spoke steadily. “I think there has been a terrible
misunderstanding.”
Mia shook her head. “Rave,” she whispered. “I love you, but this is your
story and your decision. I just want you to know that I’m here for you. And
I know that my brother will step up and right the wrong he did. It’s the only
way he can become the person he was meant to be.”
I should be proud of Mia. I should hug her and thank her for being there for
me. For willing to unblur the lines for my sake.
Yet, I hated everything she said.
With every word Mia uttered, she thought less of Ajax. It was written all
over her face. I was also embarrassed for myself. My little sister was
teaching me how to come forward with a #MeToo moment. It was supposed
to be my job to teach her.
Pushing past Mia, I rushed to open the bedroom door while tuning out Mia's
sobs and pleas to stay. I took the stairs and grabbed my jacket and keys
from the valet tray. After a momentary hesitation, I grabbed another key
from the tray before flinging the front door wide open to run out of this
god-forsaken home.
-----------
“Rave, what are you doing here?”
I watched Ajax sit next to me on the porch steps from my peripheral.
We were at my old brownstone, a few doors from the Sinclairs. After Dad
and I moved out, the owners started doing Airbnb. Reid and I came here
whenever the owners couldn't rent it out. I still had a key, and they never
changed the locks. It seemed like the perfect place to escape the Sinclair
drama.
For years, that family was a conundrum for me. They were a large family,
yet they were so damn lonely. Their lives seemed perfect from the outside,
but it was all a facade. I pined to be one of them, but that hope was now
burnt to a cinder.
“Mia knows,” I declared without provocation.
“I know.” When I turned my head in surprise, Ajax explained, “Mia spoke
to me. She was pretty angry.”
“I didn’t tell her,” I offered quickly.
Comforting strokes ran through my hair as we stared into the dark
backyard. “Mia’s too smart for her good.”
“She wants me to tell everyone what you did.”
Ajax glanced at me with an understanding nod. “I’m proud of her,” he said
with amusement. “All those years, I thought she was tuning out my
lectures.”
I scowled at the image of Ajax behind bars, suddenly irritated by his
presence. “Why do you Sinclairs all think alike?” I muttered under my
breath.
“We have to take responsibility for our actions. Isn’t that what I taught all of
you?”
“Or you can make better choices,” I snapped, unable to hide the sourness in
my voice. “Then there are no bad actions to take responsibility for.”
Ajax glared at me in response. “You are just upset because you fought with
Mia, and Reid’s not around to pick up the pieces,” he spat out icily.
“Aren’t you?” I asked. “He’s your brother, and he might never speak to you
again either.”
“I assumed the risk.”
He did, but he also forced me to assume the same risk. Ajax forced a choice
down my throat, ending the lifelong bond I had shared since birth.
Despite my stubborn stupor, I knew this wasn’t all Ajax’s fault unless he
orchestrated getting us discovered. Although I was beating a dead horse, I
needed him to deny it at least once. If Ajax purposefully shoved our naked
bodies in Reid’s face, it might be the cruelest thing he had done.
“What do you mean you assumed the risk? Do you mean you assumed the
risk by exposing us to our families?”
“How many times are you going to ask me the same damn question?” Ajax
asked coolly.
“Yet you’re still to give me a yes or no answer. How do you expect us to
move forward if I can't trust you? So, I’m going to ask you one more time.
Did you or did you not ask our parents and Reid to come to your room that
day?”
“No. I didn’t ask our parents to come to my room, nor did I ask Reid.”
I don’t fucking believe him.
Ajax had always been honest with me, so why the fuck didn’t I believe
him? Trust, once broken, was impossible to repair. The thought left me with
so much resentment.
I wanted my Ajax to comfort me and tell me everything will be okay. I
could never have the Ajax I wanted without the threat of the other man
lurking in his shadows. I resented the lack of trust and my body for reacting
poorly around him, although something else might help me forget this truth
of ours. I came here to find Mia’s weed stash to drown out our previous
conversation.
Moving from the stoop, I headed toward the sliding doors.
“Rave, what are you doing?” Ajax followed me.
I jiggled the key into the lock, unlocked the door, and slid it open.
“Raven,” Ajax grabbed my arm. “You can’t go in there. Have you lost your
fucking mind?”
“Yes!” I turned around with so much fury that Ajax tensed. “I’ve lost my
fucking mind. You’re not the only person who gets to lose their mind and
use it as an excuse to justify their behavior.” I jabbed my index finger at my
chest as years of pent-up resentment poured out. “Why?” I asked sharply.
“Why’d you do it? And why did you do it only to me?”
I have never forced anyone else. That’s what he told me. Why did I get to
be the lucky one? If our past hadn’t tainted us, things could have been
different between us.
“What did I ever do to you that was so horrible you had to do that to me?” I
spoke over my harsh breathing. “Speak!” I shouted. “Answer me.”
Seemingly bewildered by my accusation, Ajax remained mute.
Frustrated, I turned away to slip inside the house.
Ajax followed me, sliding the door shut. I roamed my old house, scouring
for the special floorboard where Mia hid her weed. I stiffened upon hearing
Ajax’s voice in the dark living room, barely lit by the moonlight streaming
through the windows.
“Do you remember the first time we met? We met in this room.”
I remembered. I was so excited to finally meet the Great Ajax Sinclair, the
golden boy who was a phantom to me.
“I hadn’t seen you in years, but you became a part of my family and my
best friend. We connected on a level I had never experienced. I don’t know
when I fell in love with you. I just know it’s been almost a decade, and I
still can’t pull myself out of that vortex.”
There was that word again—love. Ajax had coupled it with such atrocious
actions that it felt like an antonym.
“You’d smile at me like I was your whole world, and everyone joked about
your crush on me. However, no one knew how I felt about you. I was older,
so I had to look the other way.”
Ajax strutted toward me, refusing to let me ignore his words or walk away.
“So, when your dad asked me to take care of you, I agreed. I thought if
those lines could never be crossed, we’d outgrow the feelings. I bottled my
emotions, hoping to get over it. I didn’t. Then one day, you said you loved
me, and everything changed. I gave in, thinking we had put a lid on our
feelings for far too long.”
I inhaled sharply and stopped in my tracks in a darker part of the room.
Ajax paused as well, standing only a few feet away.
“You said no to plenty of men before me. Why didn’t you say so from the
start if you didn't want me? Why did you do it, Rave? And why did you do
it only to me? What did I ever do to you that was so horrible you had to do
that to me?”
When I didn’t respond, Ajax stepped out from the dark, face resolute for the
answer he sought.
“Answer me,” he demanded in a low voice. “Why did you go along with it
for so long and let me believe I’d finally get to be with you? Why give me
hope only to rip it away?”
I pushed against his chest on impulse. “How was I supposed to say no to
you?” I countered. “I was seventeen, and you dictated my life. You made all
my decisions, so how the hell was I supposed to choose differently when
you chose for me? A person with any sense would know better than to
pursue a high kid school under their care.”
“I didn’t have any sense left when it came to you,” Ajax chewed out. “I
didn’t see you as a high school kid. I saw you as my friend. My confidante.
I can’t say I regret it. It’s better to have been with you than never knowing
what it’s like. I was already in too deep by the time you panicked. You
broke my heart, and I didn’t know how to deal with it. I fucking lost it.”
I held up a hand. “Don’t, Ajax. Don’t tell me how I broke your heart when
you treated me like your hooker. All we did was fuck and all you said was,
Come to my room.”
The room turned deafeningly quiet as Ajax processed my words. We stared
at each other in the dark, chests rising and falling.
Minutes went by before he addressed my remark. “I was inexperienced with
relationships,” he admitted. “And you were so non-confrontational. Our
physical connection reflected our undeniable feelings, so I let it be. But
when you broke things off… Nothing is worse than being in love with
someone who doesn’t love you. It’s torture. I was looking for a way to
connect with you…” His voice trailed off with a glazed look.
This was too hard, and I couldn’t do this with a sober mind. I turned around
wordlessly to resume my original search. Confused by the sudden
movement during a deep discussion, Ajax dogged my steps to the familiar
spot. Kneeling on the hardwood, I tapped on the floorboard with my
knuckles.
“It’s not here,” Ajax informed. When he found me staring at him in
disbelief, he followed up. “Raven, I raised three teenagers next to a nearabandoned house. It’s not rocket science. I know the owners and have a
spare key in case of emergencies. I inspect the place regularly.”
I openly gaped at Ajax. I needed to forget, yet he was still controlling my
every move.
Of all the things he had done, this was the worst. It shouldn’t be, far from it,
but something in me snapped.
I glared at Ajax, pupils dilating. My breathing turned ragged, adrenaline
spiking. My heartbeat picked up at an alarming rate.
Before Ajax could react, I made a fist with my right hand, drew it back, and
punched him right in his fucking face.
Holy shit. “Ow. Fuck. Fuck,” I cried out, covering my fist with my other
hand and hunching over in pain.
I punched Ajax square in the jaw, but Ajax, the fucking hulk, had an iron
jaw. Pretty sure my fist was broken.
“Damnit, Rave,” Ajax put his hands around my shoulders with irritation.
“Let me see. You probably broke your finger,” he snapped.
“Get off me.” I shook him off, holding my right hand tightly to my chest.
“Just let me take a look at it,” he said more gently, this time as if trying to
alleviate my descent into madness.
This was when the caring guardian showed up? Not while he was fucking
me and didn’t have the decency to stop after I asked him to? He cost us our
chance and lost himself to the dark side. He cost me my fucking sanity, too,
and he didn’t even know it.
So, insanity it was, and insanity took over.
I flung myself at Ajax. Using the same right hand, I landed another punch.
“Raven, stop. You’re going to hurt yourself.” Ajax moved easily to avoid
my assaults, agitation spiking with every word.
Ignoring the pain, I focused on the pure adrenaline, landing punch after
punch on his face, neck, and shoulders.
Ajax closed his eyes as if resisting his urge to roll them. For a moment, I
wondered if he’d retaliate, though something told me he was humoring me.
At most, my attacks seemed like tiny needles annoying him with their
prickling.
Finally, he grabbed both my arms, trying to calm my hysteria. “Shh. Stop,
Rave. You’re still injured from your fall, and I don’t want you fracturing
your fingers on top of that.”
Using my left foot, I stomped on his right. Ajax was so shocked by my
insane array of strikes that he let go of my arms. Stumbling forward, I spun
in place. “It sucks, doesn’t it, Ajax?” I yelled. “When you ask someone to
stop, and they don’t stop.”
He stood a safe distance away, but his stunned expression was visible.
Having tired myself out, I momentarily stopped flailing. There was blood
on my knuckles. My hands were about to fall off while Ajax remained
unscathed.
He watched me closely. His body language was clear, and he was thinking
of different ways to fix me. His protective instincts were out. Ajax, the
caretaker, was in full-blown concern mode.
Except, I didn’t want this guy right now. I wanted Ajax, the lust-crazed
sociopath. That was the only person I wanted to hurt at this moment.
“Where the fuck was all this concern while you were having your way with
me and ruining my life?”
“I wasn’t trying to ruin your life,” Ajax deliberated. “Come on, Rave. It’s
been years. Clearly, you want to be with me, too. Forgive me already so that
we can be togeth—”
“NEVER!” I yelled at the top of my lungs.
The word echoed through the silent room. It vibrated through us, bouncing
off the still walls. As the word settled in, a dark cloud took over Ajax. My
blind punches weren’t adequate, though I sensed the effect that word had on
him. Ajax’s jaw ticked as he visibly ground his teeth. The fleeting anger in
his eyes set in, and the tendons on his arms rose.
“You’re so fucking stubborn.” Ajax’s cold, detached tone was laced with
quiet fury. “But so am I. The difference is I have no boundaries when it
comes to you.”
Ajax stepped closer, and it took every ounce of control not to bolt.
“Do you know what my first instinct was after I found out about Reid? I
wanted to tie you to my bed and fuck the idea out of your head. I wanted to
roam the streets of New York to kill my own brother. I still haven’t decided
whether I'm going through with it.”
I inhaled sharply.
Ajax, the caretaker, had officially left the building.
Hello, lust-crazed sociopath.
The sociopath I wanted to hurt reminded me why I ran in the first place. I
walked backward until hitting the tall column in the middle of the room.
Ajax crowded me with his body. I spun in place, flattening my palm on the
column, so the front of my body didn’t crash into it. Ajax was next to me
within a second, his rapid breaths indicating his wrath.
“Are you scared, Raven?” he growled. “That’s how I feel every time losing
you becomes a possibility. I’ll fight until my last breath if that’s how long it
takes to keep you. You’ve consumed me. Loving you—”
“Jesus. What you did wasn’t love,” I cut him off sharply. Grabbing the
collar of his shirt, I pulled him close enough to feel his breath against my
cheeks, letting him read the loathing painted on my face. “So, why did you
do it, Ajax?”
“Because I have no control around you,” he hissed. “Because I’m obsessed
with you. I love y—”
“No.” I tightened my fist on his collar, jerking him. “You don’t deserve to
say those words.”
“I suffered for years without you, and you can’t hear me say it? I fucking
love—”
“SHUT UP!” I yelled at the top of my lungs.
“NO,” he thundered, equally loud. “You will listen to the fucking words. I
love—”
I didn’t let Ajax finish the sentence and slammed my lips to his. I pushed
him against the column. One of my arms snaked around his neck to grip his
hair.
Ajax froze from shock but suddenly moved at an all-mighty speed as
realization dawned on him. He grabbed my ass to pick me up while my legs
naturally wrapped around his waist. I leaned into him, forcing his back to
hit the column harder.
I kissed him fiercely.
Rough.
Demanding.
Hateful.
Ajax pulled me closer to his chest, his other hand frantically grabbing at the
hem of my dress to slide it up to my hips. My hands traveled between us to
unbuckle his belt and undo his pant buttons. I pulled down his zipper and
reached inside his boxers to pull out his dick.
Neither of us came up for air. I aggressively stroked his tongue with mine
and his cock with my hand. I used my other hand to pull my thong to the
side. I slid him into my folds to position him, lifted my body slightly off
his, and slammed myself down.
“Fuck,” Ajax broke the kiss to pant.
With the other hand around Ajax's neck, I placed my palm flat on the
column, using the support to rock myself against him.
He stared at me with awe, unable to speak. Skimming his hands from my
thighs to my ass, Ajax walked backward until my back hit the wall by the
window.
Rapidly smoothing my hands across Ajax’s chest, I shed his jacket. He
alternated his hands so I could peel off each sleeve, tossing the coat over his
shoulders.
Bending his knees slightly, Ajax ground into me. I reached for the window
curtain next to me for leverage as Ajax hit every spot on my sex.
“God.” I bit down on my bottom lip, digging my heels into his back.
Ajax moved us off the wall and walked with me in his arms. A loud thud,
followed by something falling on the floor, jolted me from the lust.
“What the fuck was that?”
Ajax didn’t respond. We bumped into something else in the dark, but I
didn’t bother asking what shattered this time. He reached the living room,
pushing us down to the soft rug.
Before my back hit the rug, I wrapped my legs around his waist and shoved
at his shoulders, turning us over to straddle him.
Lifting, I braced a palm on his chest and sank further into him.
“Holy shit, baby!” Ajax trembled under me, lifting his head to catch my lips
between his.
I removed my jacket, untied the knot of my wraparound dress, and slid it off
myself before undoing my bra. It was a cold day, and the heat was turned
off in this house. I should have been freezing, but my body was on fire. My
blood sizzled, my bones burning.
“If this is what you wanted, all he had to was ask,” he murmured, sounding
fascinated. “You didn’t have to go through all this trouble.”
“Shut up!” I spat.
Ajax laughed with a low chuckle. “No need to be so touchy, baby.” He
grabbed my chin to tip my face down. “Now, look at me.”
“No.” I batted his hand away.
Ajax frowned, quickly snuffing the fleeting anger and reaching between us
with his thick fingers. He parted my folds, fingers grounding against my
clit.
Oh, shit. My palm landed flat on his chest. “Fuck.”
“That’s it. Tell me how much you want this.”
My eyes flew open, and I glared at him. Ajax applied more pressure to my
clit, silently challenging me to deny his claim.
Eyes fluttering closed, head thrown back, I forgot to argue. “Oh, God.”
“Tell me,” he urged, ceasing the motion of his fingers as a threat.
“Fuck, I want this,” I conceded.
Ajax resumed the torture at my admission as I rolled my hips mindlessly.
“Fuck, yes.”
I slammed into him, making him vibrate underneath. Ajax grunted like an
animal with each thrust. I smashed into his pelvis until I came with tears
seeping out of my eyes.
Ajax quickly peeled off his T-shirt, lifting to a seated position. With a strong
hand around my waist, Ajax moved me to his will as if I were a limp rag
doll. His eyes bore into mine, and he kept a punishing pace.
My senses heightened as he sent aftershocks throughout my overstimulated
system. Ajax took one of my nipples into his mouth and flicked it with his
tongue, sending me into another earth-shattering orgasm.
“Oh, God.” I threw my head back.
“Fuck,” Ajax panted during his climax.
Ajax had barely pulled out before falling backward on the rug, with me on
top. He covered me with both arms and buried his nose into my hair in
contentment as I melted into him.
I couldn’t find the weed, but a different drug gave me precisely what I
needed.
Numbness.
Oblivion.
Once again, the assailant of the cause of this ruin was the one to calm me
down.
Ajax.
The taste of blood hit my palette. Fuck. There was dried blood on
my chest and neck as well. Stretching out one of my sore arms, I lifted my
head to find a mass of black hair over my chest and a chaotic scene around
me. I barely recalled drifting off.
The house was in worse condition. The place looked like a hurricane hit it.
Raven was lying dormant on my chest, hopefully sleeping. My cock stirred
every time I breathed her in. I smoothed her hair by gently untangling the
knots with my fingers. Her hair was messy, she had hickeys all over her
neck, and I bet her makeup was smudged.
She resembled the chaos surrounding us.
This scene was exactly what I had wished for, burning everything in my
path until we were both surrounded by nothing but chaos. Our path was
now clear of external obstacles.
My wish had been granted, so why was it making me uneasy about how this
girl was unraveling? While I could handle Raven becoming unhinged, I
doubted she could. I had never seen Raven lose her shit like that. Perhaps
my past actions pushed her too far.
While I felt obligated to defend the relationship I cherished, Raven’s
assessment of our history was correct. My assumption of a seventeen-yearold Raven’s level of maturity was wrong. She was an understanding person
and lacked strong emotions. I misjudged her non-reactive nature for
maturity. I expected her to voice it if she didn’t want me.
I held a position of power, and she felt pressured to go along with my
desires. I should have waited until Raven was eighteen. As a minor, her
decisions weren’t her own. I was a functioning adult by seventeen. We
acted so alike; I assumed she was, too.
I hid our relationship, never realizing it made Raven feel cheap. My stunted
growth rivaled Raven’s, and these bad decisions led us down a path of
darkness. I stared at the girl I had dragged into the dark with me.
“Rave?” I said in my hoarse voice.
Raven lifted her head as I trailed my fingers between her thighs and slipped
into her folds. Fuck. She was still dripping, a mixture of both of us.
Lifting my head, I tilted to nibble on her ear. Our chests moved fast, faces
covered in the same animalistic lust.
We had to talk about the fucked up shit from tonight, but not at this
moment. No words passed between us. Raven wasn’t shuddering out of
fear, and my mind was on a single track before it changed.

Raven.
“Ajax?” I blinked to orient myself. “How long have you been sitting there?”
“A while,” he replied. A pair of piercing green orbs stared at me. Ajax was
sitting on the couch next to my horizontal body. His boxers were back on,
while I only had a quilt covering my naked body.
Our night consisted of an endless cycle of sex and sleep. Against the wall,
over the arm of the sofa, on the floor, every inch of this house. The light
seeping through the windows indicated it was finally dawn.
I rose to a seated position on the couch, fully awake. “What’s going on?”
“I was going to ask you the same. What’s going on with you?”
“What do you mean?”
“Last night, you displayed more emotions than ever before. I’ve never even
seen you stomp your foot in anger.”
“So?”
“You lost it last night, Rave,” he stated quietly. Ajax assessed me like he
had figured me out for the first time. “You threw a shit storm. You went off
the rail with actual physical attacks.” Ajax grabbed one of my arms to pull
me closer to him. “Tell me the truth. What’s going on with you?”
“I had a fight with—”
“Enough, Raven. Do you hate me that much?” His shaky voice matched the
trembling in his breathing. “It’s killing me right now to think only a few
weeks around me can do this to you. You were fine and dandy around Reid
while I seemed to be destroying you.” Ajax’s fingers flexed into my arms
when I didn’t respond. He leaned in, voice muffled. “Do you love him?” he
gritted out as if he couldn’t stomach the words, let alone the thought. “Is
that why?”
Recognizing this topic as a trigger for Ajax, I gently pushed off and stood.
Grabbing his jacket off the floor, I wrapped it around and moved to the
couch’s end. I pulled my knees to my chest, resting my chin on them, and
stared at the man sitting across from me.
“I loved Reid a long time ago, when we were kids,” I stated evenly.
“And now? Do you still love him?”
“No. Once we grew up… he became my family. That's all, I swear. Reid’s
aware of it, too. He simply wanted me to try for more. I did because he has
always been my other half.”
Ajax scoffed. “Sounds like love to me.”
“No, Ajax. I don’t love him,” I said patiently. “I love you.”
Ajax.
Time stopped.
The universe came to a screeching halt. My heart was hammering way too
hard, ears ringing as if I just had the best fuck of my life. I never thought
anything on earth could be better than our physical connection. I was
wrong. This was better.
“Did you just say—”
“I love you,” Raven repeated easily.
Stumped, I ultimately spoke in a bewildered voice. “I love you, too. Look, I
know we have some work ahead of us. I know why you have been reacting
so poorly around me. I’ve been talking to some specialists—”
“Ajax,” Raven cut me off. “There are a few things I have to tell you about
that I was hoping to avoid. However, you need to hear them to understand
what’s been going on.” Raven’s tone was deceptively calm, her voice
dictating those words wouldn’t change our lives as I had hoped.
“Okay,” I responded cautiously.
Raven crawled back toward me. She lay next to me, facing away. I pulled
her front against my back, perplexed. Her tranquility was so eerie I had no
idea how to handle her.
“Ajax,” Raven spoke in a soft voice. “I hoped not to tell you because I
knew you’d either ask me to go to therapy or blame yourself. But if I don’t
tell you, you’ll keep trying to find a way to fix me, and you can’t.”
Turning her over, I lay sideways to look at her face. “Tell me."
Raven appeared nervous. “When I first moved to Paris, I stayed with my
mom for a few weeks before moving out to room with girls from my
internship. Mom was too busy with her parties and her life. It was the first
time in my life I didn’t have Reid’s friendship. With everything that
happened… he was the person I needed the most.” Raven glanced at me
nervously.
“I get it,” I encouraged her to continue.
“I kept having these nightmares. I’d wake up every night, screaming—”
Raven’s eyes darted back to my face.
“I’m not offended if the nightmares are about me. Talk to me.” We had to
talk about her trauma, even if I was the man to cause it.
Raven bit her bottom lip. “I kept having the same nightmare… It was about
the night before I left for Paris. It was about… what happened between us.
I’d wake up and feel paralyzed like I was still trapped in the dream.
Sometimes I’d dream that I climaxed. Other times I wouldn’t be able to tell
if I was dreaming or if it was real.”
“Why that night?" I whispered. "It happened other times before that night
and after you moved back. What made you have nightmares about that
night specifically?”
Raven shrugged. “I guess it was the first time it truly wasn’t my choice.
None of the other times felt as out of control as that night. Maybe it’s
because I was younger. I don’t know. I just… it was when the concept of
safety and trust felt eradicated. No matter what I do, I can’t shake the
feeling away. It felt… violent between us.”
It was.
I figured the same. I saw the look of horror on Raven’s face, and I knew
everything was about to change. I waited for Raven to add more. When she
didn't, I gently stroked her cheek. “I’m sorry. I feel like you are a part of
me. I didn’t understand you saw it differently. I wasn’t trying—”
“I know,” she said softly. “It took me a long time to understand how we
perceived the same situation differently. I understand what happened
between us, but I can’t stop myself from reacting.”
“You’re right. You can’t,” I conceded, though I had no idea how to make
things okay between us. “Tell me more. What happened after?”
Raven took a deep breath. “I-I was barely thinking straight when I left for
Paris, and the nightmares kept getting worse. At the time, I still worked
with the mentor from my internship, but I couldn’t bear it if anyone in class
so much as touched me during an assignment. I’d lash out if they did.”
“Baby—”
“I ended up getting kicked out of my internship. Later, I spoke to my
mentor. The remote internship was required to graduate high school and
attend college at the Paris School of Fashion. My mentor took pity on me.
He said if I got help, he would mark the internship as completed. So, I tried
therapy, but it was counterproductive. I didn’t want to talk about it,
especially with someone I didn’t know. Then Mia emailed me, asking to
visit. She stuck by me that summer. Suddenly, I felt okay again. She was
better than therapy.”
“And after Mia left?”
“It was hard after Mia left,” Raven admitted. “I didn’t speak the language,
and all the other relationships I had made were meaningless. I wanted to be
around my family and counted the days until Mia’s next break. She became
my lifeline.”
My throat was dry as realization dawned on me. “I took that away from
you. I wouldn’t let you see Mia anymore.”
Rave gave me an awkward smile without verbally confirming.
I brushed her cheeks with my knuckles softly. “I know it was hard for you,
but we can move forward from this. Do you want to go back to therapy?”
Watching her reactions left little optimism for our relationship. That’s why
we needed professional help. It was the only way we could be together.
Not surprisingly, Raven shook her head. “I tried it so many times. It only
makes things worse.”
I nodded in understanding. For the entire Sinclair clan, therapy reminded us
of Tessa’s on-and-off life of recovery. Though I researched it, I understood
why Raven didn’t want to pursue that option again.
I pushed myself off the couch to stand. Raven followed me with her eyes as
I paced the fireplace and made my way back. “If you couldn’t see Mia
anymore, something else must have worked.”
“I received an email from a mutual friend group Reid and I shared,” Raven
said. “They were tired of the feud between Reid and me. They wanted both
of us to come on a trip to Costa Rica. Reid shockingly agreed, so we met
again. After seeing Reid for the first time in years, we made up. It was my
last true human connection. He pulled me out of that darkness.”
“Just like that?”
“Just like that.” Raven’s smile lit up her face. “For the last two years, he
never stopped being my constant. I owe him my life for helping me turn it
around. So, you have to understand why I couldn’t refuse when he asked
me for something more.”
I had murderous urges when I discovered Raven was entertaining a
relationship with Reid. I stooped low enough to threaten murder on my
brother, but I didn’t consider the situation I’d put her in. I doused her life
with fear, refusing to leave her alone until she promised to give us another
chance.
All the while, Reid picked up the pieces of the consequences. My actions
pushed her into his arms because he was the better man. Even I had to
admit it.
I brushed some of the hair off of Raven’s face. “I do understand,” I admitted
quietly. “You made all this progress because he helped you, but since you
came back, you’ve been slipping.”
I let the words sink in. Her ultimate trigger was and would always be—me.
The thought of how my love destroyed her was ripping through me. The
worst thing I did was loving her.
Was that why she kept hurting herself?
“Did you engage in self-harm before, or is that new?” I asked a little too
quickly.
Raven’s head snapped toward me, her head shaking vehemently.
“I-I... I-I’m not,” she stammered before gaining control. “I’m not trying to
hurt myself. It’s a coping mechanism to keep myself centered and lucid, so I
don’t do anything stupid.”
“Stupid, as in hurting me when you feel threatened?” I asked plainly.
“You’ll always view me as a threat, so you harm yourself to suppress the
instinctive urge you feel about hurting me.”
Raven would continue harming herself to stop the reflexive urges to hurt
me. One day, she might go too far. She already came close last night. Just a
couple of days ago, she tried to stab herself. It was clear as day—Raven
was breaking.
“Ajax,” Raven’s eyes widened. “That’s not true. We were together last
night. I didn’t experience any symptoms afterward.”
“That’s because you experienced it beforehand,” I said incredulously.
“Raven, you went off the charts.”
“So, I’m not allowed to be upset at the things you have done?” she asked
angrily.
I rubbed my temples, trying to reel in my thoughts. “Of course you are, but
last night was extreme. Not to mention, sometimes you experience
symptoms, and sometimes you don’t. It only needs to get out of control
once for you to hurt yourself. You’ve already been doing that. Raven, living
without you feels like death for me. Watching you destroy yourself is the
only thing worse than not being with you. Your nightmares. Your triggers
—”
“Ajax—”
“For God’s sake, Rave. I’m causing you anxiety attacks. That decimates the
bare minimum requirement to be in a relationship.”
Raven cut me off with a hand on my cheek. “If we give it some time, things
will change—”
“It’s been four years, Rave. You healed. He healed you, and I’m destroying
you.”
My chest expanded at the persistent thought on my mind for days. Now I
understood why they said shit like, If you love something, set it free.
In the end, that understanding didn’t cross my mind out of concern over a
taboo, forbidden relationship. Nor due to fear of our families or the stigma
from society. It wasn’t because of some stupid love triangle between
brothers or other dramatic telenovela reasons. It stemmed from the agony of
not finding an alternate solution that wouldn’t destroy the woman I loved
without giving her up.
In many ways, I fell in love with Raven more than before. I finally loved
her more than I loved myself, enough to say the words I never thought
possible. “I won’t force you to seek professional help, but I'll let you go if
being around me is destroying you. I'll do anything as long as you don’t
have to lose yourself.”
Silence. Raven held on to me tightly as the suffocating silence engulfed the
room, reflecting our truth. There was no acceptable answer or solution, so
there could only be silence.
The room had been filled with pin-drop silence for minutes. The direction
of this conversation was leading to something neither of us wanted to
acknowledge. How could two people love each other this damn much, but it
still wasn’t enough?
Unbearable anguish had been battling inside me since the realization. It was
wreaking havoc on my organs, mind, and heart. Our future seemed bleak,
and I needed a better outcome, even if it was imaginary.
“I am going to marry you in the Greek Isles,” I finally broke the silence.
“You always wanted to visit Greece.”
“Ajax—”
“We could go to the Amalfi Coast afterward for our honeymoon. I went
there once and always wanted to take you there.”
“Why are you doing this?” she asked faintly.
I repositioned myself on the couch to spoon her with an arm around her
waist.
“Humor me.” I dropped my forehead against her shoulder blade. “You like
imaginary worlds and hypothetical situations. Make one with me.”
Raven stayed quiet. She drew lines with her fingers on my arm around her
waist.
“Rave,” I telepathically pleaded for her to give in.
“Maybe a sunset ceremony in Santorini,” Raven sighed. “I’ve heard
Santorini has the best sunsets in the world.”
I kissed her temple, grateful she was going along with it. “We could return
to New York after and redo my condo the way you like it.”
I saw a frown forming. Raven was probably thinking about those color
swatches again. “I have to tell you something,” Raven said hesitantly. “I
can’t differentiate between egg-white, white, and off-white.”
I laughed at her delayed honesty. “I know, baby. I asked you to choose
between those three colors, and you circled the beige.”
Raven giggled, tugging at every single one of my heartstrings. “Fine. I will
focus on my new business to become a huge success. You can become my
trophy husband and redecorate the condo with as much egg-white or offwhite as you please.”
“Hmm,” I contemplated. “I don’t know about that, but I will take a salary
cut and hire someone for my travel-related responsibilities. I don’t have to
be gone all the time.”
“Not bad,” Raven quipped. Then she said in a more dreamy voice, “After
that, Dad’s license to practice medicine will be reinstated, and Mom will
start a new line, which will become a success.”
“And Tessa will return to her old job,” I offered.
Raven smiled. “With my new successful business, I can help you take care
of other expenses for our families. Then you don’t have to work so damn
much.”
I nodded behind her. “We can finally start our lives together.”
“Tessa will start a new trial for a wonder drug that’ll cure her immediately.”
“Reid will find someone else to fall in love with, and he’ll forgive us both.”
“I’ll stop having nightmares.” Raven twisted her body to face me. “After
that?”
“After that—” I leaned back to give her a broad smile, “—I’m going to
knock you up.”
Raven’s mouth dropped open at my suggestion. “Oh, yeah?”
“Hell, yeah.”
“How many kids are we going to have?” Raven asked, lost in our world,
one that wasn’t marred by our scars, our obligations, and the truth of our
reality.
“Two,” I declared without hesitation. “A boy and a girl.”
From the side angle, I could see her scowl. “I barely want one. I can’t
handle two.”
“You should always have a spare kid in case something happens to the first
one.”
“You are so fucking morbid,” Raven mockingly gasped. “Did you just kill
off one of our imaginary children?”
“I thought you only wanted one.” I tilted my face in confusion.
“Well, I didn’t want to kill the other one off. I was just going to give it away
or leave it at the dumpster.”
Laughter ripped through my chest. “Both of our kids are going to look like
me. They’ll be too good-looking to be dumpster babies.”
Raven turned and raised an eyebrow. “Excuse me. Both?”
“I don’t want no damn kids that look like vampire Snow White.” I glanced
at her, voice thick with amusement.
“Vampire Snow White?” She bit her cheek to keep herself from laughing.
I shoot her a playful smile. “Do you want our kids to be so pale they look
like the Flowers in the Attic children?”
“Oh, my God.” Raven gave out a huff, punching my arm around her waist.
“You are so rude.”
“If they get your dark vampirine hair and pasty skin, our kids will be bullied
mercilessly in school. We can’t have that. No. They should look like me.”
“If they look like you, then you can keep them,” she pouted. “I don’t want
them.”
“You have to admit that I’m the looker in the family. Wouldn’t you want
this,” I asked as I gestured toward my face and body with a hand wave, “for
our children?”
“Shut up.” Raven laughed at our parallel future and turned her head to
inspect my face, probably to find something she disliked about my physical
attributes.
“It won’t happen, baby,” I assured.
“What won’t happen?”
“You won’t find anything you dislike about my pretty face.”
“You fucking narcissi—”
I cut her off by bringing my lips to hers. Pulling back, I gently bit her
bottom lip. “So, baby, how did you like our world?”
“I don’t think I can live outside of it.” Raven brought her lips back to mine
and moaned when our tongues collided.
I searched her eyes. “Are you sore? I was rough before—”
“I don’t care. I want you,” Raven whispered, the only motivation I needed.
This wasn’t one of the times for our animalistic lust. Somehow, she knew it,
too. I entered gently and made her look at me while I fucked her slowly.
Raven held on to me and didn’t look away once. We both came staring at
each other as if we could see through the other’s soul.
And it was fucking perfect in every fucking way.
I sensed Raven’s missing warmth before waking. A full stream of daylight
greeted me through the patio doors. My muscles were sore as hell from last
night and this morning, and I stumbled to the kitchen sink to wash off the
dried blood on my face.
Groaning inwardly, I took stock of the place. We broke at least two lamps,
along with many unwanted destructions. I pulled up my phone to open the
Airbnb app, reserving the next two nights so I’d have time to hire a maid
service to clean the mess. They could charge me for the remaining damages.
Once I finished getting dressed, I made my way home, only to find Raven’s
bedroom door wide open with a familiar scene in front. There were piles of
clothes everywhere. The room looked like it had been ransacked and torn
apart. However, it narrated a familiar tale. I had seen her room in this very
condition.
There was an envelope with my name on it. The note was simple but telling.
Raven left once more without saying goodbye.
You lied.
-Raven
Two Hours Ago.
Raven.
I was exhausted, both physically and mentally. Ajax and I had sex, fell
asleep, spoke, then put it on repeat.
I was sore by the time we had sex again, but I didn’t care. I wanted the pain
with pleasure. It was the perfect paradox for our type of love.
Except, it wasn’t painful. It was gentle in a way I couldn't describe. It was
the first and only time we had made love. Yes. We fucking made love
instead of… well, fucking.
We stared at each other and said the words when we came, and it was
perfect.
Ajax touched my soul in a way I couldn’t explain, and later, I watched him
sleep for hours. He hated himself for hurting me because he never fully
viewed what happened between us as wrong. None of that mattered
anymore. The only thing to matter was an outcome that would allow us to
move forward.
However, my hope vanished when I woke, thinking Ajax was on top and
choking me—that he was inside me. I looked around for help and turned
my head, only to find the source of my horrors lying naked, wrapped
around my body. Ajax was fast asleep, exhausted from our night, and I kept
thinking he’d wake up to turn my nightmares into a reality.
Deep down, I knew I loved Ajax, but fear had a funny way of ruling over
your other emotions. Every inch of my body screamed to grab the knife
from the kitchen and stab him with it. Before these thoughts could take root,
I stood on shaky legs. I had to make a fast exit before doing something
impulsive or harmful.
I didn’t know where Ajax and I stood after last night. Our relationship’s
progression wasn’t promising, but the idea of separating was causing an
unfathomable type of agony. We created a parallel future and universe to
give ourselves a happily ever after, one that might not be written in our
stars. The truth was—I might not be the kind of mother we painted in that
world. I’d be like Tessa, ruining my children’s lives while a doting husband
cared for me until the day he grew to resent me.
My love entailed wanting the best for Ajax, with or without me. He
deserved a partner who helped him lessen his burdens, not a partner who
was one of the burdens he had to carry. If I couldn't be that partner for him,
I’d let him go rather than drag him down.
I grabbed my jacket and dress off the floor. Sliding the patio door open, I
stepped outside to feel the cool air.
When I returned to the Sinclair home, I faced Ajax, my worst nightmare. I
was also reminded of the selfless man who quietly cared for everyone,
expecting nothing in return. I saw the man who diligently paid attention to
every one of my habits, and my interests. A person who made me feel like I
was the center of their universe.
He was a good man who made some terrible mistakes. I understand that
now. Nonetheless, I was happy to know I loved a good man, and I did. I
loved him with all my heart.
How he made me feel... I never thought it was possible to feel that way
about another person. It wasn't until I came back here did I realize I was
missing a part of myself. It was ironic because the exact missing piece was
the cause of my downfall. Irony and paradox always played a significant
factor in our story.
In the end, Ajax fell for a woman who was just like the mother he resented.
In the end, Raven fell in love with the man of her dreams, who was also her
worse nightmare.
I stood in the cold, breathing in the fresh air. As the air cooled my flushed
skin, I spied my phone lying motionless on the deck. I forgot about it last
night, so it was left on the porch all night.
I grabbed my phone to find several missed calls from Reid, along with
many texts asking me to call him back. There was even an email. Since my
phone was almost dead, I rushed home instead of calling Reid. Marching to
my room, I locked the door and plugged my charger into the phone. I sat to
read the email first. It was a long one and, from the looks of it, eloquent.
Reid started the email by talking about how he couldn’t remember a day
when he wasn’t in love with me. The first memory of his life was of me, not
of his parents, not of his siblings, but a memory of me. The first memory
etched on his mind was us eating chocolates in my bed when we were three
years old. We weren’t allowed to eat sugar, but we stole some from the
pantry. I remembered because it was also my first memory.
Reid talked about the day we decided to call each other corny names: Stud
and Beautiful. It started as a joke from a movie. Initially, we were acting
cheesy, but soon it became abnormal not to address each other as such.
The email went on to discuss the day he caught me with Ajax. It tore him
up. It crushed him, and he didn’t think he could recover. He explained how
awful the visual was and the following moments when he had to watch me
sleep in Ajax’s arms. It drove him to the painful decision to leave this house
after Dad confirmed my concussion was mild.
I understood his decision. I wasn’t sure why he was explaining himself.
However, when I reached the last two paragraphs, his explanation
connected.
I had to leave. I couldn’t watch you with him. All this time, I
thought you chose him over me. That was before Mia told me what
happened. I am sorry. I am so, so sorry. I didn’t know what he was
doing to you. I had no idea what my brother was capable of. I can’t
believe Ajax is so fucked up in the head. I should have seen it
sooner. It all makes sense now why you suddenly left New York and
why you didn’t want to move back to that house. Please forgive me,
Rave. I should have been the one to protect you. Instead, I left you
there. Ajax will pay for what he did. I will be there as soon as I can.
I love you,
Reid
I read the last two paragraphs three more times before the shock wore off.
Fuck, Mia. What have you done?
I tapped the call icon with shaky hands and fumbled with the phone. I
finally took a deep breath. I had to be rational to deal with this and calm
Reid down from whatever he planned to do.
I tapped the button to call him.
Reid picked up on the first ring.
*
End of Book 2! 
